node_0
Intraocular pressure in genetically distinct mice : Intraocular pressure in genetically distinct mice: an update and strain survey
Intraocular pressure in genetically distinct mice : Intraocular pressure in genetically distinct mice: an update and strain survey
the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
IOP between genetically distinct mouse strains : Significant differences exist among various strains (P < 0.0001 for all groups, ANOVA comparing strains within each sex group).  Figure 1  An almost two-fold range of IOP between genetically distinct mouse strains.
node_2
strain : Intraocular pressure in genetically distinct mice: an update and strain survey
strain : Intraocular pressure in genetically distinct mice: an update and strain survey
strain : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
strain : Here, we provide an update, including an extensive strain survey, and show that the methodology is reliable and produces reproducible data over extended periods of time.
strains : A broad range of IOPs between strains  Figure 1 shows the average IOP of a number of inbred mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
strain : There is a wide range of IOP with strain BALB/cJ having one of the lowest average IOPs (11.1 ± 0.5 mmHg) and strain CBA/CaJ one of the highest IOPs (19.3 ± 0.3 mmHg).
strain : There is a wide range of IOP with strain BALB/cJ having one of the lowest average IOPs (11.1 ± 0.5 mmHg) and strain CBA/CaJ one of the highest IOPs (19.3 ± 0.3 mmHg).
Strain : Strain name CBA/CaHN-Btkxid/J is abbreviated to CBA/CaHN.
strains : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
strains : Histological analysis confirmed these observations and also identified calcified cyst like structures in the iris epithelium of strains SB/Le and SEC/1ReJ.
strains : Previously described retinal degeneration [[81]] caused by homozygosity for the Pde6brd1mutation was noted in strains SB/Le, ST/bJ, BUB/BnJ, CBA/J, C3H/HeJ, SJL/J and SWR/J.
strain : We purposefully included strains at each end of the IOP spectrum, and strain C57BL/6J (B6) that is commonly used for genetic experiments (Figure 3).
strains : The average IOP of different cohorts of strains CBA/CaJ, CBA/CaHN (both high end of spectrum) and B6 were consistent over time.
Strain : Strain 129P3/J was the most variable strain with the average IOP fluctuating by up to 2.5 mmHg.
Strain : Strain name CBA/CaHN-Btkxid/J is abbreviated to CBA/CaHN.
strains : Importantly, the IOPs of strains B6 and C3H/HeJ did not change during this time (B6, 12.3. ± 0.5 mmHg in 1996 and 12.4 ± 0.3 mmHg in 1997, n= 10 and 14; C3H/HeJ, 13.7 ± 0.8 mmHg in 1996 and 13.6 ± 0.2 mmHg in 1997, n = 9 and 19).
strains : IOP decreased significantly in strains C57BL/6J and 129P3/J but not C3H/HeJ.
strain : In strain 129P3/J, IOP did not differ significantly with age between 3 and 14 months but was lower in 18 month old mice (P < 0.001 compared to all younger ages, Figure 4).
Strains : Strains B6 and 129P3/J have been extensively evaluated at multiple ages between 3 and 24 months of age.
strain : Sex differences were always absent in strain 129P3/J and typically absent in strain B6.
strain : Sex differences were always absent in strain 129P3/J and typically absent in strain B6.
strain : In strain B6, however, males infrequently had significantly higher IOP than females.
strain : To identify any early window when it may be possible to assess IOP without an obvious anesthetic effect, 195 mice of strain B6 were anesthetized with the 1X dose and IOP was measured at 1 minute time points between 4 and 12 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
strain : Similar results were obtained using 161 strain 129P3/J and 145 strain DBA/2J mice with the 1X dose (129P3/J, P = 0.1; DBA/2J, P = 0.2).
strain : Similar results were obtained using 161 strain 129P3/J and 145 strain DBA/2J mice with the 1X dose (129P3/J, P = 0.1; DBA/2J, P = 0.2).
strain : If the CBA/CaJ mice are excluded, R2 drops to 0.01 of ARK/J, C57BL/6J and SJL/J, strain ARK/J had the lowest IOP.
strain : Genetic alterations and IOP  Y Chromosome  The Y chromosome has been implicated in strain specific blood pressure differences in rats [23,24].
strain : To test if the Y chromosome of strain 129/Ola alters IOP in relation to that of strain B6, we compared the IOPs of pure B6 males and consomic B6 males that had the 129P2/Ola Y chromosome (backcrossed for 11 generations).
strain : To test if the Y chromosome of strain 129/Ola alters IOP in relation to that of strain B6, we compared the IOPs of pure B6 males and consomic B6 males that had the 129P2/Ola Y chromosome (backcrossed for 11 generations).
strain : The 129 Y Chr had been backcrossed to strain C57BL/6J for 11 generations.
strain : Thus it is feasible to assess sufficient numbers of mice for quantitative trait locus (QTL) analysis methods and to use these methods to identify chromosomal regions contributing to strain differences in IOP.
strain : The strain survey we report provides valuable information for designing these experiments.
strains : We previously demonstrated that the glaucomatous strains DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty develop elevated IOP with age [14,19].  Gender
strains : Of possible relevance, we previously reported that female mice of strains DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty develop elevated IOP at an earlier age than males [14,19].
strain : The magnitude of the difference varies with strain, and was greatest in SWR/J.
strain : Interestingly, the IOP of strain CBA/CaJ, which has one of the highest daytime IOPs does not appear to increase in the dark.
strain : Further more detailed studies are needed to define the characteristics of the diurnal rhythm of intraocular pressure in mice, and to determine whether it is lacking or has a different timing in strain CBA/CaJ.
strains : Albinism by itself is either not sufficient to alter the diurnal rhythm of IOP or alters it in different ways depending upon genetic background, however, since the albino strains BALB/cByJ and SWR/J had increased IOP during the dark.
node_4
Background : Abstract  Background  
Background : Abstract  Background  
Background : Background  Glaucoma is a leading cause of blindness but its molecular etiology is poorly understood.
node_6
intraocular pressure : Little is known about genetic factors affecting intraocular pressure (IOP) in mice and other mammals.
intraocular pressure : Little is known about genetic factors affecting intraocular pressure (IOP) in mice and other mammals.
IOP : Little is known about genetic factors affecting intraocular pressure (IOP) in mice and other mammals.
node_8
intraocular pressure (IOP) in mice : Little is known about genetic factors affecting intraocular pressure (IOP) in mice and other mammals.
intraocular pressure (IOP) in mice : Little is known about genetic factors affecting intraocular pressure (IOP) in mice and other mammals.
mouse IOP : Age, time of day, obesity and diabetes have effects on mouse IOP similar to those in humans and other species.
IOP in mice : Previously, we developed a method to measure IOP in mice and reported initial findings on the magnitude of mouse IOP [13].
mouse IOP : Previously, we developed a method to measure IOP in mice and reported initial findings on the magnitude of mouse IOP [13].
IOP in mice :  An initial study of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in mice did not detect a good correlation (R2 = 0.1, Figure 7).  Figure 7  No correlation between blood pressure and IOP.
IOP in mouse strains : To determine if allelic variation in the mouse Myoc gene associated with IOP in mouse strains, we analyzed the gene in an assortment of strains with different IOPs.
intraocular pressure in mice : Further more detailed studies are needed to define the characteristics of the diurnal rhythm of intraocular pressure in mice, and to determine whether it is lacking or has a different timing in strain CBA/CaJ.
it : Further more detailed studies are needed to define the characteristics of the diurnal rhythm of intraocular pressure in mice, and to determine whether it is lacking or has a different timing in strain CBA/CaJ.
node_11
mice : Little is known about genetic factors affecting intraocular pressure (IOP) in mice and other mammals.
mice : Little is known about genetic factors affecting intraocular pressure (IOP) in mice and other mammals.
mouse : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
mice : These studies demonstrate that mice are a practical and powerful experimental system to study the genetics of IOP regulation and disease processes that raise IOP to harmful levels.
mouse : Due to conservation in mammalian physiology and the powerful tools of mouse genetics, mice are a very important experimental system for probing the functions (both in health and disease) of many genes recently identified by sequencing the human genome [12].
mice : Due to conservation in mammalian physiology and the powerful tools of mouse genetics, mice are a very important experimental system for probing the functions (both in health and disease) of many genes recently identified by sequencing the human genome [12].
mouse : We have focused on developing the mouse system for IOP and glaucoma studies [13-19].
Mice : Mice are expected to be extremely helpful in characterizing genes and mechanisms that affect IOP or the susceptibility of the optic nerve and retina to glaucomatous damage [20].  
mouse : Very little is known about the magnitude of IOP of various mouse strains or IOP fluctuation in mice with time or other factors.
mice : Very little is known about the magnitude of IOP of various mouse strains or IOP fluctuation in mice with time or other factors.
mice : Previously, we developed a method to measure IOP in mice and reported initial findings on the magnitude of mouse IOP [13].
mouse : Previously, we developed a method to measure IOP in mice and reported initial findings on the magnitude of mouse IOP [13].
mouse : The initial experiments demonstrated that in our hands careful ocular cannulation has a very minor effect on IOP (average of -0.3 mmHg, mode -0.5 mmHg) and demonstrated significant differences in intraocular pressure levels between four mouse strains.
mouse : A broad range of IOPs between strains  Figure 1 shows the average IOP of a number of inbred mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
mouse : Significant differences exist among various strains (P < 0.0001 for all groups, ANOVA comparing strains within each sex group).  Figure 1  An almost two-fold range of IOP between genetically distinct mouse strains.
mouse : During this period, the room in which our animals were housed and the manufacturer of the mouse diet were changed.
mouse : Scatter-plots demonstrating no change in IOP over the 12 minutes following anesthetic administration in three relatively unrelated mouse strains.
mice :  An initial study of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in mice did not detect a good correlation (R2 = 0.1, Figure 7).  Figure 7  No correlation between blood pressure and IOP.
mouse : To determine if allelic variation in the mouse Myoc gene associated with IOP in mouse strains, we analyzed the gene in an assortment of strains with different IOPs.
mouse : To determine if allelic variation in the mouse Myoc gene associated with IOP in mouse strains, we analyzed the gene in an assortment of strains with different IOPs.
mouse :  Sequencing identified two alleles of Myoc in these mouse strains (see text).
Mouse : Mouse strains homozygous for an allele having a 12 bp insertion in the promoter region are shown as open bars and strains homozygous for the allele without this insertion have filled bars.
mice : No differences in IOP were detected between these groups of mice (Figure 9, P = 0.1).  Figure 9  Effects of genetic alterations.
mouse : We report the IOPs of over 30 genetically different mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
mice : Thus it is feasible to assess sufficient numbers of mice for quantitative trait locus (QTL) analysis methods and to use these methods to identify chromosomal regions contributing to strain differences in IOP.
mouse : Thus, although both rat and mouse studies show that anesthesia decreases IOP, the studies do not agree on the timing of the effect.
the mice : The IOP depression occurred very soon after anesthesia in the rats but was delayed in the mice.
mouse : Essentially the same dose of ketamine and route of administration was used in both the rat and mouse IOP studies.
mice : In mice, the strain does not appear to be important as no early effect of anesthesia was present in the three distantly related laboratory strains [37] we studied in detail, and we have not observed any obvious effect during this period in any analyzed strain.
mice : Terpene administration or environmental exposure to terpenes in wood shavings alters drug resistance and decreases the effect of anesthetic agents in both rats and mice [40-45].  Risk factors for increased IOP  
mouse : We evaluated the relationship between these latter factors and IOP in genetically homogeneous mouse strains in a controlled environment.
mouse : Additional studies may also identify " normal" mouse strains that develop increased IOP with age as generally occurs in Western populations [52,53].
mouse : Our comparison of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in young, adult female mice of different mouse strains, whose blood pressures differed up to 36 mmHg, did not reveal a positive correlation.
mouse : Further studies are needed to determine if blood pressure correlates with IOP in males, and to determine the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in various mouse strains with age.
mice : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
mice : Thus, we compared the IOPs of mice at different times of day and identified several strains with significantly higher IOP during the dark compared to the light period.
mice : Further more detailed studies are needed to define the characteristics of the diurnal rhythm of intraocular pressure in mice, and to determine whether it is lacking or has a different timing in strain CBA/CaJ.
mouse : Analysis of these mouse strains may increase understanding of the molecular mechanisms controlling diurnal rhythms of IOP and that may be relevant to glaucoma.
mouse : It also is possible that CAII substantially contributes to aqueous humor secretion but that functional mouse CAIV is sufficient to prevent an effect of CAII deficiency on IOP in Car2 mutant mice.
mouse : A broad range of reproducible IOP differences exists between inbred mouse strains and a diurnal rhythm of IOP exists in different strains.
mice : Genetically uniform, mice can be used to study the effects of these risk factors on IOP.
Mice : Mice have great potential for helping to characterize the molecular mechanisms affecting IOP.
mouse :  Analysis of Myoc  Exons and the proximal promoter of the mouse Myoc gene were amplified from mouse genomic DNA using the following combinations of primers:  Exon 1: 5'-cttgcaggagaactttccagaa-3' and 5'-atctcgaaggagattgttatagg-3'  5'-gaccagctggagacccaaaccag-3' and 5'-gctcagatccactgacctaaa-3'  Exon 2: 5'-tgaagccatactttaccaaccat-3' and 5'-caaaagggagaagtctaacttc-3'
mouse :  Analysis of Myoc  Exons and the proximal promoter of the mouse Myoc gene were amplified from mouse genomic DNA using the following combinations of primers:  Exon 1: 5'-cttgcaggagaactttccagaa-3' and 5'-atctcgaaggagattgttatagg-3'  5'-gaccagctggagacccaaaccag-3' and 5'-gctcagatccactgacctaaa-3'  Exon 2: 5'-tgaagccatactttaccaaccat-3' and 5'-caaaagggagaagtctaacttc-3'
node_15
genetically distinct mouse strains : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
genetically distinct mouse strains : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
genetically distinct mouse strains : Significant differences exist among various strains (P < 0.0001 for all groups, ANOVA comparing strains within each sex group).  Figure 1  An almost two-fold range of IOP between genetically distinct mouse strains.
node_18
the effects of factors such as age : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
the effects of factors such as age : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
the effect of age : Although the effect of age has not been thoroughly assessed in other strains, no obvious age-related differences have been identified in other strains analyzed at multiple ages except for the glaucomatous DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty strains [14,19].  Effect of sex on IOP  Although we have not rigorously assessed the effect of sex on IOP in many strains, sex specific differences have not been detected in the majority of strains for which both sexes have been analyzed, and have proven inconsistent even within an individual strain analyzed multiple times.
the effect of age : To ensure that we were analyzing the effect of age and not diabetes, the B6 mice in the aging experiment were fed NIH31 (4% fat) chow.
node_20
age : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
age : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
Age : Age, time of day, obesity and diabetes have effects on mouse IOP similar to those in humans and other species.
age : Average IOP for age matched mice of the same strain assessed at different times typically differed by no more than 1.5 mmHg, and the differences were usually smaller.
age : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
age : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
age : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
age : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
age : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
age :  Effect of age on IOP  We focused on the commonly used B6, 129P3/J and C3H/HeJ strains to determine the effects of age on IOP (Figure 4).
age :  Effect of age on IOP  We focused on the commonly used B6, 129P3/J and C3H/HeJ strains to determine the effects of age on IOP (Figure 4).
age : In B6, age had a significant effect on IOP (P < 0.001).
age : Although the decrease was of a similar level to the variation observed in 3 month old mice (see Figure 3), the IOPs of control young mice (see Methods) analyzed at the same times as the various B6 age groups did not decrease.
age : For example, control mice analyzed at the same time as the 3 month, 12 month and 18 month B6 age groups had IOPs of 13.0 ± 0.2 mmHg (n = 14), 13.3 ± 0.2 mmHg (n = 14), 13.7 ± 0.4 mmHg (n = 12), respectively.
age : Despite a 1 mmHg dip in IOP at 8 months, there were no significant IOP differences between C3H/HeJ mice at each age tested (P = 0.2 for age).
age : Although the effect of age has not been thoroughly assessed in other strains, no obvious age-related differences have been identified in other strains analyzed at multiple ages except for the glaucomatous DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty strains [14,19].  Effect of sex on IOP  Although we have not rigorously assessed the effect of sex on IOP in many strains, sex specific differences have not been detected in the majority of strains for which both sexes have been analyzed, and have proven inconsistent even within an individual strain analyzed multiple times.
age : Strains B6 and 129P3/J have been extensively evaluated at multiple ages between 3 and 24 months of age.
age : If real, this sporadic sex difference was not dependent on age, sometimes occurring in a group of B6 mice at a particular age and sometimes not occurring in a separate group of the same age.
age : All strains consisted of males and females that ranged from 3 to 6 months of age.
ages : The sexes and ages were equally represented at each time point.
age : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
age : Similarly, the effects of various factors including age, gender, blood pressure, obesity and diabetes have been variably associated with elevated IOP.
Age :  Age  
age : Although within the range of variability observed in young mice, the IOP of B6 mice modestly decreased around 1 year of age.
age : At 2 years of age the IOP of B6 mice had decreased further, though an effect of anesthesia in these very old mice cannot be ruled out [49].
age : The IOP of 129P3/J mice also decreased with age but only at the oldest age examined (18 months).
age : Additional studies may also identify " normal" mouse strains that develop increased IOP with age as generally occurs in Western populations [52,53].
age : We previously demonstrated that the glaucomatous strains DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty develop elevated IOP with age [14,19].  Gender
age : However, some studies have found sex-specific differences (typically with higher IOP in females and the magnitude of the difference increasing after 40 years of age) [53,54].
age : Further studies are needed to determine if blood pressure correlates with IOP in males, and to determine the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in various mouse strains with age.
age : To ensure that we were analyzing the effect of age and not diabetes, the B6 mice in the aging experiment were fed NIH31 (4% fat) chow.
age : It was not possible to analyze all age groups of each strain at the same time in the aging experiments.
age : Therefore, to control for potential IOP changes due to measurement time and not age, approximately 3 month old B6 mice were assessed at the same time as each age group.
age : Therefore, to control for potential IOP changes due to measurement time and not age, approximately 3 month old B6 mice were assessed at the same time as each age group.
node_22
sex : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
sex : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
Gender : Gender does not typically affect IOP and aging results in an IOP decrease in some strains.
each sex group : Significant differences exist among various strains (P < 0.0001 for all groups, ANOVA comparing strains within each sex group).  Figure 1  An almost two-fold range of IOP between genetically distinct mouse strains.
The sex : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
sex : Although the effect of age has not been thoroughly assessed in other strains, no obvious age-related differences have been identified in other strains analyzed at multiple ages except for the glaucomatous DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty strains [14,19].  Effect of sex on IOP  Although we have not rigorously assessed the effect of sex on IOP in many strains, sex specific differences have not been detected in the majority of strains for which both sexes have been analyzed, and have proven inconsistent even within an individual strain analyzed multiple times.
sex : Although the effect of age has not been thoroughly assessed in other strains, no obvious age-related differences have been identified in other strains analyzed at multiple ages except for the glaucomatous DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty strains [14,19].  Effect of sex on IOP  Although we have not rigorously assessed the effect of sex on IOP in many strains, sex specific differences have not been detected in the majority of strains for which both sexes have been analyzed, and have proven inconsistent even within an individual strain analyzed multiple times.
both sexes : Although the effect of age has not been thoroughly assessed in other strains, no obvious age-related differences have been identified in other strains analyzed at multiple ages except for the glaucomatous DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty strains [14,19].  Effect of sex on IOP  Although we have not rigorously assessed the effect of sex on IOP in many strains, sex specific differences have not been detected in the majority of strains for which both sexes have been analyzed, and have proven inconsistent even within an individual strain analyzed multiple times.
The sexes : The sexes and ages were equally represented at each time point.
sex : Some epidemiological studies implicate factors such as diabetes, vascular hypertension, arterial hypotension, vasospasm, aberrant autoregulation of blood flow and sex in glaucoma.
gender : Similarly, the effects of various factors including age, gender, blood pressure, obesity and diabetes have been variably associated with elevated IOP.
Gender : We previously demonstrated that the glaucomatous strains DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty develop elevated IOP with age [14,19].  Gender
the sexes : This is in agreement with a number of human studies, which show that IOP is equal between the sexes [52,53].
node_25
day : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
day : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
the day : Most tested strains exhibit a diurnal rhythm with IOP being the highest during the dark period of the day.
day : Age, time of day, obesity and diabetes have effects on mouse IOP similar to those in humans and other species.
the day : In support of a later effect of anesthesia (since general anesthesia is reported to mask diurnal variation in IOP [21]), we identified increased IOP during the dark compared to the light period of the day in several tested strains (Figure 6).
the day : Mean IOP ± SEM is shown for the indicated strains at measurement during the light (open bars) or dark (filled bars) periods of the day.
the day : In contrast to pigmented B6 mice (Figure 6), the IOPs of the albino B6 mice were not increased at measurement during the dark compared to light period of the day (P = 0.6, Figure 10B).
the day : B. IOP is not increased during the dark period of the day in Tyrc-2J homozygotes.
the day : Fourteen mice of each genotype were successfully analyzed during the dark period of the day.
the day : IOP is increased during the dark period of the day  
day : We first suspected IOP changes with time of day when the IOP of a group of B6 mice measured in the hour prior to onset of the dark period appeared to be higher than at other times of day.
day : We first suspected IOP changes with time of day when the IOP of a group of B6 mice measured in the hour prior to onset of the dark period appeared to be higher than at other times of day.
day : Thus, we compared the IOPs of mice at different times of day and identified several strains with significantly higher IOP during the dark compared to the light period.
the day : Additionally, IOP differences between the light and dark period of the day were detected in the pigmented but not the albino B6 mice.
node_28
candidate : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
candidate : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
candidate : Mutations in two of the assessed candidate genes (Lepr and Tyr) result in increased IOP.
node_30
IOP : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
IOP : The purpose of this study was to determine the IOPs of genetically distinct mouse strains, assess the effects of factors such as age, sex and time of day on IOP in specific strain backgrounds, and to assess the effects of specific candidate gene mutations on IOP.
IOP : Based on over 30 studied mouse strains, average IOP ranges from approximately 10 to 20 mmHg.
IOP : Gender does not typically affect IOP and aging results in an IOP decrease in some strains.
IOP : Gender does not typically affect IOP and aging results in an IOP decrease in some strains.
IOP : Most tested strains exhibit a diurnal rhythm with IOP being the highest during the dark period of the day.
IOP : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
IOPs : Genetically distinct mouse strains housed in the same environment have a broad range of IOPs.
IOP : These IOP differences are likely due to interstrain genetic differences that create a powerful resource for studying the regulation of IOP.
IOP : These IOP differences are likely due to interstrain genetic differences that create a powerful resource for studying the regulation of IOP.
IOP : These studies demonstrate that mice are a practical and powerful experimental system to study the genetics of IOP regulation and disease processes that raise IOP to harmful levels.
IOP : These studies demonstrate that mice are a practical and powerful experimental system to study the genetics of IOP regulation and disease processes that raise IOP to harmful levels.
IOP : We have focused on developing the mouse system for IOP and glaucoma studies [13-19].
IOP : Mice are expected to be extremely helpful in characterizing genes and mechanisms that affect IOP or the susceptibility of the optic nerve and retina to glaucomatous damage [20].  
IOP : Very little is known about the magnitude of IOP of various mouse strains or IOP fluctuation in mice with time or other factors.
pressure : The procedure involves direct measurement of pressure following cannulation of the anterior chamber.
IOP : The initial experiments demonstrated that in our hands careful ocular cannulation has a very minor effect on IOP (average of -0.3 mmHg, mode -0.5 mmHg) and demonstrated significant differences in intraocular pressure levels between four mouse strains.
IOP : There is a wide range of IOP with strain BALB/cJ having one of the lowest average IOPs (11.1 ± 0.5 mmHg) and strain CBA/CaJ one of the highest IOPs (19.3 ± 0.3 mmHg).
IOP :  Clinical and histological analysis of the eyes of all studied strains (see Table 1) did not identify anatomic or pathologic features that might account for the differences in IOP.
IOP : We purposefully included strains at each end of the IOP spectrum, and strain C57BL/6J (B6) that is commonly used for genetic experiments (Figure 3).
IOP : Despite the general consistency of IOP, the average IOPs of some strains have changed in a reproducible manner.
IOP :  Effect of age on IOP  We focused on the commonly used B6, 129P3/J and C3H/HeJ strains to determine the effects of age on IOP (Figure 4).
IOP :  Effect of age on IOP  We focused on the commonly used B6, 129P3/J and C3H/HeJ strains to determine the effects of age on IOP (Figure 4).
IOP : In B6, age had a significant effect on IOP (P < 0.001).
IOP : IOP was slightly decreased at both 12 months (12.2 ± 0.2 mmHg) and 19 months (12.2 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to 3 months (13.1 ± 0.3 mmHg) and 7 months (13.3 ± 0.3 mmHg).
IOP : IOP was even lower in the 24 month B6 mice (10.8 ± 0.4 mmHg), and again the average IOP of young controls measured at the same time was not changed (13.5 ± 0.2, n = 12).  Figure 4  IOP changes with increasing Age.  
IOP : IOP was even lower in the 24 month B6 mice (10.8 ± 0.4 mmHg), and again the average IOP of young controls measured at the same time was not changed (13.5 ± 0.2, n = 12).  Figure 4  IOP changes with increasing Age.  
IOP : IOP decreased significantly in strains C57BL/6J and 129P3/J but not C3H/HeJ.
IOP : In strain 129P3/J, IOP did not differ significantly with age between 3 and 14 months but was lower in 18 month old mice (P < 0.001 compared to all younger ages, Figure 4).
IOP : Although the effect of age has not been thoroughly assessed in other strains, no obvious age-related differences have been identified in other strains analyzed at multiple ages except for the glaucomatous DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty strains [14,19].  Effect of sex on IOP  Although we have not rigorously assessed the effect of sex on IOP in many strains, sex specific differences have not been detected in the majority of strains for which both sexes have been analyzed, and have proven inconsistent even within an individual strain analyzed multiple times.
IOP : Initial experiments suggested that an almost identical dose (100 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine) of anesthesia had no effect on IOP during the experimental period with IOP being measured as soon as possible after the mouse was unconscious, typically minutes.
IOP : The greater the dose the greater the decrease in IOP.
IOP : At the 5 minute measurement, however, IOP was the same using all doses suggesting that the anesthetic effect on IOP had not yet occurred.
IOP : At the 5 minute measurement, however, IOP was the same using all doses suggesting that the anesthetic effect on IOP had not yet occurred.
IOP : To identify any early window when it may be possible to assess IOP without an obvious anesthetic effect, 195 mice of strain B6 were anesthetized with the 1X dose and IOP was measured at 1 minute time points between 4 and 12 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
IOP : To identify any early window when it may be possible to assess IOP without an obvious anesthetic effect, 195 mice of strain B6 were anesthetized with the 1X dose and IOP was measured at 1 minute time points between 4 and 12 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
IOP : The mean IOP of groups analyzed at each time point did not differ (P = 0.9) indicating that the IOP depressing effect of anesthesia occurs later than 12 minutes after administration.
IOP : In support of a later effect of anesthesia (since general anesthesia is reported to mask diurnal variation in IOP [21]), we identified increased IOP during the dark compared to the light period of the day in several tested strains (Figure 6).
IOP : In these experiments, IOP measurements were made between 5 and 12 minutes after administration of anesthesia.
IOP : Scatter-plots demonstrating no change in IOP over the 12 minutes following anesthetic administration in three relatively unrelated mouse strains.
IOP :  Figure 6  IOP is increased during the dark compared to light periods in several strains.
IOP : IOP was increased during the dark in all strains except CBA/CaJ.
IOP :  Blood pressure does not correlate with IOP
IOP :  An initial study of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in mice did not detect a good correlation (R2 = 0.1, Figure 7).  Figure 7  No correlation between blood pressure and IOP.
IOP : All mice were female and 2 to 4 months old, with the exception that the female CBA/CaJ used for IOP assessment were 6 to 7 months old.
IOP :  Myoc alleles do not associate with the magnitude of IOP  Mutations in the myocilin gene (MYOC) cause human glaucoma.
IOP : The presence or absence of this allele does not associate with IOP as it is present in strains with a range of IOPs (Figure 8).  Figure 8  Myoc alleles do not associate with IOP.
IOPs : The presence or absence of this allele does not associate with IOP as it is present in strains with a range of IOPs (Figure 8).  Figure 8  Myoc alleles do not associate with IOP.
IOP : The presence or absence of this allele does not associate with IOP as it is present in strains with a range of IOPs (Figure 8).  Figure 8  Myoc alleles do not associate with IOP.
IOP : The IOP data is the same as that in Figure 1.
IOP : Genetic alterations and IOP  Y Chromosome  The Y chromosome has been implicated in strain specific blood pressure differences in rats [23,24].
IOP : No differences in IOP were detected between these groups of mice (Figure 9, P = 0.1).  Figure 9  Effects of genetic alterations.
IOP : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
IOP : IOP was modestly but significantly elevated in obese, diabetic homozygous mutants (14.7 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to non-obese, non-diabetic heterozygotes (13.4 ± 0.4 mmHg, P < 0.01, Figure 9).  Tyr  To determine if albinism alters IOP, we analyzed B6 mice that were either pigmented or albino.
IOP : IOP was modestly but significantly elevated in obese, diabetic homozygous mutants (14.7 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to non-obese, non-diabetic heterozygotes (13.4 ± 0.4 mmHg, P < 0.01, Figure 9).  Tyr  To determine if albinism alters IOP, we analyzed B6 mice that were either pigmented or albino.
IOP : B. IOP is not increased during the dark period of the day in Tyrc-2J homozygotes.
IOP : IOP differences are reproducible and amenable to genetic analyses  
IOP : The magnitude of IOP differences between strains and the good reproducibility of readings over time will allow the use of genetic approaches to identify genes that underlie these differences.
IOP : Thus it is feasible to assess sufficient numbers of mice for quantitative trait locus (QTL) analysis methods and to use these methods to identify chromosomal regions contributing to strain differences in IOP.
IOP : These are important approaches as they may allow the association of genes with IOP and glaucoma whose currently known functions do not suggest that they affect aqueous humor dynamics or do not immediately identify them as likely glaucoma candidates.
IOP :  No effect of anesthetic protocol on IOP during a 12 minute measurement window  Many anesthetic agents including xylazine lower IOP.
IOP : Ketamine usually appears to increase IOP [31-33], but there are reports of ketamine having no effect on IOP or even reducing IOP [31,34].
IOP : Ketamine usually appears to increase IOP [31-33], but there are reports of ketamine having no effect on IOP or even reducing IOP [31,34].
IOP : Ketamine usually appears to increase IOP [31-33], but there are reports of ketamine having no effect on IOP or even reducing IOP [31,34].
IOP : An anesthetic effect could potentially alter IOP and mask genetically determined differences in IOP.
IOP : An anesthetic effect could potentially alter IOP and mask genetically determined differences in IOP.
IOP : Thus, to avoid effects of anesthesia on IOP, all measurements should be made within a window of up to 12 minutes after anesthetic administration.
IOP : IOP decreased significantly between a conscious measurement and the first possible measurement under anesthesia (defined as time 0).
IOP : IOP decreased further by the next reading (at 5 minutes) after which it remained stable for the duration of the experiment (20 minutes)[36].
it : IOP decreased further by the next reading (at 5 minutes) after which it remained stable for the duration of the experiment (20 minutes)[36].
IOP : Thus, although both rat and mouse studies show that anesthesia decreases IOP, the studies do not agree on the timing of the effect.
IOP : The IOP depression occurred very soon after anesthesia in the rats but was delayed in the mice.
IOP : In the examined strains, we found no consistent differences in IOP between males and females.
IOP : This is in agreement with a number of human studies, which show that IOP is equal between the sexes [52,53].
IOP : Some but not all human studies have reported a positive association between IOP and blood pressure [48,52].
IOP : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
IOP : IOP is increased during the dark period of the day  
IOP : Diurnal variation in IOP is common in humans and laboratory animals [53].
IOP : Small changes in the resistance to aqueous humor drainage may also contribute to diurnal differences in IOP [66,67].
IOP : We first suspected IOP changes with time of day when the IOP of a group of B6 mice measured in the hour prior to onset of the dark period appeared to be higher than at other times of day.
IOP : Previously, a rise of IOP was reported to occur before onset of the dark period in rats [21], and rats and rabbits were shown to have higher IOP during the dark period compared to the light period [21,68,69].
The IOP : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
IOP : Analysis of these mouse strains may increase understanding of the molecular mechanisms controlling diurnal rhythms of IOP and that may be relevant to glaucoma.
IOP :  Car2 deficiency does not alter IOP  Bicarbonate formation is important for aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes and carbonic anhydrase (CA) facilitates this secretion.
IOP : Our experiments show that a genetic deficiency of CAII in mice homozygous for a mutation in the Car2 gene does not alter IOP.
IOP : Additionally, IOP differences between the light and dark period of the day were detected in the pigmented but not the albino B6 mice.
IOP : Thus, albinism can affect the diurnal pattern of IOP changes.
IOP : Albinism by itself is either not sufficient to alter the diurnal rhythm of IOP or alters it in different ways depending upon genetic background, however, since the albino strains BALB/cByJ and SWR/J had increased IOP during the dark.
IOP : Exposing rats to 24 hours of low light abrogates the diurnal fluctuation of IOP and results in constantly elevated IOP [36].
IOP : Further experiments will determine the nature of the diurnal rhythm of IOP in the albino B6 mice and if its alteration or other mechanisms result in IOP elevation.
IOP : A broad range of reproducible IOP differences exists between inbred mouse strains and a diurnal rhythm of IOP exists in different strains.
IOP : A broad range of reproducible IOP differences exists between inbred mouse strains and a diurnal rhythm of IOP exists in different strains.
IOP : Genetically uniform, mice can be used to study the effects of these risk factors on IOP.
IOP : In trained hands, our measurement procedure is reliable, accurate and rapid enough to allow large scale genetic studies of factors determining IOP.
IOP : Mice have great potential for helping to characterize the molecular mechanisms affecting IOP.
Intraocular pressure : The colony was monitored for specific pathogens by The Jackson Laboratory's routine surveillance program (see  for specific pathogens).  Intraocular pressure  Intraocular pressures were measured as described elsewhere [13,77].
Intraocular pressures : The colony was monitored for specific pathogens by The Jackson Laboratory's routine surveillance program (see  for specific pathogens).  Intraocular pressure  Intraocular pressures were measured as described elsewhere [13,77].
IOP : Whenever possible, the investigator measuring IOP did not know the genotypes of the animals.
IOP : Therefore, to control for potential IOP changes due to measurement time and not age, approximately 3 month old B6 mice were assessed at the same time as each age group.
IOP : When adequate anesthesia was achieved (after 3 to 4 minutes), the mouse was placed on the measurement platform and the white light of the microscope was turned on (for approximately 1 and a half minutes) to allow ocular cannulation, IOP measurement and post-measurement tests [13] that guard against artifactual data.
the IOP : The white light was used at very low intensity and was dim but we cannot rule out the possibility that this brief exposure altered the IOP.
IOP : The mice were analyzed in the same procedure room as was used for IOP measurment.
IOP : However, the anterior chambers of C57BLKS/J mice were only evaluated under a dissection microscope at the time of IOP measurement.
Intraocular pressure : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
node_32
Results : Results  
Results : Results  
Results :  Results  
node_34
over 30 studied mouse strains : Based on over 30 studied mouse strains, average IOP ranges from approximately 10 to 20 mmHg.
over 30 studied mouse strains : Based on over 30 studied mouse strains, average IOP ranges from approximately 10 to 20 mmHg.
all studied strains :  Clinical and histological analysis of the eyes of all studied strains (see Table 1) did not identify anatomic or pathologic features that might account for the differences in IOP.
node_41
some strains : Gender does not typically affect IOP and aging results in an IOP decrease in some strains.
some strains : Gender does not typically affect IOP and aging results in an IOP decrease in some strains.
some strains : A low incidence of corneal scarring was noted in some strains and likely resulted from a scratched cornea.
some strains : Despite the general consistency of IOP, the average IOPs of some strains have changed in a reproducible manner.
node_44
the dark period of the day : Most tested strains exhibit a diurnal rhythm with IOP being the highest during the dark period of the day.
the dark period of the day : Most tested strains exhibit a diurnal rhythm with IOP being the highest during the dark period of the day.
the dark : In support of a later effect of anesthesia (since general anesthesia is reported to mask diurnal variation in IOP [21]), we identified increased IOP during the dark compared to the light period of the day in several tested strains (Figure 6).
the dark :  Figure 6  IOP is increased during the dark compared to light periods in several strains.
the dark : IOP was increased during the dark in all strains except CBA/CaJ.
the : The number of mice successfully analyzed during the light (L) or dark (D) periods follows, DBA/2J 10L,10D; C57BL/6J 32L, 22D; C57BR/cdJ 12L,10D; SWR/J 16L, 16D; BALB/cByJ 15L, 16D; 129B6 10L, 12D; CBA/CaJ 22L, 16D.
dark : In contrast to pigmented B6 mice (Figure 6), the IOPs of the albino B6 mice were not increased at measurement during the dark compared to light period of the day (P = 0.6, Figure 10B).
the dark period of the day : B. IOP is not increased during the dark period of the day in Tyrc-2J homozygotes.
the dark period of the day : Fourteen mice of each genotype were successfully analyzed during the dark period of the day.
the dark period of the day : IOP is increased during the dark period of the day  
the dark period : We first suspected IOP changes with time of day when the IOP of a group of B6 mice measured in the hour prior to onset of the dark period appeared to be higher than at other times of day.
the dark period : Previously, a rise of IOP was reported to occur before onset of the dark period in rats [21], and rats and rabbits were shown to have higher IOP during the dark period compared to the light period [21,68,69].
the dark period : Previously, a rise of IOP was reported to occur before onset of the dark period in rats [21], and rats and rabbits were shown to have higher IOP during the dark period compared to the light period [21,68,69].
the dark : Thus, we compared the IOPs of mice at different times of day and identified several strains with significantly higher IOP during the dark compared to the light period.
the : Additionally, IOP differences between the light and dark period of the day were detected in the pigmented but not the albino B6 mice.
node_47
Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
mice homozygous for a mutation in the Car2 gene : Our experiments show that a genetic deficiency of CAII in mice homozygous for a mutation in the Car2 gene does not alter IOP.
node_49
the carbonic anhydrase II gene : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
the carbonic anhydrase II gene : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
Car2n : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
node_55
leptin : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
leptin : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
leptin : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
leptin : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
node_57
Leprdb : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
Leprdb : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
a mutation in the leptin receptor gene : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
node_59
obesity : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
obesity : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
obesity : Age, time of day, obesity and diabetes have effects on mouse IOP similar to those in humans and other species.
obesity : However, 4 months old males homozygous for the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation (db) had significantly higher IOPs than their heterozygous age and sex matched littermates.
obesity : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
obesity : Similarly, the effects of various factors including age, gender, blood pressure, obesity and diabetes have been variably associated with elevated IOP.
Obesity :  Obesity and diabetes  Obesity or higher body mass index have been implicated by some but not other studies as risk factors for increased IOP and glaucoma [51,55-57].
Obesity :  Obesity and diabetes  Obesity or higher body mass index have been implicated by some but not other studies as risk factors for increased IOP and glaucoma [51,55-57].
obesity : Similarly, diabetes or the combination of diabetes and obesity have been variably associated with elevated IOP and glaucoma [46,52,58-62].
obesity : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
obesity : Thus, epidemiological associations between increased IOP and obesity or diabetes are supported by this work and appear to be functionally relevant.
node_61
obesity and diabetes : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
obesity and diabetes : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
obesity and diabetes : Age, time of day, obesity and diabetes have effects on mouse IOP similar to those in humans and other species.
obesity and diabetes : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
obesity and diabetes : Similarly, the effects of various factors including age, gender, blood pressure, obesity and diabetes have been variably associated with elevated IOP.
Obesity and diabetes :  Obesity and diabetes  Obesity or higher body mass index have been implicated by some but not other studies as risk factors for increased IOP and glaucoma [51,55-57].
diabetes and obesity : Similarly, diabetes or the combination of diabetes and obesity have been variably associated with elevated IOP and glaucoma [46,52,58-62].
obesity and diabetes : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
node_63
diabetes : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
diabetes : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
diabetes : Age, time of day, obesity and diabetes have effects on mouse IOP similar to those in humans and other species.
diabetes : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
diabetes : Similarly, the effects of various factors including age, gender, blood pressure, obesity and diabetes have been variably associated with elevated IOP.
diabetes :  Obesity and diabetes  Obesity or higher body mass index have been implicated by some but not other studies as risk factors for increased IOP and glaucoma [51,55-57].
diabetes : Similarly, diabetes or the combination of diabetes and obesity have been variably associated with elevated IOP and glaucoma [46,52,58-62].
diabetes : Similarly, diabetes or the combination of diabetes and obesity have been variably associated with elevated IOP and glaucoma [46,52,58-62].
diabetes : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
diabetes : Thus, epidemiological associations between increased IOP and obesity or diabetes are supported by this work and appear to be functionally relevant.
diabetes : To ensure that we were analyzing the effect of age and not diabetes, the B6 mice in the aging experiment were fed NIH31 (4% fat) chow.
node_65
increased IOP : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
increased IOP : Homozygosity for a null allele of the carbonic anhydrase II gene (Car2n) does not alter IOP while homozygosity for a mutation in the leptin receptor gene (Leprdb) that causes obesity and diabetes results in increased IOP.
increased IOP : Mutations in two of the assessed candidate genes (Lepr and Tyr) result in increased IOP.
increased IOP : Tyr mutation results in increased IOP and altered diurnal changes A.
increased IOP : Terpene administration or environmental exposure to terpenes in wood shavings alters drug resistance and decreases the effect of anesthetic agents in both rats and mice [40-45].  Risk factors for increased IOP  
increased IOP :  Obesity and diabetes  Obesity or higher body mass index have been implicated by some but not other studies as risk factors for increased IOP and glaucoma [51,55-57].
increased IOP : Thus, epidemiological associations between increased IOP and obesity or diabetes are supported by this work and appear to be functionally relevant.
increased IOP : In support of a role for both enzymes, a greater than 90% inhibition of CA is required for significant reduction of aqueous secretion [71,72].  Tyrosinase deficiency results in increased IOP  Tyrosinase is the first enzyme of the pigment production pathway.
node_67
Albino C57BL/6J mice homozygous for a tyrosinase mutation (Tyrc-2J : Albino C57BL/6J mice homozygous for a tyrosinase mutation (Tyrc-2J) have higher IOPs than their pigmented counterparts.
Albino C57BL/6J mice homozygous for a tyrosinase mutation (Tyrc-2J : Albino C57BL/6J mice homozygous for a tyrosinase mutation (Tyrc-2J) have higher IOPs than their pigmented counterparts.
their : Albino C57BL/6J mice homozygous for a tyrosinase mutation (Tyrc-2J) have higher IOPs than their pigmented counterparts.
node_69
C57BL/6J : Albino C57BL/6J mice homozygous for a tyrosinase mutation (Tyrc-2J) have higher IOPs than their pigmented counterparts.
C57BL/6J : Albino C57BL/6J mice homozygous for a tyrosinase mutation (Tyrc-2J) have higher IOPs than their pigmented counterparts.
strain C57BL/6J (B6) that is commonly used for genetic experiments : We purposefully included strains at each end of the IOP spectrum, and strain C57BL/6J (B6) that is commonly used for genetic experiments (Figure 3).
B6 : The average IOP of different cohorts of strains CBA/CaJ, CBA/CaHN (both high end of spectrum) and B6 were consistent over time.
C57BL/6J : The number of mice analyzed at each time follows: BALB/cJ 8, 10, 11, 15, 18 and 14, C57BL/6J 10, 14, 21,40,40 and 42.
strains B6 : Importantly, the IOPs of strains B6 and C3H/HeJ did not change during this time (B6, 12.3. ± 0.5 mmHg in 1996 and 12.4 ± 0.3 mmHg in 1997, n= 10 and 14; C3H/HeJ, 13.7 ± 0.8 mmHg in 1996 and 13.6 ± 0.2 mmHg in 1997, n = 9 and 19).
B6 : Importantly, the IOPs of strains B6 and C3H/HeJ did not change during this time (B6, 12.3. ± 0.5 mmHg in 1996 and 12.4 ± 0.3 mmHg in 1997, n= 10 and 14; C3H/HeJ, 13.7 ± 0.8 mmHg in 1996 and 13.6 ± 0.2 mmHg in 1997, n = 9 and 19).
the commonly used B6 :  Effect of age on IOP  We focused on the commonly used B6, 129P3/J and C3H/HeJ strains to determine the effects of age on IOP (Figure 4).
B6 : In B6, age had a significant effect on IOP (P < 0.001).
strains C57BL/6J : IOP decreased significantly in strains C57BL/6J and 129P3/J but not C3H/HeJ.
C57BL/6J : The C57BL/6J and 129P3/J groups consisted of approximately equal numbers of males and females.
Strains B6 : Strains B6 and 129P3/J have been extensively evaluated at multiple ages between 3 and 24 months of age.
strain B6 : Sex differences were always absent in strain 129P3/J and typically absent in strain B6.
strain B6 : To identify any early window when it may be possible to assess IOP without an obvious anesthetic effect, 195 mice of strain B6 were anesthetized with the 1X dose and IOP was measured at 1 minute time points between 4 and 12 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
C57BL/6J : A Mean IOP ± SD is shown for C57BL/6J mice at 5 and 25 minutes after administration of various doses of anesthetic.
C57BL/6J : 129B6 refers to mice of a mixed 129X1/SvJ and C57BL/6J background.
C57BL/6J : If the CBA/CaJ mice are excluded, R2 drops to 0.01 of ARK/J, C57BL/6J and SJL/J, strain ARK/J had the lowest IOP.
strain B6 : To test if the Y chromosome of strain 129/Ola alters IOP in relation to that of strain B6, we compared the IOPs of pure B6 males and consomic B6 males that had the 129P2/Ola Y chromosome (backcrossed for 11 generations).
C57BL/6J : There is no difference in IOP between 3 to 4 month old males with either the 129P2/Ola (n = 18) or C57BL/6J (n = 20) Y chromosome (Y Chr).
strain C57BL/6J : The 129 Y Chr had been backcrossed to strain C57BL/6J for 11 generations.
C57BL/6J : Different cohorts of C57BL/6J mice that are homozygous for the spontaneous Tyrc-2J mutation have higher IOP than their normal counterparts at all tested ages.
C57BL/6J : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
node_72
tyrosinase : Albino C57BL/6J mice homozygous for a tyrosinase mutation (Tyrc-2J) have higher IOPs than their pigmented counterparts.
tyrosinase : Albino C57BL/6J mice homozygous for a tyrosinase mutation (Tyrc-2J) have higher IOPs than their pigmented counterparts.
Tyr : Mutations in two of the assessed candidate genes (Lepr and Tyr) result in increased IOP.
Tyr : IOP was modestly but significantly elevated in obese, diabetic homozygous mutants (14.7 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to non-obese, non-diabetic heterozygotes (13.4 ± 0.4 mmHg, P < 0.01, Figure 9).  Tyr  To determine if albinism alters IOP, we analyzed B6 mice that were either pigmented or albino.
tyrosinase : The albino mice were homozygous and coisogenic for a mutant allele of tyrosinase (Tyrc-2J) that arose on the otherwise pigmented B6 background.
Tyr : Tyr mutation results in increased IOP and altered diurnal changes A.
Tyrosinase : In support of a role for both enzymes, a greater than 90% inhibition of CA is required for significant reduction of aqueous secretion [71,72].  Tyrosinase deficiency results in increased IOP  Tyrosinase is the first enzyme of the pigment production pathway.
Tyrosinase : In support of a role for both enzymes, a greater than 90% inhibition of CA is required for significant reduction of aqueous secretion [71,72].  Tyrosinase deficiency results in increased IOP  Tyrosinase is the first enzyme of the pigment production pathway.
Tyrosinase : Tyrosinase deficiency causes albinism and has various ocular consequences.
tyrosinase : Here, we show increased IOP in mice lacking tyrosinase activity compared to otherwise genetically identical pigmented B6 mice.
tyrosinase : In agreement with this result, mice with albino eyes that are homozygous for tyrosinase or pink eye dilution mutations have altered diurnal rhythms compared to pigmented mice [75].
node_74
Tyrc-2J : Albino C57BL/6J mice homozygous for a tyrosinase mutation (Tyrc-2J) have higher IOPs than their pigmented counterparts.
Tyrc-2J : Albino C57BL/6J mice homozygous for a tyrosinase mutation (Tyrc-2J) have higher IOPs than their pigmented counterparts.
Tyrc-2J : The albino mice were homozygous and coisogenic for a mutant allele of tyrosinase (Tyrc-2J) that arose on the otherwise pigmented B6 background.
Tyrc-2J : In 2 month old mice, homozygosity for Tyrc-2J resulted in increased IOP (14.2 ± 0.4 mmHg) compared to wild type, pigmented mice (12.4 ± 0.3 mmHg, P < 0.0001).
Tyrc-2J : Different cohorts of C57BL/6J mice that are homozygous for the spontaneous Tyrc-2J mutation have higher IOP than their normal counterparts at all tested ages.
Tyrc-2J : B. IOP is not increased during the dark period of the day in Tyrc-2J homozygotes.
node_75
Tyrc-2J : Albino C57BL/6J mice homozygous for a tyrosinase mutation (Tyrc-2J) have higher IOPs than their pigmented counterparts.
Tyrc-2J : Albino C57BL/6J mice homozygous for a tyrosinase mutation (Tyrc-2J) have higher IOPs than their pigmented counterparts.
a tyrosinase mutation : Albino C57BL/6J mice homozygous for a tyrosinase mutation (Tyrc-2J) have higher IOPs than their pigmented counterparts.
node_79
Conclusions : Conclusions  
Conclusions : Conclusions  
Conclusions : Conclusions  
node_81
Genetically distinct mouse strains housed in the same environment : Genetically distinct mouse strains housed in the same environment have a broad range of IOPs.
Genetically distinct mouse strains housed in the same environment : Genetically distinct mouse strains housed in the same environment have a broad range of IOPs.
inbred mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions : A broad range of IOPs between strains  Figure 1 shows the average IOP of a number of inbred mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
All strains shown in Figure 1 : All strains shown in Figure 1 were evaluated but only strains with abnormalities are shown.
strains with abnormalities : All strains shown in Figure 1 were evaluated but only strains with abnormalities are shown.
over 30 genetically different mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions : We report the IOPs of over 30 genetically different mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
node_84
a broad range of IOPs : Genetically distinct mouse strains housed in the same environment have a broad range of IOPs.
a broad range of IOPs : Genetically distinct mouse strains housed in the same environment have a broad range of IOPs.
These IOP differences : These IOP differences are likely due to interstrain genetic differences that create a powerful resource for studying the regulation of IOP.
node_90
the regulation of IOP : These IOP differences are likely due to interstrain genetic differences that create a powerful resource for studying the regulation of IOP.
the regulation of IOP : These IOP differences are likely due to interstrain genetic differences that create a powerful resource for studying the regulation of IOP.
IOP regulation : These studies demonstrate that mice are a practical and powerful experimental system to study the genetics of IOP regulation and disease processes that raise IOP to harmful levels.
node_101
humans : Age, time of day, obesity and diabetes have effects on mouse IOP similar to those in humans and other species.
humans : Age, time of day, obesity and diabetes have effects on mouse IOP similar to those in humans and other species.
humans : More than 20% of CBA/CaJ mice had IOPs of over 21 mmHg, which increases risk for glaucoma in humans.
humans : Diurnal variation in IOP is common in humans and laboratory animals [53].
humans : The molecular mechanisms underlying the diurnal rhythm are not defined but increased aqueous humor production or flow occurs during the period of increased IOP in both rabbits and humans [63-65].
humans : Various factors have been variably associated with risk for increased IOP in humans.
node_105
Lepr : Mutations in two of the assessed candidate genes (Lepr and Tyr) result in increased IOP.
Lepr : Mutations in two of the assessed candidate genes (Lepr and Tyr) result in increased IOP.
Lepr : Lepr  
node_107
Lepr and Tyr : Mutations in two of the assessed candidate genes (Lepr and Tyr) result in increased IOP.
Lepr and Tyr : Mutations in two of the assessed candidate genes (Lepr and Tyr) result in increased IOP.
two of the assessed candidate genes : Mutations in two of the assessed candidate genes (Lepr and Tyr) result in increased IOP.
node_114
disease : These studies demonstrate that mice are a practical and powerful experimental system to study the genetics of IOP regulation and disease processes that raise IOP to harmful levels.
disease : These studies demonstrate that mice are a practical and powerful experimental system to study the genetics of IOP regulation and disease processes that raise IOP to harmful levels.
disease : Due to conservation in mammalian physiology and the powerful tools of mouse genetics, mice are a very important experimental system for probing the functions (both in health and disease) of many genes recently identified by sequencing the human genome [12].
node_118
Glaucoma : Background  Glaucoma is a leading cause of blindness but its molecular etiology is poorly understood.
Glaucoma : Background  Glaucoma is a leading cause of blindness but its molecular etiology is poorly understood.
its : Background  Glaucoma is a leading cause of blindness but its molecular etiology is poorly understood.
Glaucoma : Glaucoma involves retinal ganglion cell death and optic nerve damage that is often associated with elevated intraocular pressure (IOP) [1-5].
glaucoma : It is becoming increasingly clear that many forms of glaucoma have a genetic component [6,7], and much current research is focused on identifying chromosomal regions and genes that contribute to glaucoma [8-10].
glaucoma : It is becoming increasingly clear that many forms of glaucoma have a genetic component [6,7], and much current research is focused on identifying chromosomal regions and genes that contribute to glaucoma [8-10].
glaucoma : Identifying such loci allows screening for individuals with an increased risk of developing glaucoma [11].
glaucoma : Identifying genes contributing to elevated IOP and glaucoma is only the first step, however, and animal models will provide systems for subsequent hypothesis testing and experimental dissection of pathogenesis.
glaucoma : We have focused on developing the mouse system for IOP and glaucoma studies [13-19].
glaucoma : We aged a small group of these mice (n = 4) to 2 years and histologically analyzed their optic nerves and retinas but they did not develop glaucoma.
glaucoma : These are important approaches as they may allow the association of genes with IOP and glaucoma whose currently known functions do not suggest that they affect aqueous humor dynamics or do not immediately identify them as likely glaucoma candidates.
glaucoma : These are important approaches as they may allow the association of genes with IOP and glaucoma whose currently known functions do not suggest that they affect aqueous humor dynamics or do not immediately identify them as likely glaucoma candidates.
glaucoma : Some epidemiological studies implicate factors such as diabetes, vascular hypertension, arterial hypotension, vasospasm, aberrant autoregulation of blood flow and sex in glaucoma.
glaucoma : Other studies find no association between these factors and glaucoma [2,46-48].
glaucoma :  Obesity and diabetes  Obesity or higher body mass index have been implicated by some but not other studies as risk factors for increased IOP and glaucoma [51,55-57].
glaucoma : Similarly, diabetes or the combination of diabetes and obesity have been variably associated with elevated IOP and glaucoma [46,52,58-62].
glaucoma : Analysis of these mouse strains may increase understanding of the molecular mechanisms controlling diurnal rhythms of IOP and that may be relevant to glaucoma.
node_122
intraocular pressure : Glaucoma involves retinal ganglion cell death and optic nerve damage that is often associated with elevated intraocular pressure (IOP) [1-5].
IOP : Glaucoma involves retinal ganglion cell death and optic nerve damage that is often associated with elevated intraocular pressure (IOP) [1-5].
intraocular pressure : Glaucoma involves retinal ganglion cell death and optic nerve damage that is often associated with elevated intraocular pressure (IOP) [1-5].
node_127
chromosomal regions : It is becoming increasingly clear that many forms of glaucoma have a genetic component [6,7], and much current research is focused on identifying chromosomal regions and genes that contribute to glaucoma [8-10].
chromosomal regions : It is becoming increasingly clear that many forms of glaucoma have a genetic component [6,7], and much current research is focused on identifying chromosomal regions and genes that contribute to glaucoma [8-10].
such loci : Identifying such loci allows screening for individuals with an increased risk of developing glaucoma [11].
node_129
genes : It is becoming increasingly clear that many forms of glaucoma have a genetic component [6,7], and much current research is focused on identifying chromosomal regions and genes that contribute to glaucoma [8-10].
genes : It is becoming increasingly clear that many forms of glaucoma have a genetic component [6,7], and much current research is focused on identifying chromosomal regions and genes that contribute to glaucoma [8-10].
genes : Identifying genes contributing to elevated IOP and glaucoma is only the first step, however, and animal models will provide systems for subsequent hypothesis testing and experimental dissection of pathogenesis.
node_135
elevated IOP : Identifying genes contributing to elevated IOP and glaucoma is only the first step, however, and animal models will provide systems for subsequent hypothesis testing and experimental dissection of pathogenesis.
elevated IOP : Identifying genes contributing to elevated IOP and glaucoma is only the first step, however, and animal models will provide systems for subsequent hypothesis testing and experimental dissection of pathogenesis.
elevated IOP : Similarly, the effects of various factors including age, gender, blood pressure, obesity and diabetes have been variably associated with elevated IOP.
elevated IOP : We previously demonstrated that the glaucomatous strains DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty develop elevated IOP with age [14,19].  Gender
elevated IOP : Of possible relevance, we previously reported that female mice of strains DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty develop elevated IOP at an earlier age than males [14,19].
elevated IOP : Similarly, diabetes or the combination of diabetes and obesity have been variably associated with elevated IOP and glaucoma [46,52,58-62].
node_141
We : We have focused on developing the mouse system for IOP and glaucoma studies [13-19].
We : We have focused on developing the mouse system for IOP and glaucoma studies [13-19].
we : Previously, we developed a method to measure IOP in mice and reported initial findings on the magnitude of mouse IOP [13].
our : The initial experiments demonstrated that in our hands careful ocular cannulation has a very minor effect on IOP (average of -0.3 mmHg, mode -0.5 mmHg) and demonstrated significant differences in intraocular pressure levels between four mouse strains.
we : Here, we provide an update, including an extensive strain survey, and show that the methodology is reliable and produces reproducible data over extended periods of time.
We : We aged a small group of these mice (n = 4) to 2 years and histologically analyzed their optic nerves and retinas but they did not develop glaucoma.
We : We have observed similar quantities of these cells at this location in other strains with lower IOP.
we : To assess the consistency of IOP in specific strains, we measured IOP in different cohorts of each strain maintained under similar conditions at different times.
We : We purposefully included strains at each end of the IOP spectrum, and strain C57BL/6J (B6) that is commonly used for genetic experiments (Figure 3).
our : During this period, the room in which our animals were housed and the manufacturer of the mouse diet were changed.
we : Although the effect of age has not been thoroughly assessed in other strains, no obvious age-related differences have been identified in other strains analyzed at multiple ages except for the glaucomatous DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty strains [14,19].  Effect of sex on IOP  Although we have not rigorously assessed the effect of sex on IOP in many strains, sex specific differences have not been detected in the majority of strains for which both sexes have been analyzed, and have proven inconsistent even within an individual strain analyzed multiple times.
we : To further assess the effects of anesthesia, we measured IOP in groups of genetically identical B6 mice subjected to different doses (1X, 1.5X and 2X) at 5 and 25 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
we : In support of a later effect of anesthesia (since general anesthesia is reported to mask diurnal variation in IOP [21]), we identified increased IOP during the dark compared to the light period of the day in several tested strains (Figure 6).
we : To determine if allelic variation in the mouse Myoc gene associated with IOP in mouse strains, we analyzed the gene in an assortment of strains with different IOPs.
we : To test if the Y chromosome of strain 129/Ola alters IOP in relation to that of strain B6, we compared the IOPs of pure B6 males and consomic B6 males that had the 129P2/Ola Y chromosome (backcrossed for 11 generations).
we : Car2  To test if deficiency of carbonic anhydrase II leads to decreased IOP, we analyzed mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with normal or mutant alleles of the Car2 gene [25,26].
we : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
We : We report the IOPs of over 30 genetically different mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
our : Using our method, a trained investigator can measure the IOPs of 10 mice in an hour.
we : The strain survey we report provides valuable information for designing these experiments.
we : The relationship between the IOPs we measure and those in conscious mice depends upon the effect of our anesthetic protocol (intraperitoneal injection of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine).
our : The relationship between the IOPs we measure and those in conscious mice depends upon the effect of our anesthetic protocol (intraperitoneal injection of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine).
we : Here, we show that, despite a depressant effect on IOP by 25 minutes, our anesthetic protocol has no detectable effect on IOP during the first 12 minutes after administration.
our : Here, we show that, despite a depressant effect on IOP by 25 minutes, our anesthetic protocol has no detectable effect on IOP during the first 12 minutes after administration.
Our : Our results agree with the time course of cardiovascular depression caused by intraperitoneal administration of ketamine and xylazine in rats.
our : The time 0 measurement in that study was at a very similar state of anesthesia as our 4 and 5 minute time points (starting as soon as possible and within 20 to 60 seconds of adequate anesthesia), and the 5 minute rat time point was similar to our 9 and 10 minute measurement times.
our : The time 0 measurement in that study was at a very similar state of anesthesia as our 4 and 5 minute time points (starting as soon as possible and within 20 to 60 seconds of adequate anesthesia), and the 5 minute rat time point was similar to our 9 and 10 minute measurement times.
we : In mice, the strain does not appear to be important as no early effect of anesthesia was present in the three distantly related laboratory strains [37] we studied in detail, and we have not observed any obvious effect during this period in any analyzed strain.
we : In mice, the strain does not appear to be important as no early effect of anesthesia was present in the three distantly related laboratory strains [37] we studied in detail, and we have not observed any obvious effect during this period in any analyzed strain.
We : We use wood shavings for bedding and wood shavings expose the mice to terpenes.
We : We evaluated the relationship between these latter factors and IOP in genetically homogeneous mouse strains in a controlled environment.
We : We previously demonstrated that the glaucomatous strains DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty develop elevated IOP with age [14,19].  Gender
we : In the examined strains, we found no consistent differences in IOP between males and females.
we : Of possible relevance, we previously reported that female mice of strains DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty develop elevated IOP at an earlier age than males [14,19].
Our : Our comparison of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in young, adult female mice of different mouse strains, whose blood pressures differed up to 36 mmHg, did not reveal a positive correlation.
we : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
We : We first suspected IOP changes with time of day when the IOP of a group of B6 mice measured in the hour prior to onset of the dark period appeared to be higher than at other times of day.
we : Thus, we compared the IOPs of mice at different times of day and identified several strains with significantly higher IOP during the dark compared to the light period.
Our : Our experiments show that a genetic deficiency of CAII in mice homozygous for a mutation in the Car2 gene does not alter IOP.
our : CAIV activity was recently demonstrated in the ciliary processes [73] and so our data may support a more substantial role for CAIV compared to CAII in aqueous humor secretion.
we : Here, we show increased IOP in mice lacking tyrosinase activity compared to otherwise genetically identical pigmented B6 mice.
our : In trained hands, our measurement procedure is reliable, accurate and rapid enough to allow large scale genetic studies of factors determining IOP.
we : To ensure that we were analyzing the effect of age and not diabetes, the B6 mice in the aging experiment were fed NIH31 (4% fat) chow.
We : We have found no differences in IOP between B6 mice housed on the 4% fat and 6% fat versions of this otherwise identical diet.
we : The white light was used at very low intensity and was dim but we cannot rule out the possibility that this brief exposure altered the IOP.
we : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
We : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
We : We also thank Jane Barker for the Car2 mice, Marianna Mertts for her help with analysis of Myoc alleles, and members of the John laboratory, Tatyana Golovkina, Edward Leiter and Timothy O'Brien for critical reading of the manuscript.
node_152
the optic nerve : Mice are expected to be extremely helpful in characterizing genes and mechanisms that affect IOP or the susceptibility of the optic nerve and retina to glaucomatous damage [20].  
the optic nerve : Mice are expected to be extremely helpful in characterizing genes and mechanisms that affect IOP or the susceptibility of the optic nerve and retina to glaucomatous damage [20].  
optic nerve : Saggital sections including the pupil and optic nerve were collected and analyzed as they contain most ocular structures.
node_155
various mouse strains : Very little is known about the magnitude of IOP of various mouse strains or IOP fluctuation in mice with time or other factors.
various mouse strains : Very little is known about the magnitude of IOP of various mouse strains or IOP fluctuation in mice with time or other factors.
various strains : Significant differences exist among various strains (P < 0.0001 for all groups, ANOVA comparing strains within each sex group).  Figure 1  An almost two-fold range of IOP between genetically distinct mouse strains.
various strains : Table 1  Ocular abnormalities in various strains  
various mouse strains : Further studies are needed to determine if blood pressure correlates with IOP in males, and to determine the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in various mouse strains with age.
node_160
time : Very little is known about the magnitude of IOP of various mouse strains or IOP fluctuation in mice with time or other factors.
time : Very little is known about the magnitude of IOP of various mouse strains or IOP fluctuation in mice with time or other factors.
time : Here, we provide an update, including an extensive strain survey, and show that the methodology is reliable and produces reproducible data over extended periods of time.
time : The average IOP of different cohorts of strains CBA/CaJ, CBA/CaHN (both high end of spectrum) and B6 were consistent over time.
time : The IOPs of different strains are stable and reproducible over time.
time : For all doses, IOP decreased by 25 minutes (P = 0.005 for time).
time : Approximately thirty 3 to 4 month old mice were analyzed at each dose and time B-D.
time : The magnitude of IOP differences between strains and the good reproducibility of readings over time will allow the use of genetic approaches to identify genes that underlie these differences.
time : Our results agree with the time course of cardiovascular depression caused by intraperitoneal administration of ketamine and xylazine in rats.
time : As demonstrated here, the IOPs of C57BL/6J are very consistent over time and so these animals were interspersed with experimental mice during all experiments to ensure that calibration had not drifted and that the system was functioning optimally.
node_163
a method to measure IOP in mice : Previously, we developed a method to measure IOP in mice and reported initial findings on the magnitude of mouse IOP [13].
a method to measure IOP in mice : Previously, we developed a method to measure IOP in mice and reported initial findings on the magnitude of mouse IOP [13].
the methodology : Here, we provide an update, including an extensive strain survey, and show that the methodology is reliable and produces reproducible data over extended periods of time.
node_170
the anterior chamber : The procedure involves direct measurement of pressure following cannulation of the anterior chamber.
the anterior chamber : The procedure involves direct measurement of pressure following cannulation of the anterior chamber.
the anterior chamber : For example, the iridocorneal angle and aqueous humor drainage structures are open to the anterior chamber and have normal morphology in both BALB/cJ and CBA/CaJ mice (Figure 2).
anterior chambers :  Clinical examinations  For most strains, anterior chambers were examined with a slit lamp biomicroscope [16].
node_182
Figure : A broad range of IOPs between strains  Figure 1 shows the average IOP of a number of inbred mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
Figure : A broad range of IOPs between strains  Figure 1 shows the average IOP of a number of inbred mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
Figure : Significant differences exist among various strains (P < 0.0001 for all groups, ANOVA comparing strains within each sex group).  Figure 1  An almost two-fold range of IOP between genetically distinct mouse strains.
Figure : For example, the iridocorneal angle and aqueous humor drainage structures are open to the anterior chamber and have normal morphology in both BALB/cJ and CBA/CaJ mice (Figure 2).
Figure : Figure 2  
Figure : All strains shown in Figure 1 were evaluated but only strains with abnormalities are shown.
Figure : We purposefully included strains at each end of the IOP spectrum, and strain C57BL/6J (B6) that is commonly used for genetic experiments (Figure 3).
Figure : Figure 3  
Figure : Between early 1996 and 1997, however, the IOP of this strain did jump from approximately 7.7 mmHg to approximately 11 mmHg (Figure 3).
Figure :  Effect of age on IOP  We focused on the commonly used B6, 129P3/J and C3H/HeJ strains to determine the effects of age on IOP (Figure 4).
Figure : Although the decrease was of a similar level to the variation observed in 3 month old mice (see Figure 3), the IOPs of control young mice (see Methods) analyzed at the same times as the various B6 age groups did not decrease.
Figure : IOP was even lower in the 24 month B6 mice (10.8 ± 0.4 mmHg), and again the average IOP of young controls measured at the same time was not changed (13.5 ± 0.2, n = 12).  Figure 4  IOP changes with increasing Age.  
Figure : In strain 129P3/J, IOP did not differ significantly with age between 3 and 14 months but was lower in 18 month old mice (P < 0.001 compared to all younger ages, Figure 4).
Figure : To further assess the effects of anesthesia, we measured IOP in groups of genetically identical B6 mice subjected to different doses (1X, 1.5X and 2X) at 5 and 25 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
Figure : To identify any early window when it may be possible to assess IOP without an obvious anesthetic effect, 195 mice of strain B6 were anesthetized with the 1X dose and IOP was measured at 1 minute time points between 4 and 12 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
Figure : In support of a later effect of anesthesia (since general anesthesia is reported to mask diurnal variation in IOP [21]), we identified increased IOP during the dark compared to the light period of the day in several tested strains (Figure 6).
Figure :  Figure 5  No effect of 1X anesthetic dose within 12 minutes of administration.
Figure :  Figure 6  IOP is increased during the dark compared to light periods in several strains.
Figure :  An initial study of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in mice did not detect a good correlation (R2 = 0.1, Figure 7).  Figure 7  No correlation between blood pressure and IOP.
Figure :  An initial study of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in mice did not detect a good correlation (R2 = 0.1, Figure 7).  Figure 7  No correlation between blood pressure and IOP.
Figure : The presence or absence of this allele does not associate with IOP as it is present in strains with a range of IOPs (Figure 8).  Figure 8  Myoc alleles do not associate with IOP.
Figure : The presence or absence of this allele does not associate with IOP as it is present in strains with a range of IOPs (Figure 8).  Figure 8  Myoc alleles do not associate with IOP.
Figure : The IOP data is the same as that in Figure 1.
Figure : No differences in IOP were detected between these groups of mice (Figure 9, P = 0.1).  Figure 9  Effects of genetic alterations.
Figure : No differences in IOP were detected between these groups of mice (Figure 9, P = 0.1).  Figure 9  Effects of genetic alterations.
Figure : There was no difference in IOP between normal and mutant mice (Figure 9, P = 0.5).
Figure : IOP was modestly but significantly elevated in obese, diabetic homozygous mutants (14.7 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to non-obese, non-diabetic heterozygotes (13.4 ± 0.4 mmHg, P < 0.01, Figure 9).  Tyr  To determine if albinism alters IOP, we analyzed B6 mice that were either pigmented or albino.
Figure : The same was true for independent cohorts of mice of different ages that were analyzed at different times (Figure 10A).
Figure : In contrast to pigmented B6 mice (Figure 6), the IOPs of the albino B6 mice were not increased at measurement during the dark compared to light period of the day (P = 0.6, Figure 10B).
Figure : In contrast to pigmented B6 mice (Figure 6), the IOPs of the albino B6 mice were not increased at measurement during the dark compared to light period of the day (P = 0.6, Figure 10B).
Figure : Figure 10  
figure : At least 8 mice of each strain shown in figure 1 were evaluated.
figures : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
node_184
Figure 1 : A broad range of IOPs between strains  Figure 1 shows the average IOP of a number of inbred mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
Figure 1 : A broad range of IOPs between strains  Figure 1 shows the average IOP of a number of inbred mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
Figure 1 : Significant differences exist among various strains (P < 0.0001 for all groups, ANOVA comparing strains within each sex group).  Figure 1  An almost two-fold range of IOP between genetically distinct mouse strains.
Figure 1 : All strains shown in Figure 1 were evaluated but only strains with abnormalities are shown.
Figure 1 : The IOP data is the same as that in Figure 1.
figure 1 : At least 8 mice of each strain shown in figure 1 were evaluated.
node_186
a number of inbred mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions : A broad range of IOPs between strains  Figure 1 shows the average IOP of a number of inbred mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
a number of inbred mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions : A broad range of IOPs between strains  Figure 1 shows the average IOP of a number of inbred mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
At least 8 mice of each strain shown in figure 1 : At least 8 mice of each strain shown in figure 1 were evaluated.
node_190
the same environmental conditions : A broad range of IOPs between strains  Figure 1 shows the average IOP of a number of inbred mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
the same environmental conditions : A broad range of IOPs between strains  Figure 1 shows the average IOP of a number of inbred mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
the same environmental conditions : We report the IOPs of over 30 genetically different mouse strains that were housed in the same environmental conditions.
node_195
strain BALB/cJ : There is a wide range of IOP with strain BALB/cJ having one of the lowest average IOPs (11.1 ± 0.5 mmHg) and strain CBA/CaJ one of the highest IOPs (19.3 ± 0.3 mmHg).
strain BALB/cJ : There is a wide range of IOP with strain BALB/cJ having one of the lowest average IOPs (11.1 ± 0.5 mmHg) and strain CBA/CaJ one of the highest IOPs (19.3 ± 0.3 mmHg).
BALB/cJ : For example, the iridocorneal angle and aqueous humor drainage structures are open to the anterior chamber and have normal morphology in both BALB/cJ and CBA/CaJ mice (Figure 2).
BALB/cJ : For example, the iridocorneal angle and aqueous humor drainage structures are open to the anterior chamber and have normal morphology in both BALB/cJ and CBA/CaJ mice (Figure 2).
strains : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
BALB/cJ : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
BALB/cJ : For BALB/cJ and C57BL/6J, all groups were male and primarily 3 to 4 months old.
BALB/cJ : The number of mice analyzed at each time follows: BALB/cJ 8, 10, 11, 15, 18 and 14, C57BL/6J 10, 14, 21,40,40 and 42.
BALB/cJ : The IOPs of BALB/cJ mice (low end of spectrum) were very similar for the past several years, around 11 mmHg.
this strain : Between early 1996 and 1997, however, the IOP of this strain did jump from approximately 7.7 mmHg to approximately 11 mmHg (Figure 3).
BALB/cJ : The eyes of CBA/CaJ and BALB/cJ mice were also fixed and processed for plastic embedding (Historesin, Leica, Heidelberg, Germany), and sectioned as previously reported [14,79].
BALB/cJ mice : The eyes of CBA/CaJ and BALB/cJ mice were also fixed and processed for plastic embedding (Historesin, Leica, Heidelberg, Germany), and sectioned as previously reported [14,79].
node_198
strain CBA/CaJ : There is a wide range of IOP with strain BALB/cJ having one of the lowest average IOPs (11.1 ± 0.5 mmHg) and strain CBA/CaJ one of the highest IOPs (19.3 ± 0.3 mmHg).
strain CBA/CaJ : There is a wide range of IOP with strain BALB/cJ having one of the lowest average IOPs (11.1 ± 0.5 mmHg) and strain CBA/CaJ one of the highest IOPs (19.3 ± 0.3 mmHg).
CBA/CaJ : For example, the iridocorneal angle and aqueous humor drainage structures are open to the anterior chamber and have normal morphology in both BALB/cJ and CBA/CaJ mice (Figure 2).
CBA/CaJ : More than 20% of CBA/CaJ mice had IOPs of over 21 mmHg, which increases risk for glaucoma in humans.
strains CBA/CaJ : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
CBA/CaJ : Pigment filled macrophages that resemble human clump cells were often located in the angle of CBA/CaJ mice but were never sufficient to block drainage.
strains CBA/CaJ : The average IOP of different cohorts of strains CBA/CaJ, CBA/CaHN (both high end of spectrum) and B6 were consistent over time.
CBA/CaJ : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
CBA/CaJ : IOP was increased during the dark in all strains except CBA/CaJ.
CBA/CaJ : If the CBA/CaJ mice are excluded, R2 drops to 0.01 of ARK/J, C57BL/6J and SJL/J, strain ARK/J had the lowest IOP.
strain CBA/CaJ : Interestingly, the IOP of strain CBA/CaJ, which has one of the highest daytime IOPs does not appear to increase in the dark.
strain CBA/CaJ : Further more detailed studies are needed to define the characteristics of the diurnal rhythm of intraocular pressure in mice, and to determine whether it is lacking or has a different timing in strain CBA/CaJ.
node_207
Mean IOP ± SEM : Mean IOP ± SEM is shown for each strain.
Mean IOP ± SEM : Mean IOP ± SEM is shown for each strain.
Mean IOP ± SEM : Mean IOP ± SEM is shown for the indicated strain at different times of measurement.
Mean IOP ± SEM : Mean IOP ± SEM is shown for the indicated strain at different ages.
Mean IOP ± SEM : Mean IOP ± SEM is shown for the indicated strains at measurement during the light (open bars) or dark (filled bars) periods of the day.
node_209
each strain : Mean IOP ± SEM is shown for each strain.
each strain : Mean IOP ± SEM is shown for each strain.
each strain : Twelve to 25 mice were analyzed for each strain (typically 18 to 20), except for RIIIS/J (7 mice).
each strain : It was not possible to analyze all age groups of each strain at the same time in the aging experiments.
each strain :  Blood pressure  The blood pressures of conscious mice of each strain (6 to 12 females per strain) were measured with a tail-cuff system as reported [78], except that 5 days of training were used.
each strain : At least 8 mice of each strain shown in figure 1 were evaluated.
node_216
SEC/1ReJ : Mice of most strains were 6 to 12 months old, except for SEC/1ReJ and SB/Le that were 2 to 3 months old.
SEC/1ReJ : Mice of most strains were 6 to 12 months old, except for SEC/1ReJ and SB/Le that were 2 to 3 months old.
strains : Histological analysis confirmed these observations and also identified calcified cyst like structures in the iris epithelium of strains SB/Le and SEC/1ReJ.
node_218
SB/Le : Mice of most strains were 6 to 12 months old, except for SEC/1ReJ and SB/Le that were 2 to 3 months old.
SB/Le : Mice of most strains were 6 to 12 months old, except for SEC/1ReJ and SB/Le that were 2 to 3 months old.
strains SB/Le : Histological analysis confirmed these observations and also identified calcified cyst like structures in the iris epithelium of strains SB/Le and SEC/1ReJ.
strains SB/Le : Previously described retinal degeneration [[81]] caused by homozygosity for the Pde6brd1mutation was noted in strains SB/Le, ST/bJ, BUB/BnJ, CBA/J, C3H/HeJ, SJL/J and SWR/J.
node_221
3 months old : Mice of most strains were 6 to 12 months old, except for SEC/1ReJ and SB/Le that were 2 to 3 months old.
3 months old : Mice of most strains were 6 to 12 months old, except for SEC/1ReJ and SB/Le that were 2 to 3 months old.
3 : For BALB/cJ and C57BL/6J, all groups were male and primarily 3 to 4 months old.
3 months : IOP was slightly decreased at both 12 months (12.2 ± 0.2 mmHg) and 19 months (12.2 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to 3 months (13.1 ± 0.3 mmHg) and 7 months (13.3 ± 0.3 mmHg).
3 : In strain 129P3/J, IOP did not differ significantly with age between 3 and 14 months but was lower in 18 month old mice (P < 0.001 compared to all younger ages, Figure 4).
3 : Strains B6 and 129P3/J have been extensively evaluated at multiple ages between 3 and 24 months of age.
node_224
BUB/BnJ : Approximately half of the CE/J and one third of the BUB/BnJ mice were 16 months old and were pooled with the younger mice, as the IOPs of both ages were the same.
BUB/BnJ : Approximately half of the CE/J and one third of the BUB/BnJ mice were 16 months old and were pooled with the younger mice, as the IOPs of both ages were the same.
strains : Previously described retinal degeneration [[81]] caused by homozygosity for the Pde6brd1mutation was noted in strains SB/Le, ST/bJ, BUB/BnJ, CBA/J, C3H/HeJ, SJL/J and SWR/J.
node_227
CBA/CaHN : Strain name CBA/CaHN-Btkxid/J is abbreviated to CBA/CaHN.
CBA/CaHN : Strain name CBA/CaHN-Btkxid/J is abbreviated to CBA/CaHN.
CBA/CaHN : The average IOP of different cohorts of strains CBA/CaJ, CBA/CaHN (both high end of spectrum) and B6 were consistent over time.
CBA/CaHN : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
CBA/CaHN : Strain name CBA/CaHN-Btkxid/J is abbreviated to CBA/CaHN.
CBA/CaHN : All strains other than CBA/CaHN and C57BLKS/J strains were evaluated.
node_230
Table 1 :  Clinical and histological analysis of the eyes of all studied strains (see Table 1) did not identify anatomic or pathologic features that might account for the differences in IOP.
Table 1 :  Clinical and histological analysis of the eyes of all studied strains (see Table 1) did not identify anatomic or pathologic features that might account for the differences in IOP.
Table 1 : Table 1  Ocular abnormalities in various strains  
node_233
aqueous humor : For example, the iridocorneal angle and aqueous humor drainage structures are open to the anterior chamber and have normal morphology in both BALB/cJ and CBA/CaJ mice (Figure 2).
aqueous humor : For example, the iridocorneal angle and aqueous humor drainage structures are open to the anterior chamber and have normal morphology in both BALB/cJ and CBA/CaJ mice (Figure 2).
aqueous humor : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
Aqueous humor : Aqueous humor passes through this recess before entering the drainage structures.
aqueous humor : These are important approaches as they may allow the association of genes with IOP and glaucoma whose currently known functions do not suggest that they affect aqueous humor dynamics or do not immediately identify them as likely glaucoma candidates.
aqueous humor : The molecular mechanisms underlying the diurnal rhythm are not defined but increased aqueous humor production or flow occurs during the period of increased IOP in both rabbits and humans [63-65].
aqueous humor : Small changes in the resistance to aqueous humor drainage may also contribute to diurnal differences in IOP [66,67].
aqueous humor :  Car2 deficiency does not alter IOP  Bicarbonate formation is important for aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes and carbonic anhydrase (CA) facilitates this secretion.
aqueous humor : CAIV activity was recently demonstrated in the ciliary processes [73] and so our data may support a more substantial role for CAIV compared to CAII in aqueous humor secretion.
aqueous humor : It also is possible that CAII substantially contributes to aqueous humor secretion but that functional mouse CAIV is sufficient to prevent an effect of CAII deficiency on IOP in Car2 mutant mice.
node_235
aqueous humor drainage structures : For example, the iridocorneal angle and aqueous humor drainage structures are open to the anterior chamber and have normal morphology in both BALB/cJ and CBA/CaJ mice (Figure 2).
aqueous humor drainage structures : For example, the iridocorneal angle and aqueous humor drainage structures are open to the anterior chamber and have normal morphology in both BALB/cJ and CBA/CaJ mice (Figure 2).
the aqueous humor drainage structures : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
the drainage structures : Aqueous humor passes through this recess before entering the drainage structures.
node_241
CBA/CaJ mice : For example, the iridocorneal angle and aqueous humor drainage structures are open to the anterior chamber and have normal morphology in both BALB/cJ and CBA/CaJ mice (Figure 2).
CBA/CaJ mice : For example, the iridocorneal angle and aqueous humor drainage structures are open to the anterior chamber and have normal morphology in both BALB/cJ and CBA/CaJ mice (Figure 2).
CBA/CaJ mice : More than 20% of CBA/CaJ mice had IOPs of over 21 mmHg, which increases risk for glaucoma in humans.
these mice : We aged a small group of these mice (n = 4) to 2 years and histologically analyzed their optic nerves and retinas but they did not develop glaucoma.
CBA/CaJ mice : Pigment filled macrophages that resemble human clump cells were often located in the angle of CBA/CaJ mice but were never sufficient to block drainage.
CBA/CaJ : All mice were 2 to 4 months old except for CBA/CaJ that were 5 to 6 months old.
CBA/CaJ : The number of mice successfully analyzed during the light (L) or dark (D) periods follows, DBA/2J 10L,10D; C57BL/6J 32L, 22D; C57BR/cdJ 12L,10D; SWR/J 16L, 16D; BALB/cByJ 15L, 16D; 129B6 10L, 12D; CBA/CaJ 22L, 16D.
the female CBA/CaJ used for IOP assessment : All mice were female and 2 to 4 months old, with the exception that the female CBA/CaJ used for IOP assessment were 6 to 7 months old.
the CBA/CaJ mice : If the CBA/CaJ mice are excluded, R2 drops to 0.01 of ARK/J, C57BL/6J and SJL/J, strain ARK/J had the lowest IOP.
CBA/CaJ : The eyes of CBA/CaJ and BALB/cJ mice were also fixed and processed for plastic embedding (Historesin, Leica, Heidelberg, Germany), and sectioned as previously reported [14,79].
node_244
Figure 2 : For example, the iridocorneal angle and aqueous humor drainage structures are open to the anterior chamber and have normal morphology in both BALB/cJ and CBA/CaJ mice (Figure 2).
Figure 2 : For example, the iridocorneal angle and aqueous humor drainage structures are open to the anterior chamber and have normal morphology in both BALB/cJ and CBA/CaJ mice (Figure 2).
Figure 2 : Figure 2  
node_248
glaucoma in humans : More than 20% of CBA/CaJ mice had IOPs of over 21 mmHg, which increases risk for glaucoma in humans.
glaucoma in humans : More than 20% of CBA/CaJ mice had IOPs of over 21 mmHg, which increases risk for glaucoma in humans.
human glaucoma :  Myoc alleles do not associate with the magnitude of IOP  Mutations in the myocilin gene (MYOC) cause human glaucoma.
node_252
a small group of these mice : We aged a small group of these mice (n = 4) to 2 years and histologically analyzed their optic nerves and retinas but they did not develop glaucoma.
a small group of these mice : We aged a small group of these mice (n = 4) to 2 years and histologically analyzed their optic nerves and retinas but they did not develop glaucoma.
their : We aged a small group of these mice (n = 4) to 2 years and histologically analyzed their optic nerves and retinas but they did not develop glaucoma.
they : We aged a small group of these mice (n = 4) to 2 years and histologically analyzed their optic nerves and retinas but they did not develop glaucoma.
node_260
high : Normal iridocorneal angles in strains with high and low IOP.
high : Normal iridocorneal angles in strains with high and low IOP.
high IOP : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
node_262
low IOP : Normal iridocorneal angles in strains with high and low IOP.
low IOP : Normal iridocorneal angles in strains with high and low IOP.
low IOP : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
node_266
Schlemm's canal : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
Schlemm's canal : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
SC : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
node_268
Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
the aqueous humor drainage structures : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
node_271
trabecular meshwork : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
trabecular meshwork : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
TM : The iridocorneal angle that contains the aqueous humor drainage structures (Schlemm's canal (SC) and trabecular meshwork (TM) had a normal morphology in strains CBA/CaJ (A, high IOP), BALB/cJ (B, low IOP) and all other strains.
node_280
Pigment : Pigment filled macrophages that resemble human clump cells were often located in the angle of CBA/CaJ mice but were never sufficient to block drainage.
Pigment : Pigment filled macrophages that resemble human clump cells were often located in the angle of CBA/CaJ mice but were never sufficient to block drainage.
pigment : In support of a role for both enzymes, a greater than 90% inhibition of CA is required for significant reduction of aqueous secretion [71,72].  Tyrosinase deficiency results in increased IOP  Tyrosinase is the first enzyme of the pigment production pathway.
node_282
Pigment filled macrophages : Pigment filled macrophages that resemble human clump cells were often located in the angle of CBA/CaJ mice but were never sufficient to block drainage.
Pigment filled macrophages : Pigment filled macrophages that resemble human clump cells were often located in the angle of CBA/CaJ mice but were never sufficient to block drainage.
these cells : We have observed similar quantities of these cells at this location in other strains with lower IOP.
node_288
The angle recess between the cornea (C) and iris root (I : The angle recess between the cornea (C) and iris root (I) was open and not occluded.
The angle recess between the cornea (C) and iris root (I : The angle recess between the cornea (C) and iris root (I) was open and not occluded.
The angle recess between the cornea (C) and iris root (I) : The angle recess between the cornea (C) and iris root (I) was open and not occluded.
this recess : Aqueous humor passes through this recess before entering the drainage structures.
node_291
cornea : The angle recess between the cornea (C) and iris root (I) was open and not occluded.
cornea : The angle recess between the cornea (C) and iris root (I) was open and not occluded.
C : The angle recess between the cornea (C) and iris root (I) was open and not occluded.
node_294
iris : The angle recess between the cornea (C) and iris root (I) was open and not occluded.
iris : The angle recess between the cornea (C) and iris root (I) was open and not occluded.
iris : Histological analysis confirmed these observations and also identified calcified cyst like structures in the iris epithelium of strains SB/Le and SEC/1ReJ.
the iris : These include alteration of the number of ipsilaterally projecting retinal axons and substantially increased light penetration past the iris [74].
node_296
iris root : The angle recess between the cornea (C) and iris root (I) was open and not occluded.
iris root : The angle recess between the cornea (C) and iris root (I) was open and not occluded.
I : The angle recess between the cornea (C) and iris root (I) was open and not occluded.
node_308
the number of mice : For incidence, the numerator indicates the number of mice or eyes affected and the denominator indicates the total number analyzed.
the number of mice : For incidence, the numerator indicates the number of mice or eyes affected and the denominator indicates the total number analyzed.
The mice : The mice were 6 to 12 months old at the time of analysis and were not studied at other ages unless indicated.
node_313
Histological analysis : Histological analysis confirmed these observations and also identified calcified cyst like structures in the iris epithelium of strains SB/Le and SEC/1ReJ.
Histological analysis : Histological analysis confirmed these observations and also identified calcified cyst like structures in the iris epithelium of strains SB/Le and SEC/1ReJ.
Histological analysis :  Histological analysis
node_320
the Pde6brd1mutation : Previously described retinal degeneration [[81]] caused by homozygosity for the Pde6brd1mutation was noted in strains SB/Le, ST/bJ, BUB/BnJ, CBA/J, C3H/HeJ, SJL/J and SWR/J.
the Pde6brd1mutation : Previously described retinal degeneration [[81]] caused by homozygosity for the Pde6brd1mutation was noted in strains SB/Le, ST/bJ, BUB/BnJ, CBA/J, C3H/HeJ, SJL/J and SWR/J.
the Pde6brd1 mutation : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
node_326
strains : Previously described retinal degeneration [[81]] caused by homozygosity for the Pde6brd1mutation was noted in strains SB/Le, ST/bJ, BUB/BnJ, CBA/J, C3H/HeJ, SJL/J and SWR/J.
strains : Previously described retinal degeneration [[81]] caused by homozygosity for the Pde6brd1mutation was noted in strains SB/Le, ST/bJ, BUB/BnJ, CBA/J, C3H/HeJ, SJL/J and SWR/J.
strains : Importantly, the IOPs of strains B6 and C3H/HeJ did not change during this time (B6, 12.3. ± 0.5 mmHg in 1996 and 12.4 ± 0.3 mmHg in 1997, n= 10 and 14; C3H/HeJ, 13.7 ± 0.8 mmHg in 1996 and 13.6 ± 0.2 mmHg in 1997, n = 9 and 19).
C3H/HeJ : Importantly, the IOPs of strains B6 and C3H/HeJ did not change during this time (B6, 12.3. ± 0.5 mmHg in 1996 and 12.4 ± 0.3 mmHg in 1997, n= 10 and 14; C3H/HeJ, 13.7 ± 0.8 mmHg in 1996 and 13.6 ± 0.2 mmHg in 1997, n = 9 and 19).
the commonly used :  Effect of age on IOP  We focused on the commonly used B6, 129P3/J and C3H/HeJ strains to determine the effects of age on IOP (Figure 4).
strains : IOP decreased significantly in strains C57BL/6J and 129P3/J but not C3H/HeJ.
C3H/HeJ : The 3 months old C3H/HeJ mice were male while the other ages were composed of males and females.
C3H/HeJ : Despite a 1 mmHg dip in IOP at 8 months, there were no significant IOP differences between C3H/HeJ mice at each age tested (P = 0.2 for age).
node_330
SWR/J : Previously described retinal degeneration [[81]] caused by homozygosity for the Pde6brd1mutation was noted in strains SB/Le, ST/bJ, BUB/BnJ, CBA/J, C3H/HeJ, SJL/J and SWR/J.
SWR/J : Previously described retinal degeneration [[81]] caused by homozygosity for the Pde6brd1mutation was noted in strains SB/Le, ST/bJ, BUB/BnJ, CBA/J, C3H/HeJ, SJL/J and SWR/J.
SWR/J : The magnitude of the difference varies with strain, and was greatest in SWR/J.
SWR/J : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
the albino strains : Albinism by itself is either not sufficient to alter the diurnal rhythm of IOP or alters it in different ways depending upon genetic background, however, since the albino strains BALB/cByJ and SWR/J had increased IOP during the dark.
node_333
Strain differences : Strain differences are reproducible  
Strain differences : Strain differences are reproducible  
the differences : Average IOP for age matched mice of the same strain assessed at different times typically differed by no more than 1.5 mmHg, and the differences were usually smaller.
node_339
strain C57BL/6J : We purposefully included strains at each end of the IOP spectrum, and strain C57BL/6J (B6) that is commonly used for genetic experiments (Figure 3).
strain C57BL/6J : We purposefully included strains at each end of the IOP spectrum, and strain C57BL/6J (B6) that is commonly used for genetic experiments (Figure 3).
B6 : We purposefully included strains at each end of the IOP spectrum, and strain C57BL/6J (B6) that is commonly used for genetic experiments (Figure 3).
node_344
Figure 3 : We purposefully included strains at each end of the IOP spectrum, and strain C57BL/6J (B6) that is commonly used for genetic experiments (Figure 3).
Figure 3 : We purposefully included strains at each end of the IOP spectrum, and strain C57BL/6J (B6) that is commonly used for genetic experiments (Figure 3).
Figure 3 : Figure 3  
Figure 3 : Between early 1996 and 1997, however, the IOP of this strain did jump from approximately 7.7 mmHg to approximately 11 mmHg (Figure 3).
Figure 3 : Although the decrease was of a similar level to the variation observed in 3 month old mice (see Figure 3), the IOPs of control young mice (see Methods) analyzed at the same times as the various B6 age groups did not decrease.
node_347
strains CBA/CaJ : The average IOP of different cohorts of strains CBA/CaJ, CBA/CaHN (both high end of spectrum) and B6 were consistent over time.
strains CBA/CaJ : The average IOP of different cohorts of strains CBA/CaJ, CBA/CaHN (both high end of spectrum) and B6 were consistent over time.
high end of spectrum : The average IOP of different cohorts of strains CBA/CaJ, CBA/CaHN (both high end of spectrum) and B6 were consistent over time.
node_349
CBA/CaHN : The average IOP of different cohorts of strains CBA/CaJ, CBA/CaHN (both high end of spectrum) and B6 were consistent over time.
CBA/CaHN : The average IOP of different cohorts of strains CBA/CaJ, CBA/CaHN (both high end of spectrum) and B6 were consistent over time.
high end of spectrum : The average IOP of different cohorts of strains CBA/CaJ, CBA/CaHN (both high end of spectrum) and B6 were consistent over time.
node_357
Strain 129P3/J : Strain 129P3/J was the most variable strain with the average IOP fluctuating by up to 2.5 mmHg.
Strain 129P3/J : Strain 129P3/J was the most variable strain with the average IOP fluctuating by up to 2.5 mmHg.
the commonly used :  Effect of age on IOP  We focused on the commonly used B6, 129P3/J and C3H/HeJ strains to determine the effects of age on IOP (Figure 4).
strains : IOP decreased significantly in strains C57BL/6J and 129P3/J but not C3H/HeJ.
129P3/J : The C57BL/6J and 129P3/J groups consisted of approximately equal numbers of males and females.
strain 129P3/J : In strain 129P3/J, IOP did not differ significantly with age between 3 and 14 months but was lower in 18 month old mice (P < 0.001 compared to all younger ages, Figure 4).
Strains : Strains B6 and 129P3/J have been extensively evaluated at multiple ages between 3 and 24 months of age.
strain 129P3/J : Sex differences were always absent in strain 129P3/J and typically absent in strain B6.
129P3/J : The IOP of 129P3/J mice also decreased with age but only at the oldest age examined (18 months).
node_361
different strains : The IOPs of different strains are stable and reproducible over time.
different strains : The IOPs of different strains are stable and reproducible over time.
different strains : A broad range of reproducible IOP differences exists between inbred mouse strains and a diurnal rhythm of IOP exists in different strains.
different strains : Although it was not possible to include all strains in each measurement period, mice of different strains were intermixed.
node_365
measurement : Mean IOP ± SEM is shown for the indicated strain at different times of measurement.
measurement : Mean IOP ± SEM is shown for the indicated strain at different times of measurement.
measurement : The measurement times within a single year were separated by a few months.
measurement :  No effect of anesthetic protocol on IOP during a 12 minute measurement window  Many anesthetic agents including xylazine lower IOP.
measurement : The time 0 measurement in that study was at a very similar state of anesthesia as our 4 and 5 minute time points (starting as soon as possible and within 20 to 60 seconds of adequate anesthesia), and the 5 minute rat time point was similar to our 9 and 10 minute measurement times.
measurement : In trained hands, our measurement procedure is reliable, accurate and rapid enough to allow large scale genetic studies of factors determining IOP.
measurement : The mice were typically acclimatized to the procedure room for at least 2 weeks prior to measurement, but sometimes between 1 and 2 weeks.
measurement : Although it was not possible to include all strains in each measurement period, mice of different strains were intermixed.
measurement : Therefore, to control for potential IOP changes due to measurement time and not age, approximately 3 month old B6 mice were assessed at the same time as each age group.
measurement : When adequate anesthesia was achieved (after 3 to 4 minutes), the mouse was placed on the measurement platform and the white light of the microscope was turned on (for approximately 1 and a half minutes) to allow ocular cannulation, IOP measurement and post-measurement tests [13] that guard against artifactual data.
measurement : When adequate anesthesia was achieved (after 3 to 4 minutes), the mouse was placed on the measurement platform and the white light of the microscope was turned on (for approximately 1 and a half minutes) to allow ocular cannulation, IOP measurement and post-measurement tests [13] that guard against artifactual data.
node_368
The IOPs of strains that were analyzed multiple times in the same year : The IOPs of strains that were analyzed multiple times in the same year are listed in the chronological order that they were obtained with the earliest measurement on left.
The IOPs of strains that were analyzed multiple times in the same year : The IOPs of strains that were analyzed multiple times in the same year are listed in the chronological order that they were obtained with the earliest measurement on left.
they : The IOPs of strains that were analyzed multiple times in the same year are listed in the chronological order that they were obtained with the earliest measurement on left.
node_372
Male : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
Male : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
M : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
node_375
Female : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
Female : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
F : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
node_379
months : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
months : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
month : For example, control mice analyzed at the same time as the 3 month, 12 month and 18 month B6 age groups had IOPs of 13.0 ± 0.2 mmHg (n = 14), 13.3 ± 0.2 mmHg (n = 14), 13.7 ± 0.4 mmHg (n = 12), respectively.
month : For example, control mice analyzed at the same time as the 3 month, 12 month and 18 month B6 age groups had IOPs of 13.0 ± 0.2 mmHg (n = 14), 13.3 ± 0.2 mmHg (n = 14), 13.7 ± 0.4 mmHg (n = 12), respectively.
month : For example, control mice analyzed at the same time as the 3 month, 12 month and 18 month B6 age groups had IOPs of 13.0 ± 0.2 mmHg (n = 14), 13.3 ± 0.2 mmHg (n = 14), 13.7 ± 0.4 mmHg (n = 12), respectively.
month : IOP was even lower in the 24 month B6 mice (10.8 ± 0.4 mmHg), and again the average IOP of young controls measured at the same time was not changed (13.5 ± 0.2, n = 12).  Figure 4  IOP changes with increasing Age.  
node_381
number of mice : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
n : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
number of mice : The sex [Male (M) or Female (F)], age (months), and number of mice (n) analyzed for the CBA strains are listed starting with the earliest measurement and ending with the latest: CBA/CaJ, F, n = 22, age 6–7; M, n = 11, age 2; CBA/CaHN, F, n = 16, age 3; M, n = 8, age 3.
node_396
C57BL/6J : For BALB/cJ and C57BL/6J, all groups were male and primarily 3 to 4 months old.
C57BL/6J : For BALB/cJ and C57BL/6J, all groups were male and primarily 3 to 4 months old.
The C57BL/6J : The C57BL/6J and 129P3/J groups consisted of approximately equal numbers of males and females.
C57BL/6J : The number of mice analyzed at each age, listed from youngest to oldest, follow: C57BL/6J, 18, 18, 18, 18, 13; 129P3/J, 18, 15, 16, 14, 21; C3H/HeJ, 15, 23 17 and 16.
C57BL/6J mice : A Mean IOP ± SD is shown for C57BL/6J mice at 5 and 25 minutes after administration of various doses of anesthetic.
C57BL/6J : The number of mice successfully analyzed during the light (L) or dark (D) periods follows, DBA/2J 10L,10D; C57BL/6J 32L, 22D; C57BR/cdJ 12L,10D; SWR/J 16L, 16D; BALB/cByJ 15L, 16D; 129B6 10L, 12D; CBA/CaJ 22L, 16D.
B6 mice : Although within the range of variability observed in young mice, the IOP of B6 mice modestly decreased around 1 year of age.
B6 mice : At 2 years of age the IOP of B6 mice had decreased further, though an effect of anesthesia in these very old mice cannot be ruled out [49].
B6 mice : Further studies of B6 mice may allow experimental investigation of this effect.
B6 mice : B6 mice develop diet induced diabetes when maintained on a high fat diet [76].
B6 mice housed on the : We have found no differences in IOP between B6 mice housed on the 4% fat and 6% fat versions of this otherwise identical diet.
C57BL/6J : As demonstrated here, the IOPs of C57BL/6J are very consistent over time and so these animals were interspersed with experimental mice during all experiments to ensure that calibration had not drifted and that the system was functioning optimally.
these animals : As demonstrated here, the IOPs of C57BL/6J are very consistent over time and so these animals were interspersed with experimental mice during all experiments to ensure that calibration had not drifted and that the system was functioning optimally.
node_400
4 months old : For BALB/cJ and C57BL/6J, all groups were male and primarily 3 to 4 months old.
4 months old : For BALB/cJ and C57BL/6J, all groups were male and primarily 3 to 4 months old.
4 months old : All mice were 2 to 4 months old except for CBA/CaJ that were 5 to 6 months old.
4 months old : All mice were female and 2 to 4 months old, with the exception that the female CBA/CaJ used for IOP assessment were 6 to 7 months old.
this age : Blood sugar levels in db /db males of this age are almost always in the diabetic range whereas those of heterozygotes are not [[27]].
4 months of age : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
node_408
The IOPs of BALB/cJ mice : The IOPs of BALB/cJ mice (low end of spectrum) were very similar for the past several years, around 11 mmHg.
The IOPs of BALB/cJ mice : The IOPs of BALB/cJ mice (low end of spectrum) were very similar for the past several years, around 11 mmHg.
the IOP of this strain : Between early 1996 and 1997, however, the IOP of this strain did jump from approximately 7.7 mmHg to approximately 11 mmHg (Figure 3).
node_411
1997 : Between early 1996 and 1997, however, the IOP of this strain did jump from approximately 7.7 mmHg to approximately 11 mmHg (Figure 3).
1997 : Between early 1996 and 1997, however, the IOP of this strain did jump from approximately 7.7 mmHg to approximately 11 mmHg (Figure 3).
1997 : Over the same period, the IOP of A/J also increased dramatically, from 9.4 ± 0.5 mmHg (n = 11) in 1996 to 14.2 ± 0.4 mmHg (n = 19) in 1997.
1997 : Importantly, the IOPs of strains B6 and C3H/HeJ did not change during this time (B6, 12.3. ± 0.5 mmHg in 1996 and 12.4 ± 0.3 mmHg in 1997, n= 10 and 14; C3H/HeJ, 13.7 ± 0.8 mmHg in 1996 and 13.6 ± 0.2 mmHg in 1997, n = 9 and 19).
node_417
this period : During this period, the room in which our animals were housed and the manufacturer of the mouse diet were changed.
this period : During this period, the room in which our animals were housed and the manufacturer of the mouse diet were changed.
the same period : Over the same period, the IOP of A/J also increased dramatically, from 9.4 ± 0.5 mmHg (n = 11) in 1996 to 14.2 ± 0.4 mmHg (n = 19) in 1997.
node_423
A/J : Over the same period, the IOP of A/J also increased dramatically, from 9.4 ± 0.5 mmHg (n = 11) in 1996 to 14.2 ± 0.4 mmHg (n = 19) in 1997.
A/J : Over the same period, the IOP of A/J also increased dramatically, from 9.4 ± 0.5 mmHg (n = 11) in 1996 to 14.2 ± 0.4 mmHg (n = 19) in 1997.
A/J : The increased IOP in A/J also was reproducible, with the average IOP of mice assessed in the year 2000 being 14.5 ± 0.4 mmHg (n = 16).
node_427
the year 2000 : The increased IOP in A/J also was reproducible, with the average IOP of mice assessed in the year 2000 being 14.5 ± 0.4 mmHg (n = 16).
the year 2000 : The increased IOP in A/J also was reproducible, with the average IOP of mice assessed in the year 2000 being 14.5 ± 0.4 mmHg (n = 16).
this time : Importantly, the IOPs of strains B6 and C3H/HeJ did not change during this time (B6, 12.3. ± 0.5 mmHg in 1996 and 12.4 ± 0.3 mmHg in 1997, n= 10 and 14; C3H/HeJ, 13.7 ± 0.8 mmHg in 1996 and 13.6 ± 0.2 mmHg in 1997, n = 9 and 19).
node_439
Effect of age on IOP :  Effect of age on IOP  We focused on the commonly used B6, 129P3/J and C3H/HeJ strains to determine the effects of age on IOP (Figure 4).
Effect of age on IOP :  Effect of age on IOP  We focused on the commonly used B6, 129P3/J and C3H/HeJ strains to determine the effects of age on IOP (Figure 4).
the effects of age on IOP :  Effect of age on IOP  We focused on the commonly used B6, 129P3/J and C3H/HeJ strains to determine the effects of age on IOP (Figure 4).
node_451
Figure 4 :  Effect of age on IOP  We focused on the commonly used B6, 129P3/J and C3H/HeJ strains to determine the effects of age on IOP (Figure 4).
Figure 4 :  Effect of age on IOP  We focused on the commonly used B6, 129P3/J and C3H/HeJ strains to determine the effects of age on IOP (Figure 4).
Figure 4 : IOP was even lower in the 24 month B6 mice (10.8 ± 0.4 mmHg), and again the average IOP of young controls measured at the same time was not changed (13.5 ± 0.2, n = 12).  Figure 4  IOP changes with increasing Age.  
Figure 4 : In strain 129P3/J, IOP did not differ significantly with age between 3 and 14 months but was lower in 18 month old mice (P < 0.001 compared to all younger ages, Figure 4).
node_458
0.3 mmHg : IOP was slightly decreased at both 12 months (12.2 ± 0.2 mmHg) and 19 months (12.2 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to 3 months (13.1 ± 0.3 mmHg) and 7 months (13.3 ± 0.3 mmHg).
0.3 mmHg : IOP was slightly decreased at both 12 months (12.2 ± 0.2 mmHg) and 19 months (12.2 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to 3 months (13.1 ± 0.3 mmHg) and 7 months (13.3 ± 0.3 mmHg).
0.3 mmHg : IOP was slightly decreased at both 12 months (12.2 ± 0.2 mmHg) and 19 months (12.2 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to 3 months (13.1 ± 0.3 mmHg) and 7 months (13.3 ± 0.3 mmHg).
0.3 mmHg : IOP was slightly decreased at both 12 months (12.2 ± 0.2 mmHg) and 19 months (12.2 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to 3 months (13.1 ± 0.3 mmHg) and 7 months (13.3 ± 0.3 mmHg).
node_463
3 month old mice : Although the decrease was of a similar level to the variation observed in 3 month old mice (see Figure 3), the IOPs of control young mice (see Methods) analyzed at the same times as the various B6 age groups did not decrease.
3 month old mice : Although the decrease was of a similar level to the variation observed in 3 month old mice (see Figure 3), the IOPs of control young mice (see Methods) analyzed at the same times as the various B6 age groups did not decrease.
3 month : For example, control mice analyzed at the same time as the 3 month, 12 month and 18 month B6 age groups had IOPs of 13.0 ± 0.2 mmHg (n = 14), 13.3 ± 0.2 mmHg (n = 14), 13.7 ± 0.4 mmHg (n = 12), respectively.
3 month old B6 mice : Therefore, to control for potential IOP changes due to measurement time and not age, approximately 3 month old B6 mice were assessed at the same time as each age group.
node_467
control young mice : Although the decrease was of a similar level to the variation observed in 3 month old mice (see Figure 3), the IOPs of control young mice (see Methods) analyzed at the same times as the various B6 age groups did not decrease.
control young mice : Although the decrease was of a similar level to the variation observed in 3 month old mice (see Figure 3), the IOPs of control young mice (see Methods) analyzed at the same times as the various B6 age groups did not decrease.
young controls : IOP was even lower in the 24 month B6 mice (10.8 ± 0.4 mmHg), and again the average IOP of young controls measured at the same time was not changed (13.5 ± 0.2, n = 12).  Figure 4  IOP changes with increasing Age.  
node_469
Methods : Although the decrease was of a similar level to the variation observed in 3 month old mice (see Figure 3), the IOPs of control young mice (see Methods) analyzed at the same times as the various B6 age groups did not decrease.
Methods : Although the decrease was of a similar level to the variation observed in 3 month old mice (see Figure 3), the IOPs of control young mice (see Methods) analyzed at the same times as the various B6 age groups did not decrease.
Methods : Materials and Methods
node_471
the same times as the various B6 age groups : Although the decrease was of a similar level to the variation observed in 3 month old mice (see Figure 3), the IOPs of control young mice (see Methods) analyzed at the same times as the various B6 age groups did not decrease.
the same times as the various B6 age groups : Although the decrease was of a similar level to the variation observed in 3 month old mice (see Figure 3), the IOPs of control young mice (see Methods) analyzed at the same times as the various B6 age groups did not decrease.
the same time as the : For example, control mice analyzed at the same time as the 3 month, 12 month and 18 month B6 age groups had IOPs of 13.0 ± 0.2 mmHg (n = 14), 13.3 ± 0.2 mmHg (n = 14), 13.7 ± 0.4 mmHg (n = 12), respectively.
the same time : IOP was even lower in the 24 month B6 mice (10.8 ± 0.4 mmHg), and again the average IOP of young controls measured at the same time was not changed (13.5 ± 0.2, n = 12).  Figure 4  IOP changes with increasing Age.  
node_500
males : The C57BL/6J and 129P3/J groups consisted of approximately equal numbers of males and females.
males : The C57BL/6J and 129P3/J groups consisted of approximately equal numbers of males and females.
males : The 3 months old C3H/HeJ mice were male while the other ages were composed of males and females.
males : In strain B6, however, males infrequently had significantly higher IOP than females.
males : All strains consisted of males and females that ranged from 3 to 6 months of age.
males : In the examined strains, we found no consistent differences in IOP between males and females.
males : Of possible relevance, we previously reported that female mice of strains DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty develop elevated IOP at an earlier age than males [14,19].
males : Further studies are needed to determine if blood pressure correlates with IOP in males, and to determine the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in various mouse strains with age.
node_502
males and females : The C57BL/6J and 129P3/J groups consisted of approximately equal numbers of males and females.
males and females : The C57BL/6J and 129P3/J groups consisted of approximately equal numbers of males and females.
males and females : The 3 months old C3H/HeJ mice were male while the other ages were composed of males and females.
males and females : In the examined strains, we found no consistent differences in IOP between males and females.
node_504
females : The C57BL/6J and 129P3/J groups consisted of approximately equal numbers of males and females.
females : The C57BL/6J and 129P3/J groups consisted of approximately equal numbers of males and females.
females : The 3 months old C3H/HeJ mice were male while the other ages were composed of males and females.
females : In strain B6, however, males infrequently had significantly higher IOP than females.
females : For example, in one experiment, B6 males had an average IOP of 14.2 ± 0.3 mmHg (n = 12) whereas the average IOP of females was 13.1 ± 0.3 mmHg (n = 12, P = 0.01).
females : All strains consisted of males and females that ranged from 3 to 6 months of age.
females : In the examined strains, we found no consistent differences in IOP between males and females.
females : However, some studies have found sex-specific differences (typically with higher IOP in females and the magnitude of the difference increasing after 40 years of age) [53,54].
node_512
129P3/J : The number of mice analyzed at each age, listed from youngest to oldest, follow: C57BL/6J, 18, 18, 18, 18, 13; 129P3/J, 18, 15, 16, 14, 21; C3H/HeJ, 15, 23 17 and 16.
129P3/J : The number of mice analyzed at each age, listed from youngest to oldest, follow: C57BL/6J, 18, 18, 18, 18, 13; 129P3/J, 18, 15, 16, 14, 21; C3H/HeJ, 15, 23 17 and 16.
129P3/J : Similar results were obtained using 161 strain 129P3/J and 145 strain DBA/2J mice with the 1X dose (129P3/J, P = 0.1; DBA/2J, P = 0.2).
129P3/J mice : The IOP of 129P3/J mice also decreased with age but only at the oldest age examined (18 months).
node_514
C3H/HeJ : The number of mice analyzed at each age, listed from youngest to oldest, follow: C57BL/6J, 18, 18, 18, 18, 13; 129P3/J, 18, 15, 16, 14, 21; C3H/HeJ, 15, 23 17 and 16.
C3H/HeJ : The number of mice analyzed at each age, listed from youngest to oldest, follow: C57BL/6J, 18, 18, 18, 18, 13; 129P3/J, 18, 15, 16, 14, 21; C3H/HeJ, 15, 23 17 and 16.
C3H/HeJ mice : Despite a 1 mmHg dip in IOP at 8 months, there were no significant IOP differences between C3H/HeJ mice at each age tested (P = 0.2 for age).
node_520
18 month old mice : In strain 129P3/J, IOP did not differ significantly with age between 3 and 14 months but was lower in 18 month old mice (P < 0.001 compared to all younger ages, Figure 4).
18 month old mice : In strain 129P3/J, IOP did not differ significantly with age between 3 and 14 months but was lower in 18 month old mice (P < 0.001 compared to all younger ages, Figure 4).
the oldest age examined : The IOP of 129P3/J mice also decreased with age but only at the oldest age examined (18 months).
18 months : This was true at all ages for the 3 strains that were aged to 18 months or older.
node_524
8 months : Despite a 1 mmHg dip in IOP at 8 months, there were no significant IOP differences between C3H/HeJ mice at each age tested (P = 0.2 for age).
8 months : Despite a 1 mmHg dip in IOP at 8 months, there were no significant IOP differences between C3H/HeJ mice at each age tested (P = 0.2 for age).
8 month : The number of mice analyzed during the light period were: 2 month, 28 +/+, 29 c-2J/c-2J, 4 month, 20 +/+ and 20 c-2J/c-2J, 8 month, 15 +/+ and 15 c-2J/c-2J.
node_534
the glaucomatous DBA/2J : Although the effect of age has not been thoroughly assessed in other strains, no obvious age-related differences have been identified in other strains analyzed at multiple ages except for the glaucomatous DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty strains [14,19].  Effect of sex on IOP  Although we have not rigorously assessed the effect of sex on IOP in many strains, sex specific differences have not been detected in the majority of strains for which both sexes have been analyzed, and have proven inconsistent even within an individual strain analyzed multiple times.
the glaucomatous DBA/2J : Although the effect of age has not been thoroughly assessed in other strains, no obvious age-related differences have been identified in other strains analyzed at multiple ages except for the glaucomatous DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty strains [14,19].  Effect of sex on IOP  Although we have not rigorously assessed the effect of sex on IOP in many strains, sex specific differences have not been detected in the majority of strains for which both sexes have been analyzed, and have proven inconsistent even within an individual strain analyzed multiple times.
glaucomatous DBA/2J : Although the effect of age has not been thoroughly assessed in other strains, no obvious age-related differences have been identified in other strains analyzed at multiple ages except for the glaucomatous DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty strains [14,19].  Effect of sex on IOP  Although we have not rigorously assessed the effect of sex on IOP in many strains, sex specific differences have not been detected in the majority of strains for which both sexes have been analyzed, and have proven inconsistent even within an individual strain analyzed multiple times.
the glaucomatous strains DBA/2J : We previously demonstrated that the glaucomatous strains DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty develop elevated IOP with age [14,19].  Gender
node_535
the : Although the effect of age has not been thoroughly assessed in other strains, no obvious age-related differences have been identified in other strains analyzed at multiple ages except for the glaucomatous DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty strains [14,19].  Effect of sex on IOP  Although we have not rigorously assessed the effect of sex on IOP in many strains, sex specific differences have not been detected in the majority of strains for which both sexes have been analyzed, and have proven inconsistent even within an individual strain analyzed multiple times.
the : Although the effect of age has not been thoroughly assessed in other strains, no obvious age-related differences have been identified in other strains analyzed at multiple ages except for the glaucomatous DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty strains [14,19].  Effect of sex on IOP  Although we have not rigorously assessed the effect of sex on IOP in many strains, sex specific differences have not been detected in the majority of strains for which both sexes have been analyzed, and have proven inconsistent even within an individual strain analyzed multiple times.
the glaucomatous strains : We previously demonstrated that the glaucomatous strains DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty develop elevated IOP with age [14,19].  Gender
node_543
sex specific differences : Although the effect of age has not been thoroughly assessed in other strains, no obvious age-related differences have been identified in other strains analyzed at multiple ages except for the glaucomatous DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty strains [14,19].  Effect of sex on IOP  Although we have not rigorously assessed the effect of sex on IOP in many strains, sex specific differences have not been detected in the majority of strains for which both sexes have been analyzed, and have proven inconsistent even within an individual strain analyzed multiple times.
sex specific differences : Although the effect of age has not been thoroughly assessed in other strains, no obvious age-related differences have been identified in other strains analyzed at multiple ages except for the glaucomatous DBA/2J and AKXD-28/Ty strains [14,19].  Effect of sex on IOP  Although we have not rigorously assessed the effect of sex on IOP in many strains, sex specific differences have not been detected in the majority of strains for which both sexes have been analyzed, and have proven inconsistent even within an individual strain analyzed multiple times.
Sex differences : Sex differences were always absent in strain 129P3/J and typically absent in strain B6.
node_562
a particular age : If real, this sporadic sex difference was not dependent on age, sometimes occurring in a group of B6 mice at a particular age and sometimes not occurring in a separate group of the same age.
a particular age : If real, this sporadic sex difference was not dependent on age, sometimes occurring in a group of B6 mice at a particular age and sometimes not occurring in a separate group of the same age.
the same age : If real, this sporadic sex difference was not dependent on age, sometimes occurring in a group of B6 mice at a particular age and sometimes not occurring in a separate group of the same age.
node_566
an anesthetic regime of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine : All IOPs were assessed using an anesthetic regime of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine (defined as 1X).
an anesthetic regime of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine : All IOPs were assessed using an anesthetic regime of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine (defined as 1X).
1X : To further assess the effects of anesthesia, we measured IOP in groups of genetically identical B6 mice subjected to different doses (1X, 1.5X and 2X) at 5 and 25 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
the 1X dose : To identify any early window when it may be possible to assess IOP without an obvious anesthetic effect, 195 mice of strain B6 were anesthetized with the 1X dose and IOP was measured at 1 minute time points between 4 and 12 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
1X dose : Similar results were obtained using 161 strain 129P3/J and 145 strain DBA/2J mice with the 1X dose (129P3/J, P = 0.1; DBA/2J, P = 0.2).
1X anesthetic dose :  Figure 5  No effect of 1X anesthetic dose within 12 minutes of administration.
The 1X dose consisted of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine : The 1X dose consisted of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine.
intraperitoneal injection of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine : The relationship between the IOPs we measure and those in conscious mice depends upon the effect of our anesthetic protocol (intraperitoneal injection of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine).
node_568
99 mg/kg ketamine : All IOPs were assessed using an anesthetic regime of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine (defined as 1X).
99 mg/kg ketamine : All IOPs were assessed using an anesthetic regime of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine (defined as 1X).
99 mg/kg ketamine : The 1X dose consisted of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine.
99 mg/kg ketamine : The relationship between the IOPs we measure and those in conscious mice depends upon the effect of our anesthetic protocol (intraperitoneal injection of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine).
node_570
9 mg/kg xylazine : All IOPs were assessed using an anesthetic regime of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine (defined as 1X).
9 mg/kg xylazine : All IOPs were assessed using an anesthetic regime of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine (defined as 1X).
9 mg/kg xylazine : Initial experiments suggested that an almost identical dose (100 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine) of anesthesia had no effect on IOP during the experimental period with IOP being measured as soon as possible after the mouse was unconscious, typically minutes.
9 mg/kg xylazine : The 1X dose consisted of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine.
9 mg/kg xylazine : The relationship between the IOPs we measure and those in conscious mice depends upon the effect of our anesthetic protocol (intraperitoneal injection of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine).
node_573
100 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine : Initial experiments suggested that an almost identical dose (100 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine) of anesthesia had no effect on IOP during the experimental period with IOP being measured as soon as possible after the mouse was unconscious, typically minutes.
100 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine : Initial experiments suggested that an almost identical dose (100 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine) of anesthesia had no effect on IOP during the experimental period with IOP being measured as soon as possible after the mouse was unconscious, typically minutes.
an almost identical dose : Initial experiments suggested that an almost identical dose (100 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine) of anesthesia had no effect on IOP during the experimental period with IOP being measured as soon as possible after the mouse was unconscious, typically minutes.
node_576
anesthesia : Initial experiments suggested that an almost identical dose (100 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine) of anesthesia had no effect on IOP during the experimental period with IOP being measured as soon as possible after the mouse was unconscious, typically minutes.
anesthesia : Initial experiments suggested that an almost identical dose (100 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine) of anesthesia had no effect on IOP during the experimental period with IOP being measured as soon as possible after the mouse was unconscious, typically minutes.
anesthesia : To further assess the effects of anesthesia, we measured IOP in groups of genetically identical B6 mice subjected to different doses (1X, 1.5X and 2X) at 5 and 25 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
anesthesia : The mean IOP of groups analyzed at each time point did not differ (P = 0.9) indicating that the IOP depressing effect of anesthesia occurs later than 12 minutes after administration.
anesthesia : In support of a later effect of anesthesia (since general anesthesia is reported to mask diurnal variation in IOP [21]), we identified increased IOP during the dark compared to the light period of the day in several tested strains (Figure 6).
anesthesia : In these experiments, IOP measurements were made between 5 and 12 minutes after administration of anesthesia.
anesthetic : A Mean IOP ± SD is shown for C57BL/6J mice at 5 and 25 minutes after administration of various doses of anesthetic.
anesthesia : At all doses the IOP at 5 minutes was the same suggesting that the effect of anesthesia had not yet occurred.
anesthesia : Thus, to avoid effects of anesthesia on IOP, all measurements should be made within a window of up to 12 minutes after anesthetic administration.
anesthesia : In that study, anesthesia had a minor effect on blood pressure during the first 15 minutes following injection but a strong hypotensive effect between 15 and 30 minutes that continued for more than an hour [35].
anesthesia : IOP decreased significantly between a conscious measurement and the first possible measurement under anesthesia (defined as time 0).
anesthesia : The time 0 measurement in that study was at a very similar state of anesthesia as our 4 and 5 minute time points (starting as soon as possible and within 20 to 60 seconds of adequate anesthesia), and the 5 minute rat time point was similar to our 9 and 10 minute measurement times.
anesthesia : Thus, although both rat and mouse studies show that anesthesia decreases IOP, the studies do not agree on the timing of the effect.
anesthesia :  Environment may influence the effect of anesthesia  
anesthesia : Factors that may influence the effect of anesthesia include the species, strain and environment used.
anesthesia : In mice, the strain does not appear to be important as no early effect of anesthesia was present in the three distantly related laboratory strains [37] we studied in detail, and we have not observed any obvious effect during this period in any analyzed strain.
node_579
the mouse : Initial experiments suggested that an almost identical dose (100 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine) of anesthesia had no effect on IOP during the experimental period with IOP being measured as soon as possible after the mouse was unconscious, typically minutes.
the mouse : Initial experiments suggested that an almost identical dose (100 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine) of anesthesia had no effect on IOP during the experimental period with IOP being measured as soon as possible after the mouse was unconscious, typically minutes.
the mice : We use wood shavings for bedding and wood shavings expose the mice to terpenes.
All mice : All mice were bred and maintained at The Jackson Laboratory.
Mice : Mice were housed in cages containing white pine bedding and covered with polyester filters.
the mice : For most experiments, the mice were fed NIH31 (6 % fat) chow ad libitum, and their water was acidified to pH 2.8 to 3.2.
their : For most experiments, the mice were fed NIH31 (6 % fat) chow ad libitum, and their water was acidified to pH 2.8 to 3.2.
The mice : The mice were group housed and the cages were changed one time per week.
the mice : If any cage appeared soiled between scheduled changes, the mice were placed in a clean cage.
The mice : The mice were typically acclimatized to the procedure room for at least 2 weeks prior to measurement, but sometimes between 1 and 2 weeks.
experimental mice : As demonstrated here, the IOPs of C57BL/6J are very consistent over time and so these animals were interspersed with experimental mice during all experiments to ensure that calibration had not drifted and that the system was functioning optimally.
the animals : Whenever possible, the investigator measuring IOP did not know the genotypes of the animals.
mice : The room was equipped with dim red lights and mice were protected from all light exposure during set up.
node_581
the effects of anesthesia : To further assess the effects of anesthesia, we measured IOP in groups of genetically identical B6 mice subjected to different doses (1X, 1.5X and 2X) at 5 and 25 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
the effects of anesthesia : To further assess the effects of anesthesia, we measured IOP in groups of genetically identical B6 mice subjected to different doses (1X, 1.5X and 2X) at 5 and 25 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
the effect of anesthesia : At all doses the IOP at 5 minutes was the same suggesting that the effect of anesthesia had not yet occurred.
the effect of anesthesia :  Environment may influence the effect of anesthesia  
the effect of anesthesia : Factors that may influence the effect of anesthesia include the species, strain and environment used.
node_586
5 : To further assess the effects of anesthesia, we measured IOP in groups of genetically identical B6 mice subjected to different doses (1X, 1.5X and 2X) at 5 and 25 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
5 : To further assess the effects of anesthesia, we measured IOP in groups of genetically identical B6 mice subjected to different doses (1X, 1.5X and 2X) at 5 and 25 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
the 5 minute measurement : At the 5 minute measurement, however, IOP was the same using all doses suggesting that the anesthetic effect on IOP had not yet occurred.
5 : A Mean IOP ± SD is shown for C57BL/6J mice at 5 and 25 minutes after administration of various doses of anesthetic.
5 minutes : At all doses the IOP at 5 minutes was the same suggesting that the effect of anesthesia had not yet occurred.
node_588
25 minutes after administration : To further assess the effects of anesthesia, we measured IOP in groups of genetically identical B6 mice subjected to different doses (1X, 1.5X and 2X) at 5 and 25 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
25 minutes after administration : To further assess the effects of anesthesia, we measured IOP in groups of genetically identical B6 mice subjected to different doses (1X, 1.5X and 2X) at 5 and 25 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
25 minutes : For all doses, IOP decreased by 25 minutes (P = 0.005 for time).
25 minutes after administration of various doses of anesthetic : A Mean IOP ± SD is shown for C57BL/6J mice at 5 and 25 minutes after administration of various doses of anesthetic.
25 minutes : All doses decreased IOP by 25 minutes.
node_590
administration : To further assess the effects of anesthesia, we measured IOP in groups of genetically identical B6 mice subjected to different doses (1X, 1.5X and 2X) at 5 and 25 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
administration : To further assess the effects of anesthesia, we measured IOP in groups of genetically identical B6 mice subjected to different doses (1X, 1.5X and 2X) at 5 and 25 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
administration : To identify any early window when it may be possible to assess IOP without an obvious anesthetic effect, 195 mice of strain B6 were anesthetized with the 1X dose and IOP was measured at 1 minute time points between 4 and 12 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
administration : The mean IOP of groups analyzed at each time point did not differ (P = 0.9) indicating that the IOP depressing effect of anesthesia occurs later than 12 minutes after administration.
administration of anesthesia : In these experiments, IOP measurements were made between 5 and 12 minutes after administration of anesthesia.
administration :  Figure 5  No effect of 1X anesthetic dose within 12 minutes of administration.
anesthetic administration : Scatter-plots demonstrating no change in IOP over the 12 minutes following anesthetic administration in three relatively unrelated mouse strains.
administration : Different doses, species used, routes of administration or environments may contribute to these differences.
administration : Here, we show that, despite a depressant effect on IOP by 25 minutes, our anesthetic protocol has no detectable effect on IOP during the first 12 minutes after administration.
anesthetic administration : Thus, to avoid effects of anesthesia on IOP, all measurements should be made within a window of up to 12 minutes after anesthetic administration.
administration : Essentially the same dose of ketamine and route of administration was used in both the rat and mouse IOP studies.
node_593
Figure 5 : To further assess the effects of anesthesia, we measured IOP in groups of genetically identical B6 mice subjected to different doses (1X, 1.5X and 2X) at 5 and 25 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
Figure 5 : To further assess the effects of anesthesia, we measured IOP in groups of genetically identical B6 mice subjected to different doses (1X, 1.5X and 2X) at 5 and 25 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
Figure 5 :  Figure 5  No effect of 1X anesthetic dose within 12 minutes of administration.
node_595
all doses : For all doses, IOP decreased by 25 minutes (P = 0.005 for time).
all doses : For all doses, IOP decreased by 25 minutes (P = 0.005 for time).
all doses : At the 5 minute measurement, however, IOP was the same using all doses suggesting that the anesthetic effect on IOP had not yet occurred.
All doses : All doses decreased IOP by 25 minutes.
all doses : At all doses the IOP at 5 minutes was the same suggesting that the effect of anesthesia had not yet occurred.
node_604
the anesthetic effect on IOP : At the 5 minute measurement, however, IOP was the same using all doses suggesting that the anesthetic effect on IOP had not yet occurred.
the anesthetic effect on IOP : At the 5 minute measurement, however, IOP was the same using all doses suggesting that the anesthetic effect on IOP had not yet occurred.
effects of anesthesia on IOP : Thus, to avoid effects of anesthesia on IOP, all measurements should be made within a window of up to 12 minutes after anesthetic administration.
node_609
an obvious anesthetic effect : To identify any early window when it may be possible to assess IOP without an obvious anesthetic effect, 195 mice of strain B6 were anesthetized with the 1X dose and IOP was measured at 1 minute time points between 4 and 12 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
an obvious anesthetic effect : To identify any early window when it may be possible to assess IOP without an obvious anesthetic effect, 195 mice of strain B6 were anesthetized with the 1X dose and IOP was measured at 1 minute time points between 4 and 12 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
the IOP depressing effect of anesthesia : The mean IOP of groups analyzed at each time point did not differ (P = 0.9) indicating that the IOP depressing effect of anesthesia occurs later than 12 minutes after administration.
node_611
195 mice of strain B6 : To identify any early window when it may be possible to assess IOP without an obvious anesthetic effect, 195 mice of strain B6 were anesthetized with the 1X dose and IOP was measured at 1 minute time points between 4 and 12 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
195 mice of strain B6 : To identify any early window when it may be possible to assess IOP without an obvious anesthetic effect, 195 mice of strain B6 were anesthetized with the 1X dose and IOP was measured at 1 minute time points between 4 and 12 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
195 C57BL/6J : The scatter-plots include 195 C57BL/6J, 161 129P3/J and 145 DBA/2J mice.
node_617
12 minutes after administration : To identify any early window when it may be possible to assess IOP without an obvious anesthetic effect, 195 mice of strain B6 were anesthetized with the 1X dose and IOP was measured at 1 minute time points between 4 and 12 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
12 minutes after administration : To identify any early window when it may be possible to assess IOP without an obvious anesthetic effect, 195 mice of strain B6 were anesthetized with the 1X dose and IOP was measured at 1 minute time points between 4 and 12 minutes after administration (Figure 5).
12 minutes after administration : The mean IOP of groups analyzed at each time point did not differ (P = 0.9) indicating that the IOP depressing effect of anesthesia occurs later than 12 minutes after administration.
12 minutes after administration of anesthesia : In these experiments, IOP measurements were made between 5 and 12 minutes after administration of anesthesia.
the 12 minutes following anesthetic administration : Scatter-plots demonstrating no change in IOP over the 12 minutes following anesthetic administration in three relatively unrelated mouse strains.
the first 12 minutes after administration : Here, we show that, despite a depressant effect on IOP by 25 minutes, our anesthetic protocol has no detectable effect on IOP during the first 12 minutes after administration.
12 minutes after anesthetic administration : Thus, to avoid effects of anesthesia on IOP, all measurements should be made within a window of up to 12 minutes after anesthetic administration.
node_626
161 strain 129P3/J : Similar results were obtained using 161 strain 129P3/J and 145 strain DBA/2J mice with the 1X dose (129P3/J, P = 0.1; DBA/2J, P = 0.2).
161 strain 129P3/J : Similar results were obtained using 161 strain 129P3/J and 145 strain DBA/2J mice with the 1X dose (129P3/J, P = 0.1; DBA/2J, P = 0.2).
161 129P3/J : The scatter-plots include 195 C57BL/6J, 161 129P3/J and 145 DBA/2J mice.
node_629
145 strain DBA/2J mice : Similar results were obtained using 161 strain 129P3/J and 145 strain DBA/2J mice with the 1X dose (129P3/J, P = 0.1; DBA/2J, P = 0.2).
145 strain DBA/2J mice : Similar results were obtained using 161 strain 129P3/J and 145 strain DBA/2J mice with the 1X dose (129P3/J, P = 0.1; DBA/2J, P = 0.2).
145 DBA/2J mice : The scatter-plots include 195 C57BL/6J, 161 129P3/J and 145 DBA/2J mice.
node_634
DBA/2J : Similar results were obtained using 161 strain 129P3/J and 145 strain DBA/2J mice with the 1X dose (129P3/J, P = 0.1; DBA/2J, P = 0.2).
DBA/2J : Similar results were obtained using 161 strain 129P3/J and 145 strain DBA/2J mice with the 1X dose (129P3/J, P = 0.1; DBA/2J, P = 0.2).
DBA/2J : The number of mice successfully analyzed during the light (L) or dark (D) periods follows, DBA/2J 10L,10D; C57BL/6J 32L, 22D; C57BR/cdJ 12L,10D; SWR/J 16L, 16D; BALB/cByJ 15L, 16D; 129B6 10L, 12D; CBA/CaJ 22L, 16D.
node_637
diurnal variation in IOP : In support of a later effect of anesthesia (since general anesthesia is reported to mask diurnal variation in IOP [21]), we identified increased IOP during the dark compared to the light period of the day in several tested strains (Figure 6).
diurnal variation in IOP : In support of a later effect of anesthesia (since general anesthesia is reported to mask diurnal variation in IOP [21]), we identified increased IOP during the dark compared to the light period of the day in several tested strains (Figure 6).
Diurnal variation in IOP : Diurnal variation in IOP is common in humans and laboratory animals [53].
diurnal differences in IOP : Small changes in the resistance to aqueous humor drainage may also contribute to diurnal differences in IOP [66,67].
the diurnal pattern of IOP changes : Thus, albinism can affect the diurnal pattern of IOP changes.
the diurnal fluctuation of IOP : Exposing rats to 24 hours of low light abrogates the diurnal fluctuation of IOP and results in constantly elevated IOP [36].
node_642
the light period of the day : In support of a later effect of anesthesia (since general anesthesia is reported to mask diurnal variation in IOP [21]), we identified increased IOP during the dark compared to the light period of the day in several tested strains (Figure 6).
the light period of the day : In support of a later effect of anesthesia (since general anesthesia is reported to mask diurnal variation in IOP [21]), we identified increased IOP during the dark compared to the light period of the day in several tested strains (Figure 6).
light periods :  Figure 6  IOP is increased during the dark compared to light periods in several strains.
the light : Mean IOP ± SEM is shown for the indicated strains at measurement during the light (open bars) or dark (filled bars) periods of the day.
the light  : The number of mice successfully analyzed during the light (L) or dark (D) periods follows, DBA/2J 10L,10D; C57BL/6J 32L, 22D; C57BR/cdJ 12L,10D; SWR/J 16L, 16D; BALB/cByJ 15L, 16D; 129B6 10L, 12D; CBA/CaJ 22L, 16D.
light period of the day : In contrast to pigmented B6 mice (Figure 6), the IOPs of the albino B6 mice were not increased at measurement during the dark compared to light period of the day (P = 0.6, Figure 10B).
the light period : The number of mice analyzed during the light period were: 2 month, 28 +/+, 29 c-2J/c-2J, 4 month, 20 +/+ and 20 c-2J/c-2J, 8 month, 15 +/+ and 15 c-2J/c-2J.
the light period : Previously, a rise of IOP was reported to occur before onset of the dark period in rats [21], and rats and rabbits were shown to have higher IOP during the dark period compared to the light period [21,68,69].
the light period : Thus, we compared the IOPs of mice at different times of day and identified several strains with significantly higher IOP during the dark compared to the light period.
the light : Additionally, IOP differences between the light and dark period of the day were detected in the pigmented but not the albino B6 mice.
node_646
Figure 6 : In support of a later effect of anesthesia (since general anesthesia is reported to mask diurnal variation in IOP [21]), we identified increased IOP during the dark compared to the light period of the day in several tested strains (Figure 6).
Figure 6 : In support of a later effect of anesthesia (since general anesthesia is reported to mask diurnal variation in IOP [21]), we identified increased IOP during the dark compared to the light period of the day in several tested strains (Figure 6).
Figure 6 :  Figure 6  IOP is increased during the dark compared to light periods in several strains.
Figure 6 : In contrast to pigmented B6 mice (Figure 6), the IOPs of the albino B6 mice were not increased at measurement during the dark compared to light period of the day (P = 0.6, Figure 10B).
node_649
IOP measurements : In these experiments, IOP measurements were made between 5 and 12 minutes after administration of anesthesia.
IOP measurements : In these experiments, IOP measurements were made between 5 and 12 minutes after administration of anesthesia.
IOP measurment : The mice were analyzed in the same procedure room as was used for IOP measurment.
IOP measurement : However, the anterior chambers of C57BLKS/J mice were only evaluated under a dissection microscope at the time of IOP measurement.
node_676
three relatively unrelated mouse strains : Scatter-plots demonstrating no change in IOP over the 12 minutes following anesthetic administration in three relatively unrelated mouse strains.
three relatively unrelated mouse strains : Scatter-plots demonstrating no change in IOP over the 12 minutes following anesthetic administration in three relatively unrelated mouse strains.
the three distantly related laboratory strains [37] we studied in detail : In mice, the strain does not appear to be important as no early effect of anesthesia was present in the three distantly related laboratory strains [37] we studied in detail, and we have not observed any obvious effect during this period in any analyzed strain.
any analyzed strain : In mice, the strain does not appear to be important as no early effect of anesthesia was present in the three distantly related laboratory strains [37] we studied in detail, and we have not observed any obvious effect during this period in any analyzed strain.
the examined strains : In the examined strains, we found no consistent differences in IOP between males and females.
per strain :  Blood pressure  The blood pressures of conscious mice of each strain (6 to 12 females per strain) were measured with a tail-cuff system as reported [78], except that 5 days of training were used.
node_703
129B6 : 129B6 refers to mice of a mixed 129X1/SvJ and C57BL/6J background.
129B6 : 129B6 refers to mice of a mixed 129X1/SvJ and C57BL/6J background.
129B6 : The number of mice successfully analyzed during the light (L) or dark (D) periods follows, DBA/2J 10L,10D; C57BL/6J 32L, 22D; C57BR/cdJ 12L,10D; SWR/J 16L, 16D; BALB/cByJ 15L, 16D; 129B6 10L, 12D; CBA/CaJ 22L, 16D.
node_711
light : The number of mice successfully analyzed during the light (L) or dark (D) periods follows, DBA/2J 10L,10D; C57BL/6J 32L, 22D; C57BR/cdJ 12L,10D; SWR/J 16L, 16D; BALB/cByJ 15L, 16D; 129B6 10L, 12D; CBA/CaJ 22L, 16D.
light : The number of mice successfully analyzed during the light (L) or dark (D) periods follows, DBA/2J 10L,10D; C57BL/6J 32L, 22D; C57BR/cdJ 12L,10D; SWR/J 16L, 16D; BALB/cByJ 15L, 16D; 129B6 10L, 12D; CBA/CaJ 22L, 16D.
L : The number of mice successfully analyzed during the light (L) or dark (D) periods follows, DBA/2J 10L,10D; C57BL/6J 32L, 22D; C57BR/cdJ 12L,10D; SWR/J 16L, 16D; BALB/cByJ 15L, 16D; 129B6 10L, 12D; CBA/CaJ 22L, 16D.
node_714
dark : The number of mice successfully analyzed during the light (L) or dark (D) periods follows, DBA/2J 10L,10D; C57BL/6J 32L, 22D; C57BR/cdJ 12L,10D; SWR/J 16L, 16D; BALB/cByJ 15L, 16D; 129B6 10L, 12D; CBA/CaJ 22L, 16D.
dark : The number of mice successfully analyzed during the light (L) or dark (D) periods follows, DBA/2J 10L,10D; C57BL/6J 32L, 22D; C57BR/cdJ 12L,10D; SWR/J 16L, 16D; BALB/cByJ 15L, 16D; 129B6 10L, 12D; CBA/CaJ 22L, 16D.
D : The number of mice successfully analyzed during the light (L) or dark (D) periods follows, DBA/2J 10L,10D; C57BL/6J 32L, 22D; C57BR/cdJ 12L,10D; SWR/J 16L, 16D; BALB/cByJ 15L, 16D; 129B6 10L, 12D; CBA/CaJ 22L, 16D.
node_724
Blood :  Blood pressure does not correlate with IOP
Blood :  Blood pressure does not correlate with IOP
blood :  An initial study of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in mice did not detect a good correlation (R2 = 0.1, Figure 7).  Figure 7  No correlation between blood pressure and IOP.
blood :  An initial study of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in mice did not detect a good correlation (R2 = 0.1, Figure 7).  Figure 7  No correlation between blood pressure and IOP.
blood :  There is no strong correlation between the average systolic blood pressure of each strain and the average IOP of that strain (R2 = 0.1).
Blood : Blood sugar levels in db /db males of this age are almost always in the diabetic range whereas those of heterozygotes are not [[27]].
blood : In that study, anesthesia had a minor effect on blood pressure during the first 15 minutes following injection but a strong hypotensive effect between 15 and 30 minutes that continued for more than an hour [35].
blood : Some epidemiological studies implicate factors such as diabetes, vascular hypertension, arterial hypotension, vasospasm, aberrant autoregulation of blood flow and sex in glaucoma.
blood : Similarly, the effects of various factors including age, gender, blood pressure, obesity and diabetes have been variably associated with elevated IOP.
Blood : Blood pressure  
blood : Some but not all human studies have reported a positive association between IOP and blood pressure [48,52].
blood : Our comparison of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in young, adult female mice of different mouse strains, whose blood pressures differed up to 36 mmHg, did not reveal a positive correlation.
blood : Our comparison of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in young, adult female mice of different mouse strains, whose blood pressures differed up to 36 mmHg, did not reveal a positive correlation.
blood : Further studies are needed to determine if blood pressure correlates with IOP in males, and to determine the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in various mouse strains with age.
blood : Further studies are needed to determine if blood pressure correlates with IOP in males, and to determine the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in various mouse strains with age.
Blood :  Blood pressure  The blood pressures of conscious mice of each strain (6 to 12 females per strain) were measured with a tail-cuff system as reported [78], except that 5 days of training were used.
blood :  Blood pressure  The blood pressures of conscious mice of each strain (6 to 12 females per strain) were measured with a tail-cuff system as reported [78], except that 5 days of training were used.
node_726
Blood pressure :  Blood pressure does not correlate with IOP
Blood pressure :  Blood pressure does not correlate with IOP
blood pressure :  An initial study of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in mice did not detect a good correlation (R2 = 0.1, Figure 7).  Figure 7  No correlation between blood pressure and IOP.
blood pressure : Similarly, the effects of various factors including age, gender, blood pressure, obesity and diabetes have been variably associated with elevated IOP.
Blood pressure : Blood pressure  
blood pressure : Some but not all human studies have reported a positive association between IOP and blood pressure [48,52].
blood pressure : Our comparison of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in young, adult female mice of different mouse strains, whose blood pressures differed up to 36 mmHg, did not reveal a positive correlation.
blood pressure : Further studies are needed to determine if blood pressure correlates with IOP in males, and to determine the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in various mouse strains with age.
blood pressure : Further studies are needed to determine if blood pressure correlates with IOP in males, and to determine the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in various mouse strains with age.
node_734
Figure 7 :  An initial study of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in mice did not detect a good correlation (R2 = 0.1, Figure 7).  Figure 7  No correlation between blood pressure and IOP.
Figure 7 :  An initial study of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in mice did not detect a good correlation (R2 = 0.1, Figure 7).  Figure 7  No correlation between blood pressure and IOP.
Figure 7 :  An initial study of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in mice did not detect a good correlation (R2 = 0.1, Figure 7).  Figure 7  No correlation between blood pressure and IOP.
node_749
ARK/J : If the CBA/CaJ mice are excluded, R2 drops to 0.01 of ARK/J, C57BL/6J and SJL/J, strain ARK/J had the lowest IOP.
ARK/J : If the CBA/CaJ mice are excluded, R2 drops to 0.01 of ARK/J, C57BL/6J and SJL/J, strain ARK/J had the lowest IOP.
strain ARK/J : If the CBA/CaJ mice are excluded, R2 drops to 0.01 of ARK/J, C57BL/6J and SJL/J, strain ARK/J had the lowest IOP.
node_754
Myoc alleles :  Myoc alleles do not associate with the magnitude of IOP  Mutations in the myocilin gene (MYOC) cause human glaucoma.
Myoc alleles :  Myoc alleles do not associate with the magnitude of IOP  Mutations in the myocilin gene (MYOC) cause human glaucoma.
Myoc alleles : The presence or absence of this allele does not associate with IOP as it is present in strains with a range of IOPs (Figure 8).  Figure 8  Myoc alleles do not associate with IOP.
Myoc alleles : We also thank Jane Barker for the Car2 mice, Marianna Mertts for her help with analysis of Myoc alleles, and members of the John laboratory, Tatyana Golovkina, Edward Leiter and Timothy O'Brien for critical reading of the manuscript.
node_757
the myocilin gene :  Myoc alleles do not associate with the magnitude of IOP  Mutations in the myocilin gene (MYOC) cause human glaucoma.
the myocilin gene :  Myoc alleles do not associate with the magnitude of IOP  Mutations in the myocilin gene (MYOC) cause human glaucoma.
Myoc :  Analysis of Myoc  Exons and the proximal promoter of the mouse Myoc gene were amplified from mouse genomic DNA using the following combinations of primers:  Exon 1: 5'-cttgcaggagaactttccagaa-3' and 5'-atctcgaaggagattgttatagg-3'  5'-gaccagctggagacccaaaccag-3' and 5'-gctcagatccactgacctaaa-3'  Exon 2: 5'-tgaagccatactttaccaaccat-3' and 5'-caaaagggagaagtctaacttc-3'
node_758
the myocilin gene :  Myoc alleles do not associate with the magnitude of IOP  Mutations in the myocilin gene (MYOC) cause human glaucoma.
the myocilin gene :  Myoc alleles do not associate with the magnitude of IOP  Mutations in the myocilin gene (MYOC) cause human glaucoma.
MYOC :  Myoc alleles do not associate with the magnitude of IOP  Mutations in the myocilin gene (MYOC) cause human glaucoma.
node_762
the mouse Myoc gene : To determine if allelic variation in the mouse Myoc gene associated with IOP in mouse strains, we analyzed the gene in an assortment of strains with different IOPs.
the mouse Myoc gene : To determine if allelic variation in the mouse Myoc gene associated with IOP in mouse strains, we analyzed the gene in an assortment of strains with different IOPs.
the gene : To determine if allelic variation in the mouse Myoc gene associated with IOP in mouse strains, we analyzed the gene in an assortment of strains with different IOPs.
the mouse Myoc gene :  Analysis of Myoc  Exons and the proximal promoter of the mouse Myoc gene were amplified from mouse genomic DNA using the following combinations of primers:  Exon 1: 5'-cttgcaggagaactttccagaa-3' and 5'-atctcgaaggagattgttatagg-3'  5'-gaccagctggagacccaaaccag-3' and 5'-gctcagatccactgacctaaa-3'  Exon 2: 5'-tgaagccatactttaccaaccat-3' and 5'-caaaagggagaagtctaacttc-3'
node_769
an assortment of strains with different IOPs : To determine if allelic variation in the mouse Myoc gene associated with IOP in mouse strains, we analyzed the gene in an assortment of strains with different IOPs.
an assortment of strains with different IOPs : To determine if allelic variation in the mouse Myoc gene associated with IOP in mouse strains, we analyzed the gene in an assortment of strains with different IOPs.
strains with a range of IOPs : The presence or absence of this allele does not associate with IOP as it is present in strains with a range of IOPs (Figure 8).  Figure 8  Myoc alleles do not associate with IOP.
these mouse strains :  Sequencing identified two alleles of Myoc in these mouse strains (see text).
node_771
Two alleles : Two alleles were identified.
Two alleles : Two alleles were identified.
these alleles : One of these alleles had a 12 nucleotide insertion in the promoter region (ccagagcagggt, between positions -340 and -341) compared to the previously published sequence and is called the insertion allele.
two alleles of Myoc in these mouse strains :  Sequencing identified two alleles of Myoc in these mouse strains (see text).
node_773
One of these alleles : One of these alleles had a 12 nucleotide insertion in the promoter region (ccagagcagggt, between positions -340 and -341) compared to the previously published sequence and is called the insertion allele.
One of these alleles : One of these alleles had a 12 nucleotide insertion in the promoter region (ccagagcagggt, between positions -340 and -341) compared to the previously published sequence and is called the insertion allele.
The insertion allele : The insertion allele also had a previously reported substitution (A to G, Thr164Ala) in exon 1 and several other single base changes in the promoter region [22].
this allele : The presence or absence of this allele does not associate with IOP as it is present in strains with a range of IOPs (Figure 8).  Figure 8  Myoc alleles do not associate with IOP.
it : The presence or absence of this allele does not associate with IOP as it is present in strains with a range of IOPs (Figure 8).  Figure 8  Myoc alleles do not associate with IOP.
node_776
a 12 nucleotide insertion in the promoter region : One of these alleles had a 12 nucleotide insertion in the promoter region (ccagagcagggt, between positions -340 and -341) compared to the previously published sequence and is called the insertion allele.
a 12 nucleotide insertion in the promoter region : One of these alleles had a 12 nucleotide insertion in the promoter region (ccagagcagggt, between positions -340 and -341) compared to the previously published sequence and is called the insertion allele.
ccagagcagggt, between positions -340 and -341 : One of these alleles had a 12 nucleotide insertion in the promoter region (ccagagcagggt, between positions -340 and -341) compared to the previously published sequence and is called the insertion allele.
node_778
the promoter region : One of these alleles had a 12 nucleotide insertion in the promoter region (ccagagcagggt, between positions -340 and -341) compared to the previously published sequence and is called the insertion allele.
the promoter region : One of these alleles had a 12 nucleotide insertion in the promoter region (ccagagcagggt, between positions -340 and -341) compared to the previously published sequence and is called the insertion allele.
the promoter region : The insertion allele also had a previously reported substitution (A to G, Thr164Ala) in exon 1 and several other single base changes in the promoter region [22].
the promoter region : Mouse strains homozygous for an allele having a 12 bp insertion in the promoter region are shown as open bars and strains homozygous for the allele without this insertion have filled bars.
node_781
the previously published sequence : One of these alleles had a 12 nucleotide insertion in the promoter region (ccagagcagggt, between positions -340 and -341) compared to the previously published sequence and is called the insertion allele.
the previously published sequence : One of these alleles had a 12 nucleotide insertion in the promoter region (ccagagcagggt, between positions -340 and -341) compared to the previously published sequence and is called the insertion allele.
the published sequence : The other allele was identical to the published sequence [22].
node_785
a previously reported substitution : The insertion allele also had a previously reported substitution (A to G, Thr164Ala) in exon 1 and several other single base changes in the promoter region [22].
a previously reported substitution : The insertion allele also had a previously reported substitution (A to G, Thr164Ala) in exon 1 and several other single base changes in the promoter region [22].
A to G : The insertion allele also had a previously reported substitution (A to G, Thr164Ala) in exon 1 and several other single base changes in the promoter region [22].
node_795
Figure 8 : The presence or absence of this allele does not associate with IOP as it is present in strains with a range of IOPs (Figure 8).  Figure 8  Myoc alleles do not associate with IOP.
Figure 8 : The presence or absence of this allele does not associate with IOP as it is present in strains with a range of IOPs (Figure 8).  Figure 8  Myoc alleles do not associate with IOP.
Figure 8 : The presence or absence of this allele does not associate with IOP as it is present in strains with a range of IOPs (Figure 8).  Figure 8  Myoc alleles do not associate with IOP.
node_805
an allele having a 12 bp insertion in the promoter region : Mouse strains homozygous for an allele having a 12 bp insertion in the promoter region are shown as open bars and strains homozygous for the allele without this insertion have filled bars.
an allele having a 12 bp insertion in the promoter region : Mouse strains homozygous for an allele having a 12 bp insertion in the promoter region are shown as open bars and strains homozygous for the allele without this insertion have filled bars.
the allele : Mouse strains homozygous for an allele having a 12 bp insertion in the promoter region are shown as open bars and strains homozygous for the allele without this insertion have filled bars.
node_807
a 12 bp insertion in the promoter region : Mouse strains homozygous for an allele having a 12 bp insertion in the promoter region are shown as open bars and strains homozygous for the allele without this insertion have filled bars.
a 12 bp insertion in the promoter region : Mouse strains homozygous for an allele having a 12 bp insertion in the promoter region are shown as open bars and strains homozygous for the allele without this insertion have filled bars.
this insertion : Mouse strains homozygous for an allele having a 12 bp insertion in the promoter region are shown as open bars and strains homozygous for the allele without this insertion have filled bars.
node_812
The IOP data : The IOP data is the same as that in Figure 1.
The IOP data : The IOP data is the same as that in Figure 1.
that : The IOP data is the same as that in Figure 1.
node_818
Genetic alterations : Genetic alterations and IOP  Y Chromosome  The Y chromosome has been implicated in strain specific blood pressure differences in rats [23,24].
Genetic alterations : Genetic alterations and IOP  Y Chromosome  The Y chromosome has been implicated in strain specific blood pressure differences in rats [23,24].
genetic alterations : No differences in IOP were detected between these groups of mice (Figure 9, P = 0.1).  Figure 9  Effects of genetic alterations.
node_821
Y Chromosome : Genetic alterations and IOP  Y Chromosome  The Y chromosome has been implicated in strain specific blood pressure differences in rats [23,24].
Y Chromosome : Genetic alterations and IOP  Y Chromosome  The Y chromosome has been implicated in strain specific blood pressure differences in rats [23,24].
The Y chromosome : Genetic alterations and IOP  Y Chromosome  The Y chromosome has been implicated in strain specific blood pressure differences in rats [23,24].
node_825
rats : Genetic alterations and IOP  Y Chromosome  The Y chromosome has been implicated in strain specific blood pressure differences in rats [23,24].
rats : Genetic alterations and IOP  Y Chromosome  The Y chromosome has been implicated in strain specific blood pressure differences in rats [23,24].
rat : Similarities and differences to rat studies  
rats : Our results agree with the time course of cardiovascular depression caused by intraperitoneal administration of ketamine and xylazine in rats.
rat : In contrast, intraperitoneally administered ketamine (100 mg/kg) was shown to rapidly decrease IOP in a different rat study [36].
rat : The time 0 measurement in that study was at a very similar state of anesthesia as our 4 and 5 minute time points (starting as soon as possible and within 20 to 60 seconds of adequate anesthesia), and the 5 minute rat time point was similar to our 9 and 10 minute measurement times.
rat : Thus, although both rat and mouse studies show that anesthesia decreases IOP, the studies do not agree on the timing of the effect.
the rats : The IOP depression occurred very soon after anesthesia in the rats but was delayed in the mice.
rat : Essentially the same dose of ketamine and route of administration was used in both the rat and mouse IOP studies.
rats : Cage cleanliness, changing frequency and housing density can alter drug metabolism and the effect of anesthesia in rats [38,39].
rats : Terpene administration or environmental exposure to terpenes in wood shavings alters drug resistance and decreases the effect of anesthetic agents in both rats and mice [40-45].  Risk factors for increased IOP  
rats : Previously, a rise of IOP was reported to occur before onset of the dark period in rats [21], and rats and rabbits were shown to have higher IOP during the dark period compared to the light period [21,68,69].
rats : Previously, a rise of IOP was reported to occur before onset of the dark period in rats [21], and rats and rabbits were shown to have higher IOP during the dark period compared to the light period [21,68,69].
rats : Exposing rats to 24 hours of low light abrogates the diurnal fluctuation of IOP and results in constantly elevated IOP [36].
node_827
the Y chromosome of strain 129/Ola : To test if the Y chromosome of strain 129/Ola alters IOP in relation to that of strain B6, we compared the IOPs of pure B6 males and consomic B6 males that had the 129P2/Ola Y chromosome (backcrossed for 11 generations).
the Y chromosome of strain 129/Ola : To test if the Y chromosome of strain 129/Ola alters IOP in relation to that of strain B6, we compared the IOPs of pure B6 males and consomic B6 males that had the 129P2/Ola Y chromosome (backcrossed for 11 generations).
the 129P2/Ola Y chromosome : To test if the Y chromosome of strain 129/Ola alters IOP in relation to that of strain B6, we compared the IOPs of pure B6 males and consomic B6 males that had the 129P2/Ola Y chromosome (backcrossed for 11 generations).
the 129P2/Ola : There is no difference in IOP between 3 to 4 month old males with either the 129P2/Ola (n = 18) or C57BL/6J (n = 20) Y chromosome (Y Chr).
The 129 Y Chr : The 129 Y Chr had been backcrossed to strain C57BL/6J for 11 generations.
node_834
129P2/Ola : To test if the Y chromosome of strain 129/Ola alters IOP in relation to that of strain B6, we compared the IOPs of pure B6 males and consomic B6 males that had the 129P2/Ola Y chromosome (backcrossed for 11 generations).
129P2/Ola : To test if the Y chromosome of strain 129/Ola alters IOP in relation to that of strain B6, we compared the IOPs of pure B6 males and consomic B6 males that had the 129P2/Ola Y chromosome (backcrossed for 11 generations).
129P2/Ola : There is no difference in IOP between 3 to 4 month old males with either the 129P2/Ola (n = 18) or C57BL/6J (n = 20) Y chromosome (Y Chr).
node_839
Figure 9 : No differences in IOP were detected between these groups of mice (Figure 9, P = 0.1).  Figure 9  Effects of genetic alterations.
Figure 9 : No differences in IOP were detected between these groups of mice (Figure 9, P = 0.1).  Figure 9  Effects of genetic alterations.
Figure 9 : No differences in IOP were detected between these groups of mice (Figure 9, P = 0.1).  Figure 9  Effects of genetic alterations.
Figure 9 : There was no difference in IOP between normal and mutant mice (Figure 9, P = 0.5).
Figure 9 : IOP was modestly but significantly elevated in obese, diabetic homozygous mutants (14.7 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to non-obese, non-diabetic heterozygotes (13.4 ± 0.4 mmHg, P < 0.01, Figure 9).  Tyr  To determine if albinism alters IOP, we analyzed B6 mice that were either pigmented or albino.
node_850
n = 18 : There is no difference in IOP between 3 to 4 month old males with either the 129P2/Ola (n = 18) or C57BL/6J (n = 20) Y chromosome (Y Chr).
n = 18 : There is no difference in IOP between 3 to 4 month old males with either the 129P2/Ola (n = 18) or C57BL/6J (n = 20) Y chromosome (Y Chr).
n = 18 : Similarly, 6 to 9 month old males and females that are homozygous for normal (+) or mutant (n) alleles of Car2 have similar IOPs (n = 18 and 14, respectively).
node_855
Y chromosome : There is no difference in IOP between 3 to 4 month old males with either the 129P2/Ola (n = 18) or C57BL/6J (n = 20) Y chromosome (Y Chr).
Y chromosome : There is no difference in IOP between 3 to 4 month old males with either the 129P2/Ola (n = 18) or C57BL/6J (n = 20) Y chromosome (Y Chr).
Y Chr : There is no difference in IOP between 3 to 4 month old males with either the 129P2/Ola (n = 18) or C57BL/6J (n = 20) Y chromosome (Y Chr).
node_863
normal : Similarly, 6 to 9 month old males and females that are homozygous for normal (+) or mutant (n) alleles of Car2 have similar IOPs (n = 18 and 14, respectively).
normal : Similarly, 6 to 9 month old males and females that are homozygous for normal (+) or mutant (n) alleles of Car2 have similar IOPs (n = 18 and 14, respectively).
+ : Similarly, 6 to 9 month old males and females that are homozygous for normal (+) or mutant (n) alleles of Car2 have similar IOPs (n = 18 and 14, respectively).
node_866
mutant : Similarly, 6 to 9 month old males and females that are homozygous for normal (+) or mutant (n) alleles of Car2 have similar IOPs (n = 18 and 14, respectively).
mutant : Similarly, 6 to 9 month old males and females that are homozygous for normal (+) or mutant (n) alleles of Car2 have similar IOPs (n = 18 and 14, respectively).
n : Similarly, 6 to 9 month old males and females that are homozygous for normal (+) or mutant (n) alleles of Car2 have similar IOPs (n = 18 and 14, respectively).
node_869
Car2 : Similarly, 6 to 9 month old males and females that are homozygous for normal (+) or mutant (n) alleles of Car2 have similar IOPs (n = 18 and 14, respectively).
Car2 : Similarly, 6 to 9 month old males and females that are homozygous for normal (+) or mutant (n) alleles of Car2 have similar IOPs (n = 18 and 14, respectively).
Car2 : Car2  To test if deficiency of carbonic anhydrase II leads to decreased IOP, we analyzed mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with normal or mutant alleles of the Car2 gene [25,26].
Car2 : Car2  To test if deficiency of carbonic anhydrase II leads to decreased IOP, we analyzed mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with normal or mutant alleles of the Car2 gene [25,26].
Car2 :  Car2 deficiency does not alter IOP  Bicarbonate formation is important for aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes and carbonic anhydrase (CA) facilitates this secretion.
Car2 : Our experiments show that a genetic deficiency of CAII in mice homozygous for a mutation in the Car2 gene does not alter IOP.
Car2 : It also is possible that CAII substantially contributes to aqueous humor secretion but that functional mouse CAIV is sufficient to prevent an effect of CAII deficiency on IOP in Car2 mutant mice.
Car2 : We also thank Jane Barker for the Car2 mice, Marianna Mertts for her help with analysis of Myoc alleles, and members of the John laboratory, Tatyana Golovkina, Edward Leiter and Timothy O'Brien for critical reading of the manuscript.
node_872
4 months old males homozygous for the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation : However, 4 months old males homozygous for the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation (db) had significantly higher IOPs than their heterozygous age and sex matched littermates.
4 months old males homozygous for the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation : However, 4 months old males homozygous for the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation (db) had significantly higher IOPs than their heterozygous age and sex matched littermates.
their : However, 4 months old males homozygous for the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation (db) had significantly higher IOPs than their heterozygous age and sex matched littermates.
the homozygotes : The average body weight of the homozygotes and heterozygotes was 59 g (range 50 to 64 g) and 35 g (range 28 to 41 g) respectively.
db /db males of this age : Blood sugar levels in db /db males of this age are almost always in the diabetic range whereas those of heterozygotes are not [[27]].
db/db : This was recently confirmed in cohorts of approximately 25 males of each genotype (mean ± SD; db/db 422 ± 110 mg/dl ; db/+ 147 ± 19 mg/dl; Anthony Nicholson, The Jackson Laboratory, personal communication)
node_874
the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation : However, 4 months old males homozygous for the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation (db) had significantly higher IOPs than their heterozygous age and sex matched littermates.
the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation : However, 4 months old males homozygous for the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation (db) had significantly higher IOPs than their heterozygous age and sex matched littermates.
db : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
node_875
the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation : However, 4 months old males homozygous for the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation (db) had significantly higher IOPs than their heterozygous age and sex matched littermates.
the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation : However, 4 months old males homozygous for the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation (db) had significantly higher IOPs than their heterozygous age and sex matched littermates.
db : However, 4 months old males homozygous for the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation (db) had significantly higher IOPs than their heterozygous age and sex matched littermates.
node_880
heterozygous age and sex matched littermates : However, 4 months old males homozygous for the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation (db) had significantly higher IOPs than their heterozygous age and sex matched littermates.
heterozygous age and sex matched littermates : However, 4 months old males homozygous for the Lepr diabetes and obesity causing mutation (db) had significantly higher IOPs than their heterozygous age and sex matched littermates.
heterozygotes : The average body weight of the homozygotes and heterozygotes was 59 g (range 50 to 64 g) and 35 g (range 28 to 41 g) respectively.
heterozygotes : Blood sugar levels in db /db males of this age are almost always in the diabetic range whereas those of heterozygotes are not [[27]].
node_882
body : The average body weight of the homozygotes and heterozygotes was 59 g (range 50 to 64 g) and 35 g (range 28 to 41 g) respectively.
body : The average body weight of the homozygotes and heterozygotes was 59 g (range 50 to 64 g) and 35 g (range 28 to 41 g) respectively.
body :  Obesity and diabetes  Obesity or higher body mass index have been implicated by some but not other studies as risk factors for increased IOP and glaucoma [51,55-57].
node_891
The Jackson Laboratory : This was recently confirmed in cohorts of approximately 25 males of each genotype (mean ± SD; db/db 422 ± 110 mg/dl ; db/+ 147 ± 19 mg/dl; Anthony Nicholson, The Jackson Laboratory, personal communication)
The Jackson Laboratory : This was recently confirmed in cohorts of approximately 25 males of each genotype (mean ± SD; db/db 422 ± 110 mg/dl ; db/+ 147 ± 19 mg/dl; Anthony Nicholson, The Jackson Laboratory, personal communication)
The Jackson Laboratory : All mice were bred and maintained at The Jackson Laboratory.
The Jackson Laboratory : The colony was monitored for specific pathogens by The Jackson Laboratory's routine surveillance program (see  for specific pathogens).  Intraocular pressure  Intraocular pressures were measured as described elsewhere [13,77].
node_894
carbonic anhydrase II : Car2  To test if deficiency of carbonic anhydrase II leads to decreased IOP, we analyzed mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with normal or mutant alleles of the Car2 gene [25,26].
carbonic anhydrase II : Car2  To test if deficiency of carbonic anhydrase II leads to decreased IOP, we analyzed mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with normal or mutant alleles of the Car2 gene [25,26].
the CAII isoform : There are multiple forms of CA and the CAII isoform is reported to be the predominant form in the ciliary processes [71,72].
CAII : Our experiments show that a genetic deficiency of CAII in mice homozygous for a mutation in the Car2 gene does not alter IOP.
CAII : It also is possible that CAII substantially contributes to aqueous humor secretion but that functional mouse CAIV is sufficient to prevent an effect of CAII deficiency on IOP in Car2 mutant mice.
CAII : It also is possible that CAII substantially contributes to aqueous humor secretion but that functional mouse CAIV is sufficient to prevent an effect of CAII deficiency on IOP in Car2 mutant mice.
node_897
mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with : Car2  To test if deficiency of carbonic anhydrase II leads to decreased IOP, we analyzed mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with normal or mutant alleles of the Car2 gene [25,26].
mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with : Car2  To test if deficiency of carbonic anhydrase II leads to decreased IOP, we analyzed mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with normal or mutant alleles of the Car2 gene [25,26].
mutant mice : There was no difference in IOP between normal and mutant mice (Figure 9, P = 0.5).
node_898
mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with normal : Car2  To test if deficiency of carbonic anhydrase II leads to decreased IOP, we analyzed mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with normal or mutant alleles of the Car2 gene [25,26].
mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with normal : Car2  To test if deficiency of carbonic anhydrase II leads to decreased IOP, we analyzed mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with normal or mutant alleles of the Car2 gene [25,26].
normal : There was no difference in IOP between normal and mutant mice (Figure 9, P = 0.5).
node_901
the Car2 gene : Car2  To test if deficiency of carbonic anhydrase II leads to decreased IOP, we analyzed mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with normal or mutant alleles of the Car2 gene [25,26].
the Car2 gene : Car2  To test if deficiency of carbonic anhydrase II leads to decreased IOP, we analyzed mice of a B6 background that were genetically similar but with normal or mutant alleles of the Car2 gene [25,26].
the Car2 gene : Our experiments show that a genetic deficiency of CAII in mice homozygous for a mutation in the Car2 gene does not alter IOP.
node_917
homozygous : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
homozygous : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
homozygous : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
node_919
heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
node_923
db : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
db : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
a leptin receptor mutation : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
node_927
the C57BLKS/J strain background used : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
the C57BLKS/J strain background used : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared mice that were genetically similar but were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in obesity and diabetes before 4 months of age on the C57BLKS/J strain background used [27].
C57BLKS/J strains : All strains other than CBA/CaHN and C57BLKS/J strains were evaluated.
node_934
albinism : IOP was modestly but significantly elevated in obese, diabetic homozygous mutants (14.7 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to non-obese, non-diabetic heterozygotes (13.4 ± 0.4 mmHg, P < 0.01, Figure 9).  Tyr  To determine if albinism alters IOP, we analyzed B6 mice that were either pigmented or albino.
albinism : IOP was modestly but significantly elevated in obese, diabetic homozygous mutants (14.7 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to non-obese, non-diabetic heterozygotes (13.4 ± 0.4 mmHg, P < 0.01, Figure 9).  Tyr  To determine if albinism alters IOP, we analyzed B6 mice that were either pigmented or albino.
albinism : Tyrosinase deficiency causes albinism and has various ocular consequences.
Albinism : Albinism by itself is either not sufficient to alter the diurnal rhythm of IOP or alters it in different ways depending upon genetic background, however, since the albino strains BALB/cByJ and SWR/J had increased IOP during the dark.
itself : Albinism by itself is either not sufficient to alter the diurnal rhythm of IOP or alters it in different ways depending upon genetic background, however, since the albino strains BALB/cByJ and SWR/J had increased IOP during the dark.
node_937
B6 mice that were either pigmented : IOP was modestly but significantly elevated in obese, diabetic homozygous mutants (14.7 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to non-obese, non-diabetic heterozygotes (13.4 ± 0.4 mmHg, P < 0.01, Figure 9).  Tyr  To determine if albinism alters IOP, we analyzed B6 mice that were either pigmented or albino.
B6 mice that were either pigmented : IOP was modestly but significantly elevated in obese, diabetic homozygous mutants (14.7 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to non-obese, non-diabetic heterozygotes (13.4 ± 0.4 mmHg, P < 0.01, Figure 9).  Tyr  To determine if albinism alters IOP, we analyzed B6 mice that were either pigmented or albino.
pigmented B6 background : The albino mice were homozygous and coisogenic for a mutant allele of tyrosinase (Tyrc-2J) that arose on the otherwise pigmented B6 background.
pigmented B6 mice : In contrast to pigmented B6 mice (Figure 6), the IOPs of the albino B6 mice were not increased at measurement during the dark compared to light period of the day (P = 0.6, Figure 10B).
the pigmented : Additionally, IOP differences between the light and dark period of the day were detected in the pigmented but not the albino B6 mice.
pigmented mice : In agreement with this result, mice with albino eyes that are homozygous for tyrosinase or pink eye dilution mutations have altered diurnal rhythms compared to pigmented mice [75].
node_939
B6 mice that were : IOP was modestly but significantly elevated in obese, diabetic homozygous mutants (14.7 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to non-obese, non-diabetic heterozygotes (13.4 ± 0.4 mmHg, P < 0.01, Figure 9).  Tyr  To determine if albinism alters IOP, we analyzed B6 mice that were either pigmented or albino.
B6 mice that were : IOP was modestly but significantly elevated in obese, diabetic homozygous mutants (14.7 ± 0.3 mmHg) compared to non-obese, non-diabetic heterozygotes (13.4 ± 0.4 mmHg, P < 0.01, Figure 9).  Tyr  To determine if albinism alters IOP, we analyzed B6 mice that were either pigmented or albino.
The albino mice : The albino mice were homozygous and coisogenic for a mutant allele of tyrosinase (Tyrc-2J) that arose on the otherwise pigmented B6 background.
the albino B6 mice : In contrast to pigmented B6 mice (Figure 6), the IOPs of the albino B6 mice were not increased at measurement during the dark compared to light period of the day (P = 0.6, Figure 10B).
the albino B6 mice : Additionally, IOP differences between the light and dark period of the day were detected in the pigmented but not the albino B6 mice.
the albino B6 mice : Further experiments will determine the nature of the diurnal rhythm of IOP in the albino B6 mice and if its alteration or other mechanisms result in IOP elevation.
node_944
Tyrc-2J : The albino mice were homozygous and coisogenic for a mutant allele of tyrosinase (Tyrc-2J) that arose on the otherwise pigmented B6 background.
Tyrc-2J : The albino mice were homozygous and coisogenic for a mutant allele of tyrosinase (Tyrc-2J) that arose on the otherwise pigmented B6 background.
a mutant allele of tyrosinase : The albino mice were homozygous and coisogenic for a mutant allele of tyrosinase (Tyrc-2J) that arose on the otherwise pigmented B6 background.
node_948
homozygosity for Tyrc-2J : In 2 month old mice, homozygosity for Tyrc-2J resulted in increased IOP (14.2 ± 0.4 mmHg) compared to wild type, pigmented mice (12.4 ± 0.3 mmHg, P < 0.0001).
homozygosity for Tyrc-2J : In 2 month old mice, homozygosity for Tyrc-2J resulted in increased IOP (14.2 ± 0.4 mmHg) compared to wild type, pigmented mice (12.4 ± 0.3 mmHg, P < 0.0001).
Tyrc-2J homozygotes : B. IOP is not increased during the dark period of the day in Tyrc-2J homozygotes.
node_953
Figure 10A : The same was true for independent cohorts of mice of different ages that were analyzed at different times (Figure 10A).
Figure 10A : The same was true for independent cohorts of mice of different ages that were analyzed at different times (Figure 10A).
A : Tyr mutation results in increased IOP and altered diurnal changes A.
node_958
the IOPs of the albino B6 mice : In contrast to pigmented B6 mice (Figure 6), the IOPs of the albino B6 mice were not increased at measurement during the dark compared to light period of the day (P = 0.6, Figure 10B).
the IOPs of the albino B6 mice : In contrast to pigmented B6 mice (Figure 6), the IOPs of the albino B6 mice were not increased at measurement during the dark compared to light period of the day (P = 0.6, Figure 10B).
IOP in the albino B6 mice : Further experiments will determine the nature of the diurnal rhythm of IOP in the albino B6 mice and if its alteration or other mechanisms result in IOP elevation.
node_965
Figure 10B : In contrast to pigmented B6 mice (Figure 6), the IOPs of the albino B6 mice were not increased at measurement during the dark compared to light period of the day (P = 0.6, Figure 10B).
Figure 10B : In contrast to pigmented B6 mice (Figure 6), the IOPs of the albino B6 mice were not increased at measurement during the dark compared to light period of the day (P = 0.6, Figure 10B).
B : B. IOP is not increased during the dark period of the day in Tyrc-2J homozygotes.
node_972
Different cohorts of C57BL/6J mice that are homozygous for the spontaneous Tyrc-2J mutation : Different cohorts of C57BL/6J mice that are homozygous for the spontaneous Tyrc-2J mutation have higher IOP than their normal counterparts at all tested ages.
Different cohorts of C57BL/6J mice that are homozygous for the spontaneous Tyrc-2J mutation : Different cohorts of C57BL/6J mice that are homozygous for the spontaneous Tyrc-2J mutation have higher IOP than their normal counterparts at all tested ages.
their : Different cohorts of C57BL/6J mice that are homozygous for the spontaneous Tyrc-2J mutation have higher IOP than their normal counterparts at all tested ages.
node_998
IOP differences between strains : The magnitude of IOP differences between strains and the good reproducibility of readings over time will allow the use of genetic approaches to identify genes that underlie these differences.
IOP differences between strains : The magnitude of IOP differences between strains and the good reproducibility of readings over time will allow the use of genetic approaches to identify genes that underlie these differences.
these differences : The magnitude of IOP differences between strains and the good reproducibility of readings over time will allow the use of genetic approaches to identify genes that underlie these differences.
strain differences in IOP : Thus it is feasible to assess sufficient numbers of mice for quantitative trait locus (QTL) analysis methods and to use these methods to identify chromosomal regions contributing to strain differences in IOP.
node_1005
quantitative trait locus : Thus it is feasible to assess sufficient numbers of mice for quantitative trait locus (QTL) analysis methods and to use these methods to identify chromosomal regions contributing to strain differences in IOP.
quantitative trait locus : Thus it is feasible to assess sufficient numbers of mice for quantitative trait locus (QTL) analysis methods and to use these methods to identify chromosomal regions contributing to strain differences in IOP.
QTL : Thus it is feasible to assess sufficient numbers of mice for quantitative trait locus (QTL) analysis methods and to use these methods to identify chromosomal regions contributing to strain differences in IOP.
node_1007
quantitative trait locus (QTL) analysis methods : Thus it is feasible to assess sufficient numbers of mice for quantitative trait locus (QTL) analysis methods and to use these methods to identify chromosomal regions contributing to strain differences in IOP.
quantitative trait locus (QTL) analysis methods : Thus it is feasible to assess sufficient numbers of mice for quantitative trait locus (QTL) analysis methods and to use these methods to identify chromosomal regions contributing to strain differences in IOP.
these methods : Thus it is feasible to assess sufficient numbers of mice for quantitative trait locus (QTL) analysis methods and to use these methods to identify chromosomal regions contributing to strain differences in IOP.
node_1016
These : These are important approaches as they may allow the association of genes with IOP and glaucoma whose currently known functions do not suggest that they affect aqueous humor dynamics or do not immediately identify them as likely glaucoma candidates.
These : These are important approaches as they may allow the association of genes with IOP and glaucoma whose currently known functions do not suggest that they affect aqueous humor dynamics or do not immediately identify them as likely glaucoma candidates.
they : These are important approaches as they may allow the association of genes with IOP and glaucoma whose currently known functions do not suggest that they affect aqueous humor dynamics or do not immediately identify them as likely glaucoma candidates.
node_1019
genes : These are important approaches as they may allow the association of genes with IOP and glaucoma whose currently known functions do not suggest that they affect aqueous humor dynamics or do not immediately identify them as likely glaucoma candidates.
genes : These are important approaches as they may allow the association of genes with IOP and glaucoma whose currently known functions do not suggest that they affect aqueous humor dynamics or do not immediately identify them as likely glaucoma candidates.
whose : These are important approaches as they may allow the association of genes with IOP and glaucoma whose currently known functions do not suggest that they affect aqueous humor dynamics or do not immediately identify them as likely glaucoma candidates.
they : These are important approaches as they may allow the association of genes with IOP and glaucoma whose currently known functions do not suggest that they affect aqueous humor dynamics or do not immediately identify them as likely glaucoma candidates.
them : These are important approaches as they may allow the association of genes with IOP and glaucoma whose currently known functions do not suggest that they affect aqueous humor dynamics or do not immediately identify them as likely glaucoma candidates.
node_1029
IOP during a 12 minute measurement window :  No effect of anesthetic protocol on IOP during a 12 minute measurement window  Many anesthetic agents including xylazine lower IOP.
IOP during a 12 minute measurement window :  No effect of anesthetic protocol on IOP during a 12 minute measurement window  Many anesthetic agents including xylazine lower IOP.
IOP during the first 12 minutes after administration : Here, we show that, despite a depressant effect on IOP by 25 minutes, our anesthetic protocol has no detectable effect on IOP during the first 12 minutes after administration.
node_1032
xylazine :  No effect of anesthetic protocol on IOP during a 12 minute measurement window  Many anesthetic agents including xylazine lower IOP.
xylazine :  No effect of anesthetic protocol on IOP during a 12 minute measurement window  Many anesthetic agents including xylazine lower IOP.
xylazine : Our results agree with the time course of cardiovascular depression caused by intraperitoneal administration of ketamine and xylazine in rats.
node_1035
Ketamine : Ketamine usually appears to increase IOP [31-33], but there are reports of ketamine having no effect on IOP or even reducing IOP [31,34].
Ketamine : Ketamine usually appears to increase IOP [31-33], but there are reports of ketamine having no effect on IOP or even reducing IOP [31,34].
ketamine : Ketamine usually appears to increase IOP [31-33], but there are reports of ketamine having no effect on IOP or even reducing IOP [31,34].
ketamine : Our results agree with the time course of cardiovascular depression caused by intraperitoneal administration of ketamine and xylazine in rats.
ketamine : Essentially the same dose of ketamine and route of administration was used in both the rat and mouse IOP studies.
node_1042
species used : Different doses, species used, routes of administration or environments may contribute to these differences.
species used : Different doses, species used, routes of administration or environments may contribute to these differences.
the species : Factors that may influence the effect of anesthesia include the species, strain and environment used.
node_1045
environments : Different doses, species used, routes of administration or environments may contribute to these differences.
environments : Different doses, species used, routes of administration or environments may contribute to these differences.
Environment :  Environment may influence the effect of anesthesia  
The environment : The environment was kept at 21°C with a 14 hour light: 10 hour dark cycle.
node_1049
our anesthetic protocol : The relationship between the IOPs we measure and those in conscious mice depends upon the effect of our anesthetic protocol (intraperitoneal injection of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine).
our anesthetic protocol : The relationship between the IOPs we measure and those in conscious mice depends upon the effect of our anesthetic protocol (intraperitoneal injection of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine).
our anesthetic protocol : Here, we show that, despite a depressant effect on IOP by 25 minutes, our anesthetic protocol has no detectable effect on IOP during the first 12 minutes after administration.
the same dose of ketamine : Essentially the same dose of ketamine and route of administration was used in both the rat and mouse IOP studies.
node_1051
intraperitoneal injection of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine : The relationship between the IOPs we measure and those in conscious mice depends upon the effect of our anesthetic protocol (intraperitoneal injection of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine).
intraperitoneal injection of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine : The relationship between the IOPs we measure and those in conscious mice depends upon the effect of our anesthetic protocol (intraperitoneal injection of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine).
our anesthetic protocol : The relationship between the IOPs we measure and those in conscious mice depends upon the effect of our anesthetic protocol (intraperitoneal injection of 99 mg/kg ketamine and 9 mg/kg xylazine).
node_1055
An anesthetic effect : An anesthetic effect could potentially alter IOP and mask genetically determined differences in IOP.
An anesthetic effect : An anesthetic effect could potentially alter IOP and mask genetically determined differences in IOP.
this effect : Therefore, it is very important to understand this effect.
node_1073
rat studies : Similarities and differences to rat studies  
rat studies : Similarities and differences to rat studies  
rat : Thus, although both rat and mouse studies show that anesthesia decreases IOP, the studies do not agree on the timing of the effect.
the rat : Essentially the same dose of ketamine and route of administration was used in both the rat and mouse IOP studies.
node_1082
a different rat study : In contrast, intraperitoneally administered ketamine (100 mg/kg) was shown to rapidly decrease IOP in a different rat study [36].
a different rat study : In contrast, intraperitoneally administered ketamine (100 mg/kg) was shown to rapidly decrease IOP in a different rat study [36].
the experiment : IOP decreased further by the next reading (at 5 minutes) after which it remained stable for the duration of the experiment (20 minutes)[36].
that study : The time 0 measurement in that study was at a very similar state of anesthesia as our 4 and 5 minute time points (starting as soon as possible and within 20 to 60 seconds of adequate anesthesia), and the 5 minute rat time point was similar to our 9 and 10 minute measurement times.
node_1091
20 minutes : IOP decreased further by the next reading (at 5 minutes) after which it remained stable for the duration of the experiment (20 minutes)[36].
20 minutes : IOP decreased further by the next reading (at 5 minutes) after which it remained stable for the duration of the experiment (20 minutes)[36].
the duration of the experiment : IOP decreased further by the next reading (at 5 minutes) after which it remained stable for the duration of the experiment (20 minutes)[36].
node_1099
both rat and mouse studies : Thus, although both rat and mouse studies show that anesthesia decreases IOP, the studies do not agree on the timing of the effect.
both rat and mouse studies : Thus, although both rat and mouse studies show that anesthesia decreases IOP, the studies do not agree on the timing of the effect.
the studies : Thus, although both rat and mouse studies show that anesthesia decreases IOP, the studies do not agree on the timing of the effect.
node_1104
mouse studies : Thus, although both rat and mouse studies show that anesthesia decreases IOP, the studies do not agree on the timing of the effect.
mouse studies : Thus, although both rat and mouse studies show that anesthesia decreases IOP, the studies do not agree on the timing of the effect.
the : Essentially the same dose of ketamine and route of administration was used in both the rat and mouse IOP studies.
node_1129
laboratory : In mice, the strain does not appear to be important as no early effect of anesthesia was present in the three distantly related laboratory strains [37] we studied in detail, and we have not observed any obvious effect during this period in any analyzed strain.
laboratory : In mice, the strain does not appear to be important as no early effect of anesthesia was present in the three distantly related laboratory strains [37] we studied in detail, and we have not observed any obvious effect during this period in any analyzed strain.
laboratory : Diurnal variation in IOP is common in humans and laboratory animals [53].
node_1134
Cage : Cage cleanliness, changing frequency and housing density can alter drug metabolism and the effect of anesthesia in rats [38,39].
Cage : Cage cleanliness, changing frequency and housing density can alter drug metabolism and the effect of anesthesia in rats [38,39].
cages containing white pine bedding : Mice were housed in cages containing white pine bedding and covered with polyester filters.
the cages : The mice were group housed and the cages were changed one time per week.
any cage : If any cage appeared soiled between scheduled changes, the mice were placed in a clean cage.
node_1136
the effect of anesthesia in rats : Cage cleanliness, changing frequency and housing density can alter drug metabolism and the effect of anesthesia in rats [38,39].
the effect of anesthesia in rats : Cage cleanliness, changing frequency and housing density can alter drug metabolism and the effect of anesthesia in rats [38,39].
the effect of anesthetic agents in : Terpene administration or environmental exposure to terpenes in wood shavings alters drug resistance and decreases the effect of anesthetic agents in both rats and mice [40-45].  Risk factors for increased IOP  
node_1141
bedding used : The type of bedding used also may be important.
bedding used : The type of bedding used also may be important.
wood shavings for bedding : We use wood shavings for bedding and wood shavings expose the mice to terpenes.
white pine bedding : Mice were housed in cages containing white pine bedding and covered with polyester filters.
node_1144
wood : We use wood shavings for bedding and wood shavings expose the mice to terpenes.
wood : We use wood shavings for bedding and wood shavings expose the mice to terpenes.
wood : We use wood shavings for bedding and wood shavings expose the mice to terpenes.
wood : Terpene administration or environmental exposure to terpenes in wood shavings alters drug resistance and decreases the effect of anesthetic agents in both rats and mice [40-45].  Risk factors for increased IOP  
node_1150
terpenes : We use wood shavings for bedding and wood shavings expose the mice to terpenes.
terpenes : We use wood shavings for bedding and wood shavings expose the mice to terpenes.
Terpene : Terpene administration or environmental exposure to terpenes in wood shavings alters drug resistance and decreases the effect of anesthetic agents in both rats and mice [40-45].  Risk factors for increased IOP  
terpenes in wood shavings : Terpene administration or environmental exposure to terpenes in wood shavings alters drug resistance and decreases the effect of anesthetic agents in both rats and mice [40-45].  Risk factors for increased IOP  
node_1158
Risk : Terpene administration or environmental exposure to terpenes in wood shavings alters drug resistance and decreases the effect of anesthetic agents in both rats and mice [40-45].  Risk factors for increased IOP  
Risk : Terpene administration or environmental exposure to terpenes in wood shavings alters drug resistance and decreases the effect of anesthetic agents in both rats and mice [40-45].  Risk factors for increased IOP  
risk :  Obesity and diabetes  Obesity or higher body mass index have been implicated by some but not other studies as risk factors for increased IOP and glaucoma [51,55-57].
risk : Further experiments with obese non-diabetic or diabetic non-obese mice will help to characterize the separate effects of these risk factors.
risk : Genetically uniform, mice can be used to study the effects of these risk factors on IOP.
node_1161
factors such as diabetes, vascular hypertension, arterial hypotension, vasospasm, aberrant autoregulation of blood flow and sex : Some epidemiological studies implicate factors such as diabetes, vascular hypertension, arterial hypotension, vasospasm, aberrant autoregulation of blood flow and sex in glaucoma.
factors such as diabetes, vascular hypertension, arterial hypotension, vasospasm, aberrant autoregulation of blood flow and sex : Some epidemiological studies implicate factors such as diabetes, vascular hypertension, arterial hypotension, vasospasm, aberrant autoregulation of blood flow and sex in glaucoma.
these factors : Other studies find no association between these factors and glaucoma [2,46-48].
node_1167
Other studies : Other studies find no association between these factors and glaucoma [2,46-48].
Other studies : Other studies find no association between these factors and glaucoma [2,46-48].
other studies :  Obesity and diabetes  Obesity or higher body mass index have been implicated by some but not other studies as risk factors for increased IOP and glaucoma [51,55-57].
node_1171
various factors : Similarly, the effects of various factors including age, gender, blood pressure, obesity and diabetes have been variably associated with elevated IOP.
various factors : Similarly, the effects of various factors including age, gender, blood pressure, obesity and diabetes have been variably associated with elevated IOP.
these latter factors : We evaluated the relationship between these latter factors and IOP in genetically homogeneous mouse strains in a controlled environment.
node_1185
the IOP of B6 mice : Although within the range of variability observed in young mice, the IOP of B6 mice modestly decreased around 1 year of age.
the IOP of B6 mice : Although within the range of variability observed in young mice, the IOP of B6 mice modestly decreased around 1 year of age.
the IOP of B6 mice : At 2 years of age the IOP of B6 mice had decreased further, though an effect of anesthesia in these very old mice cannot be ruled out [49].
node_1187
the IOP of B6 mice modestly decreased around 1 year of age : Although within the range of variability observed in young mice, the IOP of B6 mice modestly decreased around 1 year of age.
the IOP of B6 mice modestly decreased around 1 year of age : Although within the range of variability observed in young mice, the IOP of B6 mice modestly decreased around 1 year of age.
This decrease : This decrease was statistically significant compared to young mice measured at the same time.
node_1190
around 1 year of age : Although within the range of variability observed in young mice, the IOP of B6 mice modestly decreased around 1 year of age.
around 1 year of age : Although within the range of variability observed in young mice, the IOP of B6 mice modestly decreased around 1 year of age.
the same time : This decrease was statistically significant compared to young mice measured at the same time.
node_1202
the oldest age examined : The IOP of 129P3/J mice also decreased with age but only at the oldest age examined (18 months).
the oldest age examined : The IOP of 129P3/J mice also decreased with age but only at the oldest age examined (18 months).
18 months : The IOP of 129P3/J mice also decreased with age but only at the oldest age examined (18 months).
node_1243
young, adult female mice of different mouse strains : Our comparison of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in young, adult female mice of different mouse strains, whose blood pressures differed up to 36 mmHg, did not reveal a positive correlation.
young, adult female mice of different mouse strains : Our comparison of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in young, adult female mice of different mouse strains, whose blood pressures differed up to 36 mmHg, did not reveal a positive correlation.
whose : Our comparison of the relationship between blood pressure and IOP in young, adult female mice of different mouse strains, whose blood pressures differed up to 36 mmHg, did not reveal a positive correlation.
node_1265
risk factors for increased IOP and glaucoma :  Obesity and diabetes  Obesity or higher body mass index have been implicated by some but not other studies as risk factors for increased IOP and glaucoma [51,55-57].
risk factors for increased IOP and glaucoma :  Obesity and diabetes  Obesity or higher body mass index have been implicated by some but not other studies as risk factors for increased IOP and glaucoma [51,55-57].
these risk factors : Further experiments with obese non-diabetic or diabetic non-obese mice will help to characterize the separate effects of these risk factors.
node_1280
groups of mice that were genetically similar : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
groups of mice that were genetically similar : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
they : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
node_1288
db : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
db : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
a leptin receptor mutation : To test if genetic perturbations that cause obesity and diabetes can alter IOP, we compared groups of mice that were genetically similar except that they were either homozygous or heterozygous for a leptin receptor mutation (db) that results in early onset obesity and diabetes.
node_1290
The obese, diabetic mice : The obese, diabetic mice had higher IOPs than their lean, non-diabetic littermates.
The obese, diabetic mice : The obese, diabetic mice had higher IOPs than their lean, non-diabetic littermates.
their : The obese, diabetic mice had higher IOPs than their lean, non-diabetic littermates.
node_1305
The molecular mechanisms underlying the diurnal rhythm : The molecular mechanisms underlying the diurnal rhythm are not defined but increased aqueous humor production or flow occurs during the period of increased IOP in both rabbits and humans [63-65].
The molecular mechanisms underlying the diurnal rhythm : The molecular mechanisms underlying the diurnal rhythm are not defined but increased aqueous humor production or flow occurs during the period of increased IOP in both rabbits and humans [63-65].
the molecular mechanisms controlling diurnal rhythms of IOP : Analysis of these mouse strains may increase understanding of the molecular mechanisms controlling diurnal rhythms of IOP and that may be relevant to glaucoma.
node_1307
the diurnal rhythm : The molecular mechanisms underlying the diurnal rhythm are not defined but increased aqueous humor production or flow occurs during the period of increased IOP in both rabbits and humans [63-65].
the diurnal rhythm : The molecular mechanisms underlying the diurnal rhythm are not defined but increased aqueous humor production or flow occurs during the period of increased IOP in both rabbits and humans [63-65].
diurnal rhythms : In agreement with this result, mice with albino eyes that are homozygous for tyrosinase or pink eye dilution mutations have altered diurnal rhythms compared to pigmented mice [75].
Diurnal rhythms : Diurnal rhythms are known to depend on visual pathways and to respond to light intensity.
node_1312
rabbits : The molecular mechanisms underlying the diurnal rhythm are not defined but increased aqueous humor production or flow occurs during the period of increased IOP in both rabbits and humans [63-65].
rabbits : The molecular mechanisms underlying the diurnal rhythm are not defined but increased aqueous humor production or flow occurs during the period of increased IOP in both rabbits and humans [63-65].
rabbits : Previously, a rise of IOP was reported to occur before onset of the dark period in rats [21], and rats and rabbits were shown to have higher IOP during the dark period compared to the light period [21,68,69].
node_1342
the dark : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
the dark : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
the dark : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
the dark : Interestingly, the IOP of strain CBA/CaJ, which has one of the highest daytime IOPs does not appear to increase in the dark.
the dark : Albinism by itself is either not sufficient to alter the diurnal rhythm of IOP or alters it in different ways depending upon genetic background, however, since the albino strains BALB/cByJ and SWR/J had increased IOP during the dark.
node_1345
functional rod and cone photoreceptors : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
functional rod and cone photoreceptors : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
these cells : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
node_1349
rod : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
rod : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
rods : In agreement with this finding, circadian regulation of wheel running by light was previously reported in mice lacking rods and cones [70].
node_1351
cone : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
cone : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
cones : In agreement with this finding, circadian regulation of wheel running by light was previously reported in mice lacking rods and cones [70].
node_1355
SWR/J mice : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
SWR/J mice : The IOP increase in the dark is not dependent on functional rod and cone photoreceptors since these cells degenerate in SWR/J mice due to homozygosity for the Pde6brd1 mutation.
mice lacking rods and cones : In agreement with this finding, circadian regulation of wheel running by light was previously reported in mice lacking rods and cones [70].
node_1358
light : In agreement with this finding, circadian regulation of wheel running by light was previously reported in mice lacking rods and cones [70].
light : In agreement with this finding, circadian regulation of wheel running by light was previously reported in mice lacking rods and cones [70].
light : These include alteration of the number of ipsilaterally projecting retinal axons and substantially increased light penetration past the iris [74].
light : Diurnal rhythms are known to depend on visual pathways and to respond to light intensity.
light : The environment was kept at 21°C with a 14 hour light: 10 hour dark cycle.
the lights : All dark period measurements were made between 1 and 3 hours after the lights turned off.
light : All other mice were protected from light exposure throughout the time an individual mouse was analyzed.
node_1363
the IOP of strain CBA/CaJ : Interestingly, the IOP of strain CBA/CaJ, which has one of the highest daytime IOPs does not appear to increase in the dark.
the IOP of strain CBA/CaJ : Interestingly, the IOP of strain CBA/CaJ, which has one of the highest daytime IOPs does not appear to increase in the dark.
one of the highest daytime IOPs : Interestingly, the IOP of strain CBA/CaJ, which has one of the highest daytime IOPs does not appear to increase in the dark.
node_1376
diurnal rhythms of IOP : Analysis of these mouse strains may increase understanding of the molecular mechanisms controlling diurnal rhythms of IOP and that may be relevant to glaucoma.
diurnal rhythms of IOP : Analysis of these mouse strains may increase understanding of the molecular mechanisms controlling diurnal rhythms of IOP and that may be relevant to glaucoma.
the diurnal rhythm of IOP : Albinism by itself is either not sufficient to alter the diurnal rhythm of IOP or alters it in different ways depending upon genetic background, however, since the albino strains BALB/cByJ and SWR/J had increased IOP during the dark.
it : Albinism by itself is either not sufficient to alter the diurnal rhythm of IOP or alters it in different ways depending upon genetic background, however, since the albino strains BALB/cByJ and SWR/J had increased IOP during the dark.
node_1383
aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes :  Car2 deficiency does not alter IOP  Bicarbonate formation is important for aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes and carbonic anhydrase (CA) facilitates this secretion.
aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes :  Car2 deficiency does not alter IOP  Bicarbonate formation is important for aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes and carbonic anhydrase (CA) facilitates this secretion.
this secretion :  Car2 deficiency does not alter IOP  Bicarbonate formation is important for aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes and carbonic anhydrase (CA) facilitates this secretion.
aqueous humor secretion : CAIV activity was recently demonstrated in the ciliary processes [73] and so our data may support a more substantial role for CAIV compared to CAII in aqueous humor secretion.
aqueous humor secretion : It also is possible that CAII substantially contributes to aqueous humor secretion but that functional mouse CAIV is sufficient to prevent an effect of CAII deficiency on IOP in Car2 mutant mice.
aqueous secretion : In support of a role for both enzymes, a greater than 90% inhibition of CA is required for significant reduction of aqueous secretion [71,72].  Tyrosinase deficiency results in increased IOP  Tyrosinase is the first enzyme of the pigment production pathway.
node_1385
the ciliary processes :  Car2 deficiency does not alter IOP  Bicarbonate formation is important for aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes and carbonic anhydrase (CA) facilitates this secretion.
the ciliary processes :  Car2 deficiency does not alter IOP  Bicarbonate formation is important for aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes and carbonic anhydrase (CA) facilitates this secretion.
the ciliary processes : There are multiple forms of CA and the CAII isoform is reported to be the predominant form in the ciliary processes [71,72].
the ciliary processes : CAIV activity was recently demonstrated in the ciliary processes [73] and so our data may support a more substantial role for CAIV compared to CAII in aqueous humor secretion.
node_1387
carbonic anhydrase :  Car2 deficiency does not alter IOP  Bicarbonate formation is important for aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes and carbonic anhydrase (CA) facilitates this secretion.
carbonic anhydrase :  Car2 deficiency does not alter IOP  Bicarbonate formation is important for aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes and carbonic anhydrase (CA) facilitates this secretion.
CA : There are multiple forms of CA and the CAII isoform is reported to be the predominant form in the ciliary processes [71,72].
CA : In support of a role for both enzymes, a greater than 90% inhibition of CA is required for significant reduction of aqueous secretion [71,72].  Tyrosinase deficiency results in increased IOP  Tyrosinase is the first enzyme of the pigment production pathway.
carbonic anhydrase : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
node_1388
carbonic anhydrase :  Car2 deficiency does not alter IOP  Bicarbonate formation is important for aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes and carbonic anhydrase (CA) facilitates this secretion.
carbonic anhydrase :  Car2 deficiency does not alter IOP  Bicarbonate formation is important for aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes and carbonic anhydrase (CA) facilitates this secretion.
CA :  Car2 deficiency does not alter IOP  Bicarbonate formation is important for aqueous humor secretion from the ciliary processes and carbonic anhydrase (CA) facilitates this secretion.
node_1402
CAIV : CAIV activity was recently demonstrated in the ciliary processes [73] and so our data may support a more substantial role for CAIV compared to CAII in aqueous humor secretion.
CAIV : CAIV activity was recently demonstrated in the ciliary processes [73] and so our data may support a more substantial role for CAIV compared to CAII in aqueous humor secretion.
CAIV : CAIV activity was recently demonstrated in the ciliary processes [73] and so our data may support a more substantial role for CAIV compared to CAII in aqueous humor secretion.
node_1417
both : In support of a role for both enzymes, a greater than 90% inhibition of CA is required for significant reduction of aqueous secretion [71,72].  Tyrosinase deficiency results in increased IOP  Tyrosinase is the first enzyme of the pigment production pathway.
both : In support of a role for both enzymes, a greater than 90% inhibition of CA is required for significant reduction of aqueous secretion [71,72].  Tyrosinase deficiency results in increased IOP  Tyrosinase is the first enzyme of the pigment production pathway.
enzymes : In support of a role for both enzymes, a greater than 90% inhibition of CA is required for significant reduction of aqueous secretion [71,72].  Tyrosinase deficiency results in increased IOP  Tyrosinase is the first enzyme of the pigment production pathway.
node_1423
Tyrosinase deficiency : In support of a role for both enzymes, a greater than 90% inhibition of CA is required for significant reduction of aqueous secretion [71,72].  Tyrosinase deficiency results in increased IOP  Tyrosinase is the first enzyme of the pigment production pathway.
Tyrosinase deficiency : In support of a role for both enzymes, a greater than 90% inhibition of CA is required for significant reduction of aqueous secretion [71,72].  Tyrosinase deficiency results in increased IOP  Tyrosinase is the first enzyme of the pigment production pathway.
Tyrosinase deficiency : Tyrosinase deficiency causes albinism and has various ocular consequences.
node_1431
various ocular consequences : Tyrosinase deficiency causes albinism and has various ocular consequences.
various ocular consequences : Tyrosinase deficiency causes albinism and has various ocular consequences.
These : These include alteration of the number of ipsilaterally projecting retinal axons and substantially increased light penetration past the iris [74].
node_1469
the diurnal rhythm of IOP in the albino B6 mice : Further experiments will determine the nature of the diurnal rhythm of IOP in the albino B6 mice and if its alteration or other mechanisms result in IOP elevation.
the diurnal rhythm of IOP in the albino B6 mice : Further experiments will determine the nature of the diurnal rhythm of IOP in the albino B6 mice and if its alteration or other mechanisms result in IOP elevation.
its : Further experiments will determine the nature of the diurnal rhythm of IOP in the albino B6 mice and if its alteration or other mechanisms result in IOP elevation.
node_1480
Various factors : Various factors have been variably associated with risk for increased IOP in humans.
Various factors : Various factors have been variably associated with risk for increased IOP in humans.
these risk factors on IOP : Genetically uniform, mice can be used to study the effects of these risk factors on IOP.
node_1494
All experiments : All experiments were performed in compliance with the ARVO statement for use of animals in ophthalmic and vision research.
All experiments : All experiments were performed in compliance with the ARVO statement for use of animals in ophthalmic and vision research.
all experiments : As demonstrated here, the IOPs of C57BL/6J are very consistent over time and so these animals were interspersed with experimental mice during all experiments to ensure that calibration had not drifted and that the system was functioning optimally.
node_1502
NIH31 : For most experiments, the mice were fed NIH31 (6 % fat) chow ad libitum, and their water was acidified to pH 2.8 to 3.2.
NIH31 : For most experiments, the mice were fed NIH31 (6 % fat) chow ad libitum, and their water was acidified to pH 2.8 to 3.2.
NIH31 : To ensure that we were analyzing the effect of age and not diabetes, the B6 mice in the aging experiment were fed NIH31 (4% fat) chow.
this otherwise identical diet : We have found no differences in IOP between B6 mice housed on the 4% fat and 6% fat versions of this otherwise identical diet.
node_1506
a high fat diet : B6 mice develop diet induced diabetes when maintained on a high fat diet [76].
a high fat diet : B6 mice develop diet induced diabetes when maintained on a high fat diet [76].
6% fat versions of this otherwise identical diet : We have found no differences in IOP between B6 mice housed on the 4% fat and 6% fat versions of this otherwise identical diet.
node_1512
the B6 mice in the aging experiment : To ensure that we were analyzing the effect of age and not diabetes, the B6 mice in the aging experiment were fed NIH31 (4% fat) chow.
the B6 mice in the aging experiment : To ensure that we were analyzing the effect of age and not diabetes, the B6 mice in the aging experiment were fed NIH31 (4% fat) chow.
B6 mice housed on the 4% fat : We have found no differences in IOP between B6 mice housed on the 4% fat and 6% fat versions of this otherwise identical diet.
node_1514
the aging experiment : To ensure that we were analyzing the effect of age and not diabetes, the B6 mice in the aging experiment were fed NIH31 (4% fat) chow.
the aging experiment : To ensure that we were analyzing the effect of age and not diabetes, the B6 mice in the aging experiment were fed NIH31 (4% fat) chow.
the aging experiments : It was not possible to analyze all age groups of each strain at the same time in the aging experiments.
node_1516
NIH31 (4% fat) chow : To ensure that we were analyzing the effect of age and not diabetes, the B6 mice in the aging experiment were fed NIH31 (4% fat) chow.
NIH31 (4% fat) chow : To ensure that we were analyzing the effect of age and not diabetes, the B6 mice in the aging experiment were fed NIH31 (4% fat) chow.
the 4% fat : We have found no differences in IOP between B6 mice housed on the 4% fat and 6% fat versions of this otherwise identical diet.
node_1531
specific pathogens : The colony was monitored for specific pathogens by The Jackson Laboratory's routine surveillance program (see  for specific pathogens).  Intraocular pressure  Intraocular pressures were measured as described elsewhere [13,77].
specific pathogens : The colony was monitored for specific pathogens by The Jackson Laboratory's routine surveillance program (see  for specific pathogens).  Intraocular pressure  Intraocular pressures were measured as described elsewhere [13,77].
specific pathogens : The colony was monitored for specific pathogens by The Jackson Laboratory's routine surveillance program (see  for specific pathogens).  Intraocular pressure  Intraocular pressures were measured as described elsewhere [13,77].
node_1538
the procedure room : The mice were typically acclimatized to the procedure room for at least 2 weeks prior to measurement, but sometimes between 1 and 2 weeks.
the procedure room : The mice were typically acclimatized to the procedure room for at least 2 weeks prior to measurement, but sometimes between 1 and 2 weeks.
The room : The room was equipped with dim red lights and mice were protected from all light exposure during set up.
the same procedure room as was used for IOP measurment : The mice were analyzed in the same procedure room as was used for IOP measurment.
node_1564
dim red lights : The room was equipped with dim red lights and mice were protected from all light exposure during set up.
dim red lights : The room was equipped with dim red lights and mice were protected from all light exposure during set up.
the red light : Each mouse was briefly exposed to the red light when the anesthetic agents were administered.
node_1568
Each mouse : Each mouse was briefly exposed to the red light when the anesthetic agents were administered.
Each mouse : Each mouse was briefly exposed to the red light when the anesthetic agents were administered.
the mouse : When adequate anesthesia was achieved (after 3 to 4 minutes), the mouse was placed on the measurement platform and the white light of the microscope was turned on (for approximately 1 and a half minutes) to allow ocular cannulation, IOP measurement and post-measurement tests [13] that guard against artifactual data.
node_1574
the white light of the microscope : When adequate anesthesia was achieved (after 3 to 4 minutes), the mouse was placed on the measurement platform and the white light of the microscope was turned on (for approximately 1 and a half minutes) to allow ocular cannulation, IOP measurement and post-measurement tests [13] that guard against artifactual data.
the white light of the microscope : When adequate anesthesia was achieved (after 3 to 4 minutes), the mouse was placed on the measurement platform and the white light of the microscope was turned on (for approximately 1 and a half minutes) to allow ocular cannulation, IOP measurement and post-measurement tests [13] that guard against artifactual data.
The white light : The white light was used at very low intensity and was dim but we cannot rule out the possibility that this brief exposure altered the IOP.
node_1585
an individual mouse : All other mice were protected from light exposure throughout the time an individual mouse was analyzed.
an individual mouse : All other mice were protected from light exposure throughout the time an individual mouse was analyzed.
The mice : The mice were analyzed in the same procedure room as was used for IOP measurment.
node_1606
4% paraformaldehyde : Eyes from at least 2 mice of the listed strains were fixed (4% paraformaldehyde or Fekete's acid-alcohol-formalin fixative) processed, paraffin embedded and sectioned as previously reported [15,79], except that the paraformaldehyde was buffered with 0.1 M phosphate buffer.
4% paraformaldehyde : Eyes from at least 2 mice of the listed strains were fixed (4% paraformaldehyde or Fekete's acid-alcohol-formalin fixative) processed, paraffin embedded and sectioned as previously reported [15,79], except that the paraformaldehyde was buffered with 0.1 M phosphate buffer.
Fekete's acid-alcohol-formalin fixative : Eyes from at least 2 mice of the listed strains were fixed (4% paraformaldehyde or Fekete's acid-alcohol-formalin fixative) processed, paraffin embedded and sectioned as previously reported [15,79], except that the paraformaldehyde was buffered with 0.1 M phosphate buffer.
the paraformaldehyde : Eyes from at least 2 mice of the listed strains were fixed (4% paraformaldehyde or Fekete's acid-alcohol-formalin fixative) processed, paraffin embedded and sectioned as previously reported [15,79], except that the paraformaldehyde was buffered with 0.1 M phosphate buffer.
node_1616
Saggital sections : Saggital sections including the pupil and optic nerve were collected and analyzed as they contain most ocular structures.
Saggital sections : Saggital sections including the pupil and optic nerve were collected and analyzed as they contain most ocular structures.
they : Saggital sections including the pupil and optic nerve were collected and analyzed as they contain most ocular structures.
node_1628
PCR : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
PCR : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
polymerase chain reaction : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
node_1631
Intraocular pressure : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
Intraocular pressure : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
IOP : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
node_1634
C57BL/6J : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
C57BL/6J : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
B6 : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
node_1637
chromosome : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
chromosome : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
Chr : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
node_1640
polymerase chain reaction : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
polymerase chain reaction : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
PCR : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
node_1643
carbonic anhydrase : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
carbonic anhydrase : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
CA : The PCR products we purified and sequenced as described [22].  Abbreviations  Intraocular pressure (IOP), C57BL/6J (B6), chromosome (Chr), polymerase chain reaction (PCR), carbonic anhydrase (CA)  Acknowledgments  We thank Norma Buckley, Felicia Farley and Jennifer Smith for their assistance with data entry, references, and figures.
node_1651
Marianna Mertts : We also thank Jane Barker for the Car2 mice, Marianna Mertts for her help with analysis of Myoc alleles, and members of the John laboratory, Tatyana Golovkina, Edward Leiter and Timothy O'Brien for critical reading of the manuscript.
Marianna Mertts : We also thank Jane Barker for the Car2 mice, Marianna Mertts for her help with analysis of Myoc alleles, and members of the John laboratory, Tatyana Golovkina, Edward Leiter and Timothy O'Brien for critical reading of the manuscript.
her : We also thank Jane Barker for the Car2 mice, Marianna Mertts for her help with analysis of Myoc alleles, and members of the John laboratory, Tatyana Golovkina, Edward Leiter and Timothy O'Brien for critical reading of the manuscript.
node_1655
the Howard Hughes Medical Institute : Major funding was provided by the Howard Hughes Medical Institute.
the Howard Hughes Medical Institute : Major funding was provided by the Howard Hughes Medical Institute.
The Howard Hughes Medical Institute : SWMJ is an Assistant Investigator of The Howard Hughes Medical Institute.
